Artur Kolesnykov built the app as a Freemium app. This SERVICE is provided by Artur Kolesnykov at no cost and is intended for use as is.
This page is used to inform visitors regarding my policies with the collection, use, and disclosure of Personal Information if anyone decided to use my Service.
If you choose to use my Service, then you agree to the collection and use of information in relation to this policy. The Personal Information that I collect is used for providing and improving the Service. I will not use or share your information with anyone except as described in this Privacy Policy.
The terms used in this Privacy Policy have the same meanings as in our Terms and Conditions, which is accessible at the app unless otherwise defined in this Privacy Policy.
Information Collection and Use
For a better experience, while using our Service, I may require you to provide us with certain personally identifiable information. The information that I request will be retained on your device and is not collected by me in any way.
Log Data
I want to inform you that whenever you use my Service, in a case of an error in the app I collect data and information (through third party products) on your phone called Log Data. This Log Data may include information such as your device Internet Protocol (“IP”) address, device name, operating system version, the configuration of the app when utilizing my Service, the time and date of your use of the Service, and other statistics.
Cookies
Cookies are files with a small amount of data that are commonly used as anonymous unique identifiers. These are sent to your browser from the websites that you visit and are stored on your device’s internal memory.
This Service does not use these “cookies” explicitly. However, the app may use third party code and libraries that use “cookies” to collect information and improve their services. You have the option to either accept or refuse these cookies and know when a cookie is being sent to your device. If you choose to refuse our cookies, you may not be able to use some portions of this Service.
Service Providers
I may employ third-party companies and individuals due to the following reasons:
To facilitate our Service;
To provide the Service on our behalf;
To perform Service-related services; or
To assist us in analyzing how our Service is used.
I want to inform users of this Service that these third parties have access to your Personal Information. The reason is to perform the tasks assigned to them on our behalf. However, they are obligated not to disclose or use the information for any other purpose.
We may use Smartlook, which is an analytics solution. Smartlook may record: Screens visited, Interaction patterns (such as screen actions, gestures: taps, scrolls) and Device details (Type, Version, Model, Operating System). We are using the information collected by Smartlook to improve our app.
Smartlook does not collect personally identifiable information and does not track your browsing habits across apps.
Advertising
Our app uses Appodeal for ad mediation and monetization. Appodeal collects certain data, including your IP address and advertising ID, to serve personalized and non-personalized ads. You can review Appodeal’s privacy policy here:
Appodeal Privacy Policy
.
Security
I value your trust in providing us your Personal Information, thus we are striving to use commercially acceptable means of protecting it. But remember that no method of transmission over the internet, or method of electronic storage is 100% secure and reliable, and I cannot guarantee its absolute security.
Links to Other Sites
This Service may contain links to other sites. If you click on a third-party link, you will be directed to that site. Note that these external sites are not operated by me. Therefore, I strongly advise you to review the Privacy Policy of these websites. I have no control over and assume no responsibility for the content, privacy policies, or practices of any third-party sites or services.
Children’s Privacy
These Services do not address anyone under the age of 13. I do not knowingly collect personally identifiable information from children under 13. In the case I discover that a child under 13 has provided me with personal information, I immediately delete this from our servers. If you are a parent or guardian and you are aware that your child has provided us with personal information, please contact me so that I will be able to do necessary actions.
Changes to This Privacy Policy
I may update our Privacy Policy from time to time. Thus, you are advised to review this page periodically for any changes. I will notify you of any changes by posting the new Privacy Policy on this page.
Contact Us
If you have any questions or suggestions about my Privacy Policy, do not hesitate to contact me at enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Portuguese
Política de Privacidade
Artur Kolesnykov construiu o aplicativo como um aplicativo Freemium. Este SERVIÇO é fornecido por Artur Kolesnykov sem nenhum custo e deve ser usado como está.
Esta página é usada para informar os visitantes sobre minhas políticas de coleta, uso e divulgação de Informações Pessoais, caso alguém decida usar meu Serviço.
Se você optar por usar meu serviço, concorda com a coleta e uso de informações em relação a esta política. As informações pessoais que recolho são usadas para fornecer e melhorar o serviço. Não irei usar ou compartilhar suas informações com ninguém, exceto conforme descrito nesta Política de Privacidade.
Os termos usados ​​nesta Política de Privacidade têm os mesmos significados que em nossos Termos e Condições, que podem ser acessados ​​no aplicativo, a menos que definido de outra forma nesta Política de Privacidade.
Coleta e uso de informações
Para uma melhor experiência, ao usar nosso Serviço, posso solicitar que você nos forneça certas informações de identificação pessoal. As informações que solicito serão retidas em seu dispositivo e não serão coletadas por mim de forma alguma.
Dados de registro
Quero informar que sempre que você utiliza o meu Serviço, em caso de erro no aplicativo, eu coleto dados e informações (através de produtos de terceiros) no seu telefone chamado Log Data. Estes dados de registro podem incluir informações como endereço de protocolo de Internet («IP») do dispositivo, nome do dispositivo, versão do sistema operacional, a configuração do aplicativo ao utilizar meu serviço, a hora e data de uso do serviço e outras estatísticas .
Biscoitos
Cookies são arquivos com uma pequena quantidade de dados que são comumente usados ​​como identificadores exclusivos anônimos. Eles são enviados para o seu navegador a partir dos sites que você visita e são armazenados na memória interna do seu dispositivo.
Este Serviço não usa esses “cookies” explicitamente. No entanto, o aplicativo pode usar código de terceiros e bibliotecas que usam “cookies” para coletar informações e melhorar seus serviços. Você tem a opção de aceitar ou recusar esses cookies e saber quando um cookie está sendo enviado para o seu dispositivo. Se você decidir recusar nossos cookies, pode não ser capaz de usar algumas partes deste Serviço.
Provedores de serviço
Posso empregar empresas terceirizadas e indivíduos pelos seguintes motivos:
Para facilitar o nosso serviço;
Para fornecer o Serviço em nosso nome;
Para executar serviços relacionados com o serviço; ou
Para nos ajudar a analisar como nosso Serviço é usado.
Desejo informar aos usuários deste Serviço que esses terceiros têm acesso às suas Informações Pessoais. O motivo é realizar as tarefas atribuídas a eles em nosso nome. No entanto, eles são obrigados a não divulgar ou usar as informações para qualquer outra finalidade.
Podemos usar o Smartlook, que é uma solução analítica. O Smartlook pode registrar: Telas visitadas, padrões de interação (como ações na tela, gestos: toques, rolagens) e detalhes do dispositivo (tipo, versão, modelo, sistema operacional). Estamos usando as informações coletadas pelo Smartlook para melhorar nosso aplicativo.
O Smartlook não coleta informações de identificação pessoal e não rastreia seus hábitos de navegação nos aplicativos.
Publicidade
Nosso aplicativo usa o Appodeal para mediação e monetização de anúncios. O Appodeal coleta certos dados, incluindo seu endereço IP e ID de publicidade, para exibir anúncios personalizados e não personalizados. Você pode revisar a política de privacidade do Appodeal aqui:
Política de Privacidade do Appodeal
.
Segurança
Valorizo ​​sua confiança em nos fornecer suas informações pessoais, portanto, estamos nos empenhando para usar meios comercialmente aceitáveis ​​de protegê-las. Mas lembre-se que nenhum método de transmissão pela internet, ou método de armazenamento eletrônico é 100% seguro e confiável, e não posso garantir sua segurança absoluta.
Links para outros sites
Este serviço pode conter links para outros sites. Se você clicar em um link de terceiros, será direcionado a esse site. Observe que esses sites externos não são operados por mim. Portanto, eu recomendo fortemente que você analise a Política de Privacidade desses sites. Não tenho controle e não assumo responsabilidade pelo conteúdo, políticas de privacidade ou práticas de quaisquer sites ou serviços de terceiros.
Privacidade das crianças
Estes Serviços não se dirigem a ninguém com idade inferior a 13 anos. Não recolho intencionalmente informações de identificação pessoal de crianças com menos de 13 anos. No caso de descobrir que uma criança com menos de 13 anos forneceu-me informações pessoais, as elimino imediatamente dos nossos servidores. Se você é um pai ou responsável e sabe que seu filho nos forneceu informações pessoais, entre em contato comigo para que eu possa tomar as medidas necessárias.
Mudanças nesta Política de Privacidade
Posso atualizar nossa Política de Privacidade de tempos em tempos. Portanto, recomendamos que você reveja esta página periodicamente para verificar quaisquer alterações. Irei notificá-lo de quaisquer alterações, postando a nova Política de Privacidade nesta página.
Entre em contato conosco
Se você tiver alguma dúvida ou sugestão sobre minha Política de Privacidade, não hesite em entrar em contato comigo pelo e-mail enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Deutsche
Datenschutz-Bestimmungen
Artur Kolesnykov hat die App als Freemium-App erstellt. Dieser SERVICE wird von Artur Kolesnykov kostenlos zur Verfügung gestellt und ist für den unveränderten Gebrauch bestimmt.
Diese Seite wird verwendet, um Besucher über meine Richtlinien bezüglich der Erfassung, Verwendung und Offenlegung persönlicher Informationen zu informieren, wenn sich jemand für die Nutzung meines Dienstes entschieden hat.
Wenn Sie sich für die Nutzung meines Dienstes entscheiden, stimmen Sie der Erfassung und Verwendung von Informationen in Bezug auf diese Richtlinie zu. Die von mir gesammelten persönlichen Daten werden zur Bereitstellung und Verbesserung des Dienstes verwendet. Ich werde Ihre Daten nur wie in dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie beschrieben verwenden oder an Dritte weitergeben.
Die in dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie verwendeten Begriffe haben dieselbe Bedeutung wie in unseren Allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen, auf die über die App zugegriffen werden kann, sofern in dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie nichts anderes definiert ist.
Sammlung und Verwendung von Informationen
Für eine bessere Erfahrung bei der Nutzung unseres Service kann es erforderlich sein, dass Sie uns bestimmte personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung stellen. Die von mir angeforderten Informationen bleiben auf Ihrem Gerät erhalten und werden von mir in keiner Weise erfasst.
Logdaten
Ich möchte Sie darüber informieren, dass ich bei jeder Nutzung meines Dienstes im Falle eines Fehlers in der App Daten und Informationen (über Produkte von Drittanbietern) auf Ihrem Telefon mit dem Namen «Protokolldaten» sammle. Diese Protokolldaten können Informationen wie die IP-Adresse (Internet Protocol) Ihres Geräts, den Gerätenamen, die Betriebssystemversion, die Konfiguration der App bei Nutzung meines Dienstes, die Uhrzeit und das Datum Ihrer Nutzung des Dienstes sowie andere Statistiken enthalten .
Kekse
Cookies sind Dateien mit einer kleinen Datenmenge, die üblicherweise als anonyme eindeutige Kennungen verwendet werden. Diese werden von den von Ihnen besuchten Websites an Ihren Browser gesendet und im internen Speicher Ihres Geräts gespeichert.
Dieser Service verwendet diese „Cookies“ nicht explizit. Die App verwendet jedoch möglicherweise Code und Bibliotheken von Drittanbietern, die „Cookies“ verwenden, um Informationen zu sammeln und ihre Dienste zu verbessern. Sie haben die Möglichkeit, diese Cookies entweder zu akzeptieren oder abzulehnen und zu erfahren, wann ein Cookie an Ihr Gerät gesendet wird. Wenn Sie unsere Cookies ablehnen, können Sie möglicherweise einige Teile dieses Dienstes nicht nutzen.
Dienstleister
Ich kann aus folgenden Gründen Drittunternehmen und Einzelpersonen beschäftigen:
Um unseren Service zu erleichtern;
Den Service in unserem Namen bereitzustellen;
Servicebezogene Dienstleistungen erbringen; oder
Um uns bei der Analyse der Nutzung unseres Service zu unterstützen.
Ich möchte Benutzer dieses Dienstes darüber informieren, dass diese Dritten Zugriff auf Ihre persönlichen Daten haben. Der Grund ist, die ihnen zugewiesenen Aufgaben in unserem Namen auszuführen. Sie sind jedoch verpflichtet, die Informationen nicht weiterzugeben oder für andere Zwecke zu verwenden.
Möglicherweise verwenden wir Smartlook, eine Analyselösung. Smartlook kann Folgendes aufzeichnen: besuchte Bildschirme, Interaktionsmuster (wie Bildschirmaktionen, Gesten: Tippen, Scrollen) und Gerätedetails (Typ, Version, Modell, Betriebssystem). Wir verwenden die von Smartlook gesammelten Informationen, um unsere App zu verbessern.
Smartlook sammelt keine personenbezogenen Daten und verfolgt Ihre Surfgewohnheiten nicht über Apps hinweg.
Werbung
Unsere App verwendet Appodeal für die Anzeigenvermittlung und Monetarisierung. Appodeal sammelt bestimmte Daten, einschließlich Ihrer IP-Adresse und Werbe-ID, um personalisierte und nicht personalisierte Anzeigen bereitzustellen. Sie können die Datenschutzrichtlinie von Appodeal hier einsehen:
Appodeal-Datenschutzrichtlinie
.
Sicherheit
Ich schätze Ihr Vertrauen in die Bereitstellung Ihrer persönlichen Daten. Daher bemühen wir uns, wirtschaftlich akzeptable Mittel zum Schutz dieser Daten zu verwenden. Denken Sie jedoch daran, dass keine Methode zur Übertragung über das Internet oder zur elektronischen Speicherung 100% sicher und zuverlässig ist und ich die absolute Sicherheit nicht garantieren kann.
Links zu anderen Seiten
Dieser Service kann Links zu anderen Websites enthalten. Wenn Sie auf einen Link eines Drittanbieters klicken, werden Sie zu dieser Site weitergeleitet. Beachten Sie, dass diese externen Websites nicht von mir betrieben werden. Aus diesem Grund empfehle ich Ihnen dringend, die Datenschutzbestimmungen dieser Websites zu lesen. Ich habe keine Kontrolle über Inhalte, Datenschutzrichtlinien oder Praktiken von Websites oder Diensten Dritter und übernehme keine Verantwortung dafür.
Datenschutz für Kinder
Diese Dienste richten sich nicht an Personen unter 13 Jahren. Ich sammle wissentlich keine personenbezogenen Daten von Kindern unter 13 Jahren. Wenn ich feststelle, dass ein Kind unter 13 Jahren mir personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung gestellt hat, lösche ich diese sofort von unseren Servern. Wenn Sie Eltern oder Erziehungsberechtigte sind und wissen, dass Ihr Kind uns personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung gestellt hat, setzen Sie sich bitte mit mir in Verbindung, damit ich die erforderlichen Maßnahmen ergreifen kann.
Änderungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Ich kann unsere Datenschutzrichtlinie von Zeit zu Zeit aktualisieren. Es wird daher empfohlen, diese Seite regelmäßig auf Änderungen zu überprüfen. Ich werde Sie über Änderungen informieren, indem ich die neue Datenschutzrichtlinie auf dieser Seite veröffentliche.
Kontaktiere uns
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Anregungen zu meiner Datenschutzrichtlinie haben, zögern Sie nicht, mich unter enzoapps.info@gmail.com zu kontaktieren.
Русский
Политика конфиденциальности
Артур Колесников создал приложение как Freemium-приложение. Данная УСЛУГА предоставляется Артуром Колесниковым бесплатно и предназначена для использования «как есть».
Эта страница используется для информирования посетителей о моей политике в отношении сбора, использования и раскрытия Личной информации, если кто-то решил использовать мою Службу.
Если вы решите использовать мою Службу, вы соглашаетесь на сбор и использование информации в отношении этой политики. Личная информация, которую я собираю, используется для предоставления и улучшения Сервиса. Я не буду использовать или передавать вашу информацию кому-либо, кроме случаев, описанных в настоящей Политике конфиденциальности.
Термины, используемые в настоящей Политике конфиденциальности, имеют то же значение, что и в наших Положениях и условиях, которые доступны в приложении, если иное не определено в настоящей Политике конфиденциальности.
Сбор и использование информации
Для лучшего опыта при использовании нашего Сервиса я могу потребовать от вас предоставить нам определенную личную информацию. Информация, которую я запрашиваю, будет храниться на вашем устройстве и не будет собираться мной каким-либо образом.
Данные журнала
Я хочу сообщить вам, что всякий раз, когда вы используете мою Службу, в случае ошибки в приложении я собираю данные и информацию (через сторонние продукты) на вашем телефоне, которые называются данными журнала. Эти данные журнала могут включать такую ​​информацию, как IP-адрес вашего устройства, имя устройства, версия операционной системы, конфигурация приложения при использовании моего Сервиса, время и дата использования вами Сервиса и другие статистические данные. .
Печенье
Файлы cookie — это файлы с небольшим объемом данных, которые обычно используются в качестве анонимных уникальных идентификаторов. Они отправляются в ваш браузер с веб-сайтов, которые вы посещаете, и хранятся во внутренней памяти вашего устройства.
Этот Сервис не использует эти «куки» явно. Однако приложение может использовать сторонний код и библиотеки, которые используют файлы cookie для сбора информации и улучшения своих услуг. У вас есть возможность принять или отклонить эти файлы cookie и узнать, когда файл cookie отправляется на ваше устройство. Если вы решите отказаться от наших файлов cookie, возможно, вы не сможете использовать некоторые части этого Сервиса.
Поставщики услуг
Я могу нанимать сторонние компании и частных лиц по следующим причинам:
Для облегчения нашего Сервиса;
Для предоставления Сервиса от нашего имени;
Для оказания услуг, связанных с Сервисом; или же
Чтобы помочь нам в анализе использования нашего Сервиса.
Я хочу проинформировать пользователей этого Сервиса о том, что эти третьи стороны имеют доступ к вашей Личной информации. Причина в том, чтобы выполнять поставленные перед ними задачи от нашего имени. Однако они обязаны не раскрывать и не использовать информацию для каких-либо других целей.
Мы можем использовать Smartlook, аналитическое решение. Smartlook может записывать: посещенные экраны, шаблоны взаимодействия (например, действия на экране, жесты: касания, прокрутки) и сведения об устройстве (тип, версия, модель, операционная система). Мы используем информацию, собранную Smartlook, для улучшения нашего приложения.
Smartlook не собирает личную информацию и не отслеживает ваши привычки просмотра в приложениях.
Реклама
Наше приложение использует Appodeal для медиапосредничества и монетизации рекламы. Appodeal собирает определенные данные, включая ваш IP-адрес и рекламный идентификатор, для показа персонализированной и неперсонализированной рекламы. Вы можете ознакомиться с политикой конфиденциальности Appodeal здесь:
Политика конфиденциальности Appodeal
.
Безопасность
Я ценю ваше доверие к предоставлению нам вашей личной информации, поэтому мы стремимся использовать коммерчески приемлемые средства ее защиты. Но помните, что ни один метод передачи через Интернет или метод электронного хранения не является на 100% безопасным и надежным, и я не могу гарантировать его абсолютную безопасность.
Ссылки на другие сайты
Этот Сервис может содержать ссылки на другие сайты. Если вы нажмете на стороннюю ссылку, вы будете перенаправлены на этот сайт. Обратите внимание, что этими внешними сайтами я не управляю. Поэтому я настоятельно рекомендую вам ознакомиться с Политикой конфиденциальности этих веб-сайтов. Я не контролирую и не несу ответственности за контент, политику конфиденциальности или действия любых сторонних сайтов или служб.
Конфиденциальность детей
Эти Услуги не предназначены для лиц младше 13 лет. Я сознательно не собираю личную информацию от детей младше 13 лет. В случае, если я обнаруживаю, что ребенок младше 13 лет предоставил мне личную информацию, я немедленно удаляю ее с наших серверов. Если вы являетесь родителем или опекуном и знаете, что ваш ребенок предоставил нам личную информацию, свяжитесь со мной, чтобы я мог предпринять необходимые действия.
Изменения в настоящей Политике конфиденциальности
Я могу время от времени обновлять нашу Политику конфиденциальности. Таким образом, вам рекомендуется периодически просматривать эту страницу на предмет изменений. Я сообщу вам о любых изменениях, разместив новую Политику конфиденциальности на этой странице.
Свяжитесь с нами
Если у вас есть какие-либо вопросы или предложения относительно моей Политики конфиденциальности, не стесняйтесь обращаться ко мне по адресу enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Українська
Артур Колесников створив додаток як Freemium-додаток. Ця ПОСЛУГА надається Артуром Колесниковим безкоштовно і призначена для використання «як є».
Ця сторінка використовується для інформування відвідувачів про мою політику щодо збору, використання та розкриття Особистої інформації, якщо хтось вирішить скористатися моєю Послугою.
Якщо ви вирішите використовувати мою Послугу, ви погоджуєтеся на збір і використання інформації відповідно до цієї політики. Особиста інформація, яку я збираю, використовується для надання та покращення Сервісу. Я не буду використовувати чи передавати вашу інформацію кому-небудь, окрім випадків, описаних у цій Політиці конфіденційності.
Терміни, що використовуються в цій Політиці конфіденційності, мають те саме значення, що і в наших Положеннях та умовах, які доступні в додатку, якщо інше не визначено в цій Політиці конфіденційності.
Збір та використання інформації
Для кращого досвіду при використанні нашого Сервісу я можу попросити вас надати певну особисту інформацію. Інформація, яку я запитую, зберігатиметься на вашому пристрої і не буде збиратися мною будь-яким чином.
Журнальні дані
Я хочу повідомити вас, що щоразу, коли ви використовуєте мою Послугу, у разі помилки в додатку я збираю дані та інформацію (через сторонні продукти) на вашому телефоні, які називаються журнальними даними. Ці журнальні дані можуть містити таку інформацію, як IP-адреса вашого пристрою, ім’я пристрою, версія операційної системи, конфігурація додатка під час використання моєї Послуги, час і дата використання Послуги та інші статистичні дані.
Файли cookie
Файли cookie – це файли з невеликим обсягом даних, які зазвичай використовуються як анонімні унікальні ідентифікатори. Вони надсилаються у ваш браузер із веб-сайтів, які ви відвідуєте, і зберігаються у внутрішній пам’яті вашого пристрою.
Ця Послуга не використовує ці «cookie» безпосередньо. Однак додаток може використовувати сторонній код і бібліотеки, які використовують файли cookie для збору інформації та покращення своїх послуг. У вас є можливість прийняти або відхилити ці файли cookie та дізнатися, коли файл cookie надсилається на ваш пристрій. Якщо ви вирішите відмовитися від наших файлів cookie, можливо, ви не зможете використовувати деякі частини цієї Послуги.
Постачальники послуг
Я можу залучати сторонні компанії та приватних осіб з таких причин:
• Для полегшення роботи нашого Сервісу;
• Для надання Сервісу від нашого імені;
• Для виконання пов’язаних із Сервісом послуг; або
• Для допомоги в аналізі використання нашого Сервісу.
Я хочу повідомити користувачів цього Сервісу, що ці треті сторони мають доступ до вашої Особистої інформації. Це необхідно для виконання ними поставлених перед ними завдань від нашого імені. Однак вони зобов’язані не розголошувати та не використовувати інформацію для будь-яких інших цілей.
Ми можемо використовувати Smartlook, аналітичне рішення. Smartlook може записувати: відвідані екрани, шаблони взаємодії (наприклад, дії на екрані, жести: торкання, прокручування) та дані про пристрій (тип, версія, модель, операційна система). Ми використовуємо інформацію, зібрану Smartlook, для покращення нашого додатка.
Smartlook не збирає особисту інформацію і не відстежує ваші звички перегляду в додатках.
Реклама
Наш додаток використовує Appodeal для медіації реклами та монетизації. Appodeal збирає певні дані, зокрема вашу IP-адресу та рекламний ідентифікатор, для показу персоналізованої та неперсоналізованої реклами. Ви можете переглянути політику конфіденційності Appodeal тут:
Політика конфіденційності Appodeal
.
Безпека
Я ціную вашу довіру до надання нам вашої особистої інформації, тому ми прагнемо використовувати комерційно прийнятні засоби для її захисту. Але пам’ятайте, що жоден метод передавання через Інтернет або метод електронного зберігання не є на 100% безпечним і надійним, і я не можу гарантувати абсолютну безпеку.
Посилання на інші сайти
Ця Послуга може містити посилання на інші сайти. Якщо ви натиснете на стороннє посилання, ви будете перенаправлені на цей сайт. Зверніть увагу, що я не керую цими зовнішніми сайтами. Тому я настійно рекомендую вам ознайомитися з Політикою конфіденційності цих веб-сайтів. Я не контролюю та не несу відповідальності за зміст, політику конфіденційності або дії будь-яких сторонніх сайтів чи сервісів.
Конфіденційність дітей
Ця Послуга не призначена для осіб віком до 13 років. Я свідомо не збираю особисту інформацію від дітей молодше 13 років. У разі виявлення, що дитина молодше 13 років надала мені особисту інформацію, я негайно видаляю її з наших серверів. Якщо ви є батьком або опікуном і знаєте, що ваша дитина надала нам особисту інформацію, зв’яжіться зі мною, щоб я міг вжити необхідних заходів.
Зміни в цій Політиці конфіденційності
Я можу час від часу оновлювати нашу Політику конфіденційності. Таким чином, вам рекомендується періодично переглядати цю сторінку на предмет змін. Я повідомлю вам про будь-які зміни, розмістивши нову Політику конфіденційності на цій сторінці.
Зв’яжіться з нами
Якщо у вас є будь-які запитання або пропозиції щодо моєї Політики конфіденційності, не соромтеся звертатися до мене за адресою enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Italian
Politica sulla riservatezza
Artur Kolesnykov ha creato l’app come app Freemium. Questo SERVIZIO è fornito da Artur Kolesnykov senza alcun costo ed è inteso per l’uso così com’è.
Questa pagina viene utilizzata per informare i visitatori in merito alle mie politiche con la raccolta, l’uso e la divulgazione delle informazioni personali se qualcuno decide di utilizzare il mio servizio.
Se scegli di utilizzare il mio servizio, accetti la raccolta e l’uso delle informazioni in relazione a questa politica. Le informazioni personali che raccolgo vengono utilizzate per fornire e migliorare il servizio. Non userò o condividerò le tue informazioni con nessuno tranne come descritto nella presente Informativa sulla privacy.
I termini utilizzati nella presente Informativa sulla privacy hanno lo stesso significato dei nostri Termini e condizioni, accessibili dall’app se non diversamente definito nella presente Informativa sulla privacy.
Raccolta e utilizzo delle informazioni
Per una migliore esperienza, durante l’utilizzo del nostro Servizio, potrei chiederti di fornirci alcune informazioni di identificazione personale. Le informazioni che richiedo verranno conservate sul tuo dispositivo e non verranno raccolte da me in alcun modo.
Dati di registro
Voglio informarti che ogni volta che utilizzi il mio Servizio, in caso di errore nell’app raccolgo dati e informazioni (tramite prodotti di terze parti) sul tuo telefono chiamati Log Data. Questi dati di registro possono includere informazioni come l’indirizzo del protocollo Internet («IP») del dispositivo, il nome del dispositivo, la versione del sistema operativo, la configurazione dell’app quando si utilizza il mio servizio, l’ora e la data di utilizzo del servizio e altre statistiche .
Biscotti
I cookie sono file con una piccola quantità di dati che vengono comunemente utilizzati come identificatori univoci anonimi. Questi vengono inviati al tuo browser dai siti web che visiti e vengono memorizzati nella memoria interna del tuo dispositivo.
Questo servizio non utilizza questi «cookie» esplicitamente. Tuttavia, l’app può utilizzare codice e librerie di terze parti che utilizzano «cookie» per raccogliere informazioni e migliorare i propri servizi. Hai la possibilità di accettare o rifiutare questi cookie e sapere quando un cookie viene inviato al tuo dispositivo. Se scegli di rifiutare i nostri cookie, potresti non essere in grado di utilizzare alcune parti di questo servizio.
Fornitori di servizi
Posso assumere società e individui di terze parti per i seguenti motivi:
Per facilitare il nostro servizio;
Per fornire il Servizio per nostro conto;
Per eseguire servizi relativi ai servizi; o
Per aiutarci ad analizzare come viene utilizzato il nostro Servizio.
Voglio informare gli utenti di questo servizio che queste terze parti hanno accesso alle tue informazioni personali. Il motivo è eseguire i compiti loro assegnati per nostro conto. Tuttavia, sono obbligati a non divulgare o utilizzare le informazioni per nessun altro scopo.
Possiamo utilizzare Smartlook, che è una soluzione di analisi. Smartlook può registrare: schermate visitate, modelli di interazione (come azioni sullo schermo, gesti: tocchi, scorre) e dettagli del dispositivo (tipo, versione, modello, sistema operativo). Stiamo utilizzando le informazioni raccolte da Smartlook per migliorare la nostra app.
Smartlook non raccoglie informazioni di identificazione personale e non tiene traccia delle tue abitudini di navigazione tra le app.
Pubblicità
La nostra app utilizza Appodeal per la mediazione e la monetizzazione degli annunci. Appodeal raccoglie alcuni dati, tra cui il tuo indirizzo IP e l’ID pubblicitario, per fornire annunci personalizzati e non personalizzati. Puoi consultare l’informativa sulla privacy di Appodeal qui:
Informativa sulla Privacy di Appodeal
.
Sicurezza
Apprezzo la tua fiducia nel fornirci le tue informazioni personali, quindi ci sforziamo di utilizzare mezzi commercialmente accettabili per proteggerle. Ma ricorda che nessun metodo di trasmissione su Internet o metodo di archiviazione elettronica è sicuro e affidabile al 100% e non posso garantirne l’assoluta sicurezza.
Collegamenti ad altri siti
Questo servizio può contenere collegamenti ad altri siti. Se fai clic su un collegamento di terze parti, verrai indirizzato a quel sito. Tieni presente che questi siti esterni non sono gestiti da me. Pertanto, ti consiglio vivamente di rivedere l’Informativa sulla privacy di questi siti Web. Non ho alcun controllo e non mi assumo alcuna responsabilità per il contenuto, le politiche sulla privacy o le pratiche di qualsiasi sito o servizio di terze parti.
Privacy dei minori
Questi Servizi non sono rivolti a persone di età inferiore ai 13 anni. Non raccolgo consapevolmente informazioni di identificazione personale da bambini di età inferiore a 13 anni. Nel caso in cui scopro che un bambino di età inferiore a 13 anni mi ha fornito informazioni personali, le cancello immediatamente dai nostri server. Se sei un genitore o un tutore e sei consapevole del fatto che tuo figlio ci ha fornito informazioni personali, contattami in modo che possa eseguire le azioni necessarie.
Modifiche alla presente informativa sulla privacy
Potrei aggiornare la nostra politica sulla privacy di volta in volta. Pertanto, si consiglia di rivedere periodicamente questa pagina per eventuali modifiche. Ti informerò di eventuali modifiche pubblicando la nuova Informativa sulla privacy in questa pagina.
Contattaci
Se hai domande o suggerimenti sulla mia politica sulla privacy, non esitare a contattarmi a enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
France
Politique de confidentialité
Artur Kolesnykov a construit l’application en tant qu’application Freemium. Ce SERVICE est fourni par Artur Kolesnykov sans frais et est destiné à être utilisé tel quel.
Cette page est utilisée pour informer les visiteurs de mes politiques en matière de collecte, d’utilisation et de divulgation de renseignements personnels si quelqu’un décide d’utiliser mon service.
Si vous choisissez d’utiliser mon service, vous acceptez la collecte et l’utilisation des informations relatives à cette politique. Les informations personnelles que je recueille sont utilisées pour fournir et améliorer le service. Je n’utiliserai ni ne partagerai vos informations avec qui que ce soit, sauf dans les cas décrits dans la présente politique de confidentialité.
Les termes utilisés dans cette politique de confidentialité ont la même signification que dans nos conditions générales, qui sont accessibles sur l’application, sauf indication contraire dans la présente politique de confidentialité.
Collecte et utilisation des informations
Pour une meilleure expérience, lors de l’utilisation de notre service, je peux vous demander de nous fournir certaines informations personnellement identifiables. Les informations que je demande seront conservées sur votre appareil et ne seront en aucun cas collectées par moi.
Données du journal
Je tiens à vous informer que chaque fois que vous utilisez mon Service, en cas d’erreur dans l’application, je collecte des données et des informations (via des produits tiers) sur votre téléphone appelées Données de journal. Ces données de journal peuvent inclure des informations telles que l’adresse IP (Internet Protocol) de votre appareil, le nom de l’appareil, la version du système d’exploitation, la configuration de l’application lors de l’utilisation de mon service, l’heure et la date de votre utilisation du service et d’autres statistiques. .
Biscuits
Les cookies sont des fichiers contenant une petite quantité de données qui sont couramment utilisés comme identifiants uniques anonymes. Ceux-ci sont envoyés à votre navigateur à partir des sites Web que vous visitez et sont stockés dans la mémoire interne de votre appareil.
Ce service n’utilise pas ces «cookies» de manière explicite. Cependant, l’application peut utiliser du code tiers et des bibliothèques qui utilisent des «cookies» pour collecter des informations et améliorer leurs services. Vous avez la possibilité d’accepter ou de refuser ces cookies et de savoir quand un cookie est envoyé à votre appareil. Si vous choisissez de refuser nos cookies, vous ne pourrez peut-être pas utiliser certaines parties de ce service.
Les fournisseurs de services
Je peux employer des sociétés tierces et des particuliers pour les raisons suivantes:
Pour faciliter notre service;
Pour fournir le service en notre nom;
Pour effectuer des services liés au service; ou alors
Pour nous aider à analyser la manière dont notre service est utilisé.
Je souhaite informer les utilisateurs de ce service que ces tiers ont accès à vos informations personnelles. La raison est d’accomplir les tâches qui leur sont confiées en notre nom. Cependant, ils sont tenus de ne pas divulguer ni utiliser les informations à d’autres fins.
Nous pouvons utiliser Smartlook, qui est une solution d’analyse. Smartlook peut enregistrer: les écrans visités, les modèles d’interaction (tels que les actions sur l’écran, les gestes: tapotements, défilement) et les détails de l’appareil (type, version, modèle, système d’exploitation). Nous utilisons les informations collectées par Smartlook pour améliorer notre application.
Smartlook ne collecte pas d’informations personnellement identifiables et ne suit pas vos habitudes de navigation dans les applications.
Publicité
Notre application utilise Appodeal pour la médiation et la monétisation des annonces. Appodeal collecte certaines données, y compris votre adresse IP et votre identifiant publicitaire, afin de diffuser des annonces personnalisées et non personnalisées. Vous pouvez consulter la politique de confidentialité d’Appodeal ici :
Politique de Confidentialité d’Appodeal
.
Sécurité
J’apprécie votre confiance en nous fournissant vos informations personnelles, c’est pourquoi nous nous efforçons d’utiliser des moyens commercialement acceptables pour les protéger. Mais rappelez-vous qu’aucune méthode de transmission sur Internet, ni aucune méthode de stockage électronique n’est sûre et fiable à 100%, et je ne peux pas garantir sa sécurité absolue.
Liens vers d’autres sites
Ce service peut contenir des liens vers d’autres sites. Si vous cliquez sur un lien tiers, vous serez dirigé vers ce site. Notez que ces sites externes ne sont pas exploités par moi. Par conséquent, je vous conseille vivement de consulter la politique de confidentialité de ces sites Web. Je n’ai aucun contrôle et n’assume aucune responsabilité pour le contenu, les politiques de confidentialité ou les pratiques de tout site ou service tiers.
Confidentialité des enfants
Ces Services ne s’adressent à personne de moins de 13 ans. Je ne collecte pas sciemment des informations personnellement identifiables d’enfants de moins de 13 ans. Si je découvre qu’un enfant de moins de 13 ans m’a fourni des informations personnelles, je les supprime immédiatement de nos serveurs. Si vous êtes un parent ou un tuteur et que vous savez que votre enfant nous a fourni des informations personnelles, veuillez me contacter afin que je puisse faire les actions nécessaires.
Modifications de cette politique de confidentialité
Je peux mettre à jour notre politique de confidentialité de temps à autre. Ainsi, il vous est conseillé de revoir cette page périodiquement pour tout changement. Je vous informerai de tout changement en publiant la nouvelle politique de confidentialité sur cette page.
Nous contacter
Si vous avez des questions ou des suggestions concernant ma politique de confidentialité, n’hésitez pas à me contacter à enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Spain
Política de privacidad
Artur Kolesnykov creó la aplicación como una aplicación Freemium. Este SERVICIO es proporcionado por Artur Kolesnykov sin costo y está diseñado para usarse tal cual.
Esta página se utiliza para informar a los visitantes sobre mis políticas con la recopilación, el uso y la divulgación de Información personal si alguien decide utilizar mi Servicio.
Si elige utilizar mi Servicio, entonces acepta la recopilación y el uso de información en relación con esta política. La información personal que recopilo se utiliza para proporcionar y mejorar el servicio. No usaré ni compartiré su información con nadie excepto como se describe en esta Política de Privacidad.
Los términos utilizados en esta Política de privacidad tienen el mismo significado que en nuestros Términos y condiciones, a los que se puede acceder en la aplicación a menos que se defina lo contrario en esta Política de privacidad.
Recopilación y uso de información
Para una mejor experiencia, mientras utiliza nuestro Servicio, es posible que le pida que nos proporcione cierta información de identificación personal. La información que solicito se conservará en su dispositivo y no la recopilaré de ninguna manera.
Dato de registro
Quiero informarle que cada vez que utiliza mi Servicio, en caso de error en la aplicación, recopilo datos e información (a través de productos de terceros) en su teléfono llamado Datos de registro. Estos Datos de registro pueden incluir información como la dirección de Protocolo de Internet («IP») de su dispositivo, el nombre del dispositivo, la versión del sistema operativo, la configuración de la aplicación cuando utiliza mi Servicio, la hora y fecha de su uso del Servicio y otras estadísticas. .
Galletas
Las cookies son archivos con una pequeña cantidad de datos que se utilizan comúnmente como identificadores únicos anónimos. Estos se envían a su navegador desde los sitios web que visita y se almacenan en la memoria interna de su dispositivo.
Este Servicio no utiliza estas «cookies» explícitamente. Sin embargo, la aplicación puede utilizar códigos de terceros y bibliotecas que utilizan «cookies» para recopilar información y mejorar sus servicios. Tiene la opción de aceptar o rechazar estas cookies y saber cuándo se envía una cookie a su dispositivo. Si opta por rechazar nuestras cookies, es posible que no pueda utilizar algunas partes de este Servicio.
Proveedores de servicio
Puedo emplear empresas e individuos de terceros por las siguientes razones:
Para facilitar nuestro Servicio;
Para proporcionar el Servicio en nuestro nombre;
Para realizar servicios relacionados con el Servicio; o
Para ayudarnos a analizar cómo se utiliza nuestro Servicio.
Quiero informar a los usuarios de este Servicio que estos terceros tienen acceso a su Información personal. El motivo es realizar las tareas que se les asignen en nuestro nombre. Sin embargo, están obligados a no divulgar ni utilizar la información para ningún otro propósito.
Podemos utilizar Smartlook, que es una solución de análisis. Smartlook puede registrar: pantallas visitadas, patrones de interacción (como acciones de pantalla, gestos: toques, desplazamientos) y detalles del dispositivo (tipo, versión, modelo, sistema operativo). Utilizamos la información recopilada por Smartlook para mejorar nuestra aplicación.
Smartlook no recopila información de identificación personal y no rastrea sus hábitos de navegación en las aplicaciones.
Publicidad
Nuestra aplicación utiliza Appodeal para la mediación y monetización de anuncios. Appodeal recopila ciertos datos, incluida tu dirección IP y el ID de publicidad, para mostrar anuncios personalizados y no personalizados. Puedes revisar la política de privacidad de Appodeal aquí:
Política de Privacidad de Appodeal
.
Seguridad
Valoro su confianza al proporcionarnos su información personal, por lo que nos esforzamos por utilizar medios comercialmente aceptables para protegerla. Pero recuerde que ningún método de transmisión a través de Internet o método de almacenamiento electrónico es 100% seguro y confiable, y no puedo garantizar su absoluta seguridad.
Enlaces a otros sitios
Este Servicio puede contener enlaces a otros sitios. Si hace clic en un enlace de un tercero, se le dirigirá a ese sitio. Tenga en cuenta que estos sitios externos no son operados por mí. Por lo tanto, le recomiendo encarecidamente que revise la Política de privacidad de estos sitios web. No tengo control ni asumo ninguna responsabilidad por el contenido, las políticas de privacidad o las prácticas de los sitios o servicios de terceros.
Privacidad de los niños
Estos Servicios no se dirigen a nadie menor de 13 años. No recopilo a sabiendas información de identificación personal de niños menores de 13 años. En caso de que descubra que un niño menor de 13 años me ha proporcionado información personal, la elimino inmediatamente de nuestros servidores. Si usted es un padre o tutor y sabe que su hijo nos ha proporcionado información personal, comuníquese conmigo para que pueda realizar las acciones necesarias.
Cambios a esta política de privacidad
Puedo actualizar nuestra Política de privacidad de vez en cuando. Por lo tanto, le recomendamos que revise esta página periódicamente para ver si hay cambios. Le notificaré cualquier cambio publicando la nueva Política de privacidad en esta página.
Contáctenos
Si tiene alguna pregunta o sugerencia sobre mi Política de privacidad, no dude en ponerse en contacto conmigo en enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Turkish
Gizlilik Politikası
Artur Kolesnykov, uygulamayı bir Freemium uygulaması olarak oluşturdu. Bu HİZMET, Artur Kolesnykov tarafından ücretsiz olarak sağlanmaktadır ve olduğu gibi kullanılması amaçlanmıştır.
Bu sayfa, herhangi biri Hizmetimi kullanmaya karar verirse, Kişisel Bilgilerin toplanması, kullanılması ve ifşa edilmesiyle ilgili politikalarım hakkında ziyaretçileri bilgilendirmek için kullanılır.
Hizmetimi kullanmayı seçerseniz, bu politikayla ilgili bilgilerin toplanmasını ve kullanılmasını kabul etmiş olursunuz. Topladığım Kişisel Bilgiler, Hizmeti sağlamak ve geliştirmek için kullanılır. Bilgilerinizi bu Gizlilik Politikasında açıklananlar dışında kullanmayacağım veya kimseyle paylaşmayacağım.
Bu Gizlilik Politikasında kullanılan terimler, bu Gizlilik Politikasında aksi belirtilmedikçe, uygulamada erişilebilen Hüküm ve Koşullarımızdakiyle aynı anlamlara sahiptir.
Bilgi Toplama ve Kullanım
Daha iyi bir deneyim için Hizmetimizi kullanırken, bize kişisel olarak tanımlanabilir bazı bilgiler vermenizi isteyebilirim. İstediğim bilgiler cihazınızda tutulacak ve hiçbir şekilde tarafımdan toplanmayacaktır.
Günlük Verileri
Hizmetimi her kullandığınızda, uygulamada bir hata olması durumunda, telefonunuzdaki Log Data adlı veri ve bilgileri (üçüncü taraf ürünler aracılığıyla) topladığımı size bildirmek isterim. Bu Günlük Verileri, cihazınızın İnternet Protokolü (“IP”) adresi, cihaz adı, işletim sistemi sürümü, Hizmetimi kullanırken uygulamanın yapılandırması, Hizmeti kullanımınızın saati ve tarihi ve diğer istatistikler gibi bilgileri içerebilir. .
Kurabiye
Çerezler, genellikle anonim benzersiz tanımlayıcılar olarak kullanılan az miktarda veri içeren dosyalardır. Bunlar, ziyaret ettiğiniz web sitelerinden tarayıcınıza gönderilir ve cihazınızın dahili hafızasında saklanır.
Bu Hizmet, bu «çerezleri» açıkça kullanmaz. Ancak uygulama, bilgi toplamak ve hizmetlerini iyileştirmek için üçüncü taraf kodu ve «çerezler» kullanan kitaplıklar kullanabilir. Bu tanımlama bilgilerini kabul etme veya reddetme seçeneğine sahipsiniz ve cihazınıza bir tanımlama bilgisinin ne zaman gönderildiğini bilirsiniz. Çerezlerimizi reddetmeyi seçerseniz, bu Hizmetin bazı kısımlarını kullanamayabilirsiniz.
Servis sağlayıcıları
Aşağıdaki nedenlerden dolayı üçüncü taraf şirketleri ve bireyleri istihdam edebilirim:
Hizmetimizi kolaylaştırmak için;
Hizmeti bizim adımıza sağlamak için;
Hizmetle ilgili hizmetleri gerçekleştirmek için; veya
Hizmetimizin nasıl kullanıldığını analiz etmemize yardımcı olmak için.
Bu Hizmetin kullanıcılarını, bu üçüncü tarafların Kişisel Bilgilerinize erişimi olduğu konusunda bilgilendirmek istiyorum. Sebebi ise kendilerine verilen görevleri bizim adımıza yerine getirmektir. Ancak, bilgileri başka bir amaçla açıklamamak veya kullanmamakla yükümlüdürler.
Bir analitik çözümü olan Smartlook’u kullanabiliriz. Smartlook şunları kaydedebilir: Ziyaret edilen ekranlar, Etkileşim kalıpları (ekran eylemleri, hareketler: dokunmalar, kaydırmalar) ve Cihaz ayrıntıları (Tür, Sürüm, Model, İşletim Sistemi). Uygulamamızı geliştirmek için Smartlook tarafından toplanan bilgileri kullanıyoruz.
Smartlook, kişisel olarak tanımlanabilir bilgileri toplamaz ve uygulamalar arasında gezinme alışkanlıklarınızı izlemez.
Reklamcılık
Uygulamamız, reklam aracılığı ve para kazanma için Appodeal kullanır. Appodeal, kişiselleştirilmiş ve kişiselleştirilmemiş reklamlar sunmak amacıyla IP adresiniz ve reklam kimliğiniz de dahil olmak üzere belirli verileri toplar. Appodeal’in gizlilik politikasını buradan inceleyebilirsiniz:
Appodeal Gizlilik Politikası
.
Güvenlik
Bize Kişisel Bilgilerinizi sağlama konusundaki güveninize değer veriyorum, bu nedenle ticari olarak kabul edilebilir koruma yöntemlerini kullanmaya çalışıyoruz. Ancak internet üzerinden hiçbir aktarım yönteminin veya elektronik depolama yönteminin %100 güvenli ve güvenilir olmadığını ve mutlak güvenliğini garanti edemediğimi unutmayın.
Diğer Sitelere Bağlantılar
Bu Hizmet, diğer sitelere bağlantılar içerebilir. Üçüncü taraf bir bağlantıya tıklarsanız, o siteye yönlendirilirsiniz. Bu harici sitelerin benim tarafımdan işletilmediğini unutmayın. Bu nedenle, bu web sitelerinin Gizlilik Politikasını incelemenizi şiddetle tavsiye ederim. Herhangi bir üçüncü taraf site veya hizmetin içeriği, gizlilik politikaları veya uygulamaları üzerinde hiçbir kontrolüm ve sorumluluğum yoktur.
Çocukların Gizliliği
Bu Hizmetler 13 yaşın altındaki hiç kimseye hitap etmez. 13 yaşın altındaki çocuklardan bilerek kişisel olarak tanımlanabilir bilgiler toplamıyorum. 13 yaşın altındaki bir çocuğun bana kişisel bilgiler verdiğini keşfetmem durumunda, bunu sunucularımızdan derhal silerim. Ebeveyn veya vasi iseniz ve çocuğunuzun bize kişisel bilgiler verdiğini biliyorsanız, gerekli işlemleri yapabilmem için lütfen benimle iletişime geçin.
Bu Gizlilik Politikasındaki Değişiklikler
Gizlilik Politikamızı zaman zaman güncelleyebilirim. Bu nedenle, herhangi bir değişiklik için bu sayfayı periyodik olarak gözden geçirmeniz önerilir. Bu sayfada yeni Gizlilik Politikasını yayınlayarak herhangi bir değişiklik hakkında sizi bilgilendireceğim.
Bizimle iletişime geçin
Gizlilik Politikam hakkında herhangi bir sorunuz veya öneriniz varsa, enzoapps.info@gmail.com adresinden benimle iletişime geçmekten çekinmeyin.
Danish
Fortrolighedspolitik
Artur Kolesnykov byggede appen som en Freemium -app. Denne SERVICE leveres gratis af Artur Kolesnykov og er beregnet til brug som den er.
Denne side bruges til at informere besøgende om mine politikker med indsamling, brug og videregivelse af personlige oplysninger, hvis nogen besluttede at bruge min service.
Hvis du vælger at bruge min service, accepterer du indsamling og brug af oplysninger i forhold til denne politik. De personlige oplysninger, som jeg indsamler, bruges til at levere og forbedre tjenesten. Jeg vil ikke bruge eller dele dine oplysninger med nogen, undtagen som beskrevet i denne fortrolighedspolitik.
De udtryk, der bruges i denne fortrolighedspolitik, har de samme betydninger som i vores vilkår og betingelser, som er tilgængelige i appen, medmindre andet er defineret i denne fortrolighedspolitik.
Informationsindsamling og brug
For en bedre oplevelse, mens du bruger vores service, kan jeg kræve, at du giver os visse personligt identificerbare oplysninger. De oplysninger, jeg anmoder om, opbevares på din enhed og indsamles ikke på nogen måde af mig.
Logdata
Jeg vil gerne informere dig om, at hver gang du bruger min service, i tilfælde af en fejl i appen indsamler jeg data og oplysninger (via tredjepartsprodukter) på din telefon kaldet Log Data. Disse logdata kan indeholde oplysninger som f.eks. Din enheds internetprotokol («IP») adresse, enhedsnavn, operativsystemversion, konfiguration af appen ved brug af min service, tidspunkt og dato for din brug af tjenesten og anden statistik .
Cookies
Cookies er filer med en lille mængde data, der normalt bruges som anonyme unikke identifikatorer. Disse sendes til din browser fra de websteder, du besøger, og gemmes i din enheds interne hukommelse.
Denne service bruger ikke disse «cookies» eksplicit. App’en kan dog bruge tredjepartskode og biblioteker, der bruger «cookies» til at indsamle oplysninger og forbedre deres tjenester. Du har mulighed for enten at acceptere eller afvise disse cookies og vide, hvornår en cookie sendes til din enhed. Hvis du vælger at nægte vores cookies, kan du muligvis ikke bruge nogle dele af denne service.
Service-udøvere
Jeg kan ansætte tredjepartsvirksomheder og enkeltpersoner af følgende årsager:
For at lette vores service;
At levere tjenesten på vores vegne;
At udføre service-relaterede tjenester; eller
For at hjælpe os med at analysere, hvordan vores service bruges.
Jeg vil informere brugere af denne service om, at disse tredjeparter har adgang til dine personlige oplysninger. Årsagen er at udføre de opgaver, der er tildelt dem på vores vegne. De er dog forpligtet til ikke at videregive eller bruge oplysningerne til andre formål.
Vi kan bruge Smartlook, som er en analyseløsning. Smartlook kan registrere: Besøgte skærme, Interaktionsmønstre (såsom skærmhandlinger, gestus: tryk, ruller) og Enhedsoplysninger (Type, Version, Model, Operativsystem). Vi bruger de oplysninger, der er indsamlet af Smartlook til at forbedre vores app.
Smartlook indsamler ikke personligt identificerbare oplysninger og sporer ikke dine browservaner på tværs af apps.
Sikkerhed
Jeg værdsætter din tillid til at give os dine personlige oplysninger, og derfor bestræber vi os på at bruge kommercielt acceptable midler til at beskytte dem. Men husk, at ingen overførselsmetode over internettet eller elektronisk lagringsmetode er 100% sikker og pålidelig, og jeg kan ikke garantere dens absolutte sikkerhed.
Links til andre websteder
Denne service kan indeholde links til andre websteder. Hvis du klikker på et tredjepartslink, bliver du dirigeret til dette websted. Bemærk, at disse eksterne websteder ikke drives af mig. Derfor råder jeg dig kraftigt til at gennemgå disse websteders fortrolighedspolitik. Jeg har ingen kontrol over og påtager mig intet ansvar for indhold, fortrolighedspolitikker eller praksis på tredjepartswebsteder eller -tjenester.
Børns privatliv
Disse tjenester henvender sig ikke til nogen under 13 år. Jeg indsamler ikke bevidst personlige identificerbare oplysninger fra børn under 13. I tilfælde af at jeg opdager, at et barn under 13 år har givet mig personlige oplysninger, sletter jeg det straks fra vores servere. Hvis du er forælder eller værge, og du er klar over, at dit barn har givet os personlige oplysninger, bedes du kontakte mig, så jeg kan foretage de nødvendige handlinger.
Ændringer af denne fortrolighedspolitik
Jeg kan fra tid til anden opdatere vores fortrolighedspolitik. Derfor rådes du til at gennemgå denne side med jævne mellemrum for eventuelle ændringer. Jeg giver dig besked om eventuelle ændringer ved at sende den nye fortrolighedspolitik på denne side.
Kontakt os
Hvis du har spørgsmål eller forslag til min fortrolighedspolitik, tøv ikke med at kontakte mig på enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Finnish
Tietosuojakäytäntö
Artur Kolesnykov rakensi sovelluksen Freemium -sovellukseksi. Tämän PALVELUN tarjoaa Artur Kolesnykov ilmaiseksi ja se on tarkoitettu käytettäväksi sellaisenaan.
Tätä sivua käytetään informoimaan kävijöitä käytännöistäni, jotka koskevat henkilökohtaisten tietojen keräämistä, käyttöä ja paljastamista, jos joku päätti käyttää palveluani.
Jos päätät käyttää Palveluani, hyväksyt tämän käytännön mukaisten tietojen keräämisen ja käytön. Keräämiäni henkilötietoja käytetään Palvelun tarjoamiseen ja parantamiseen. En käytä tai jaa tietojasi kenellekään muulle kuin tässä tietosuojakäytännössä kuvatulla tavalla.
Tässä tietosuojakäytännössä käytetyillä termeillä on samat merkitykset kuin käyttöehdoissamme, jotka ovat saatavilla sovelluksessa, ellei tässä tietosuojakäytännössä toisin määritetä.
Tietojen kerääminen ja käyttö
Paremman kokemuksen saamiseksi voin käyttää Palveluamme käyttäessäsi sinua antamaan meille tiettyjä henkilötietoja. Pyydetyt tiedot säilytetään laitteellasi, enkä kerää niitä millään tavalla.
Lokitiedot
Haluan ilmoittaa teille, että aina kun käytät Palveluani, kerään sovelluksen virheen sattuessa tietoja ja tietoja (kolmannen osapuolen tuotteiden kautta) puhelimeesi nimeltä Lokitiedot. Nämä lokitiedot voivat sisältää tietoja, kuten laitteen Internet -yhteyskäytännön (”IP”) osoitteen, laitteen nimen, käyttöjärjestelmän version, sovelluksen kokoonpanon Palvelua käytettäessä, Palvelun käytön kellonajan ja päivämäärän sekä muita tilastoja .
Keksit
Evästeet ovat tiedostoja, joissa on pieni määrä dataa ja joita käytetään yleisesti nimettöminä yksilöllisinä tunnisteina. Nämä lähetetään selaimeesi vierailluilta sivustoilta ja tallennetaan laitteen sisäiseen muistiin.
Tämä palvelu ei käytä näitä «evästeitä» nimenomaisesti. Sovellus voi kuitenkin käyttää kolmannen osapuolen koodia ja evästeitä käyttäviä kirjastoja tietojen keräämiseen ja palvelujensa parantamiseen. Sinulla on mahdollisuus joko hyväksyä tai hylätä nämä evästeet ja tietää, milloin eväste lähetetään laitteellesi. Jos päätät kieltäytyä evästeistämme, et ehkä voi käyttää joitakin tämän palvelun osia.
Palveluntarjoajat
Voin palkata kolmannen osapuolen yrityksiä ja yksityishenkilöitä seuraavista syistä:
Palvelumme helpottamiseksi;
Palvelun tarjoamiseksi puolestamme;
Palveluihin liittyvien palvelujen suorittaminen tai
Auttaa meitä analysoimaan Palvelumme käyttöä.
Haluan ilmoittaa tämän palvelun käyttäjille, että näillä kolmansilla osapuolilla on pääsy henkilötietoihisi. Syynä on suorittaa heille annetut tehtävät puolestamme. He ovat kuitenkin velvollisia olemaan paljastamatta tai käyttämättä tietoja mihinkään muuhun tarkoitukseen.
Voimme käyttää Smartlookia, joka on analytiikkaratkaisu. Smartlook voi tallentaa: näytöt, jotka on käyty, vuorovaikutuskuviot (kuten näytön toiminnot, eleet: napautukset, vieritykset) ja laitteen tiedot (tyyppi, versio, malli, käyttöjärjestelmä). Käytämme Smartlookin keräämiä tietoja sovelluksemme parantamiseen.
Smartlook ei kerää henkilökohtaisia ​​tietoja eikä seuraa selaustottumuksiasi eri sovelluksissa.
Turvallisuus
Arvostan luottamustasi antaa meille henkilökohtaisia ​​tietojasi, joten pyrimme käyttämään kaupallisesti hyväksyttäviä keinoja niiden suojaamiseksi. Muista kuitenkin, että mikään Internetin välitysmenetelmä tai sähköinen tallennusmenetelmä ei ole 100% turvallinen ja luotettava, enkä voi taata sen ehdotonta turvallisuutta.
Linkit muihin sivustoihin
Tämä palvelu voi sisältää linkkejä muille sivustoille. Jos napsautat kolmannen osapuolen linkkiä, sinut ohjataan kyseiselle sivustolle. Huomaa, että en käytä näitä ulkoisia sivustoja. Siksi suosittelen lämpimästi tutustumaan näiden verkkosivustojen tietosuojakäytäntöön. En hallitse kolmansien osapuolien sivustojen tai palveluiden sisältöä, tietosuojakäytäntöjä tai käytäntöjä enkä ole niistä vastuussa.
Lasten yksityisyys
Nämä palvelut eivät ole tarkoitettu alle 13 -vuotiaille. En kerää tietoisesti alle 13 -vuotiailta lapsilta tunnistettavia tietoja. Jos huomaan, että alle 13 -vuotias lapsi on antanut minulle henkilökohtaisia ​​tietoja, poistan ne välittömästi palvelimiltamme. Jos olet vanhempi tai huoltaja ja tiedät, että lapsesi on antanut meille henkilökohtaisia ​​tietoja, ota yhteyttä minuun, jotta voin tehdä tarvittavat toimenpiteet.
Muutokset tähän tietosuojakäytäntöön
Voin päivittää tietosuojakäytäntöämme aika ajoin. Siksi sinun kannattaa tarkistaa tämä sivu säännöllisesti mahdollisten muutosten varalta. Ilmoitan muutoksista julkaisemalla uuden tietosuojakäytännön tälle sivulle.
Ota meihin yhteyttä
Jos sinulla on kysyttävää tai ehdotuksia tietosuojakäytännöstäni, älä epäröi ottaa minuun yhteyttä osoitteeseen enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Greek
Πολιτική απορρήτου
Ο Artur Kolesnykov δημιούργησε την εφαρμογή ως εφαρμογή Freemium. Αυτή η ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΑ παρέχεται από τον Artur Kolesnykov χωρίς κόστος και προορίζεται για χρήση ως έχει.
Αυτή η σελίδα χρησιμοποιείται για την ενημέρωση των επισκεπτών σχετικά με τις πολιτικές μου σχετικά με τη συλλογή, χρήση και αποκάλυψη Προσωπικών Πληροφοριών εάν κάποιος αποφάσισε να χρησιμοποιήσει την Υπηρεσία μου.
Εάν επιλέξετε να χρησιμοποιήσετε την Υπηρεσία μου, τότε συμφωνείτε με τη συλλογή και τη χρήση πληροφοριών σε σχέση με αυτήν την πολιτική. Οι προσωπικές πληροφορίες που συλλέγω χρησιμοποιούνται για την παροχή και τη βελτίωση της Υπηρεσίας. Δεν θα χρησιμοποιήσω ούτε θα μοιραστώ τις πληροφορίες σας με κανέναν παρά μόνο όπως περιγράφεται στην παρούσα Πολιτική Απορρήτου.
Οι όροι που χρησιμοποιούνται σε αυτήν την Πολιτική Απορρήτου έχουν τις ίδιες έννοιες με τους Όρους και τις Προϋποθέσεις μας, οι οποίοι είναι προσβάσιμοι στην εφαρμογή, εκτός εάν ορίζεται διαφορετικά στην παρούσα Πολιτική Απορρήτου.
Συλλογή και χρήση πληροφοριών
Για καλύτερη εμπειρία, κατά τη χρήση της Υπηρεσίας μας, ενδέχεται να απαιτήσω να μας παράσχετε ορισμένες προσωπικά αναγνωρίσιμες πληροφορίες. Οι πληροφορίες που ζητώ θα διατηρηθούν στη συσκευή σας και δεν συλλέγονται από εμένα με κανέναν τρόπο.
Αρχεία καταγραφής
Θέλω να σας ενημερώσω ότι κάθε φορά που χρησιμοποιείτε την Υπηρεσία μου, σε περίπτωση σφάλματος στην εφαρμογή συλλέγω δεδομένα και πληροφορίες (μέσω προϊόντων τρίτων) στο τηλέφωνό σας που ονομάζονται Αρχεία καταγραφής. Αυτά τα δεδομένα καταγραφής ενδέχεται να περιλαμβάνουν πληροφορίες όπως τη διεύθυνση πρωτοκόλλου συσκευής («IP») της συσκευής σας, το όνομα της συσκευής, την έκδοση του λειτουργικού συστήματος, τη διαμόρφωση της εφαρμογής κατά τη χρήση της υπηρεσίας μου, την ώρα και την ημερομηνία χρήσης της Υπηρεσίας από εσάς και άλλα στατιστικά στοιχεία Ε
Μπισκότα
Τα cookie είναι αρχεία με μικρή ποσότητα δεδομένων που χρησιμοποιούνται συνήθως ως ανώνυμα μοναδικά αναγνωριστικά. Αυτά αποστέλλονται στο πρόγραμμα περιήγησής σας από τους ιστότοπους που επισκέπτεστε και αποθηκεύονται στην εσωτερική μνήμη της συσκευής σας.
Αυτή η Υπηρεσία δεν χρησιμοποιεί ρητά αυτά τα «cookies». Ωστόσο, η εφαρμογή ενδέχεται να χρησιμοποιεί κώδικα τρίτων και βιβλιοθήκες που χρησιμοποιούν «cookie» για τη συλλογή πληροφοριών και τη βελτίωση των υπηρεσιών τους. Έχετε την επιλογή είτε να αποδεχτείτε είτε να απορρίψετε αυτά τα cookie και να γνωρίζετε πότε αποστέλλεται ένα cookie στη συσκευή σας. Εάν επιλέξετε να αρνηθείτε τα cookies μας, ενδέχεται να μην μπορείτε να χρησιμοποιήσετε ορισμένα τμήματα αυτής της Υπηρεσίας.
Πάροχοι υπηρεσιών
Ενδέχεται να προσλάβω εταιρείες και ιδιώτες τρίτων για τους ακόλουθους λόγους:
Για τη διευκόλυνση της Υπηρεσίας μας.
Να παρέχουμε την Υπηρεσία για λογαριασμό μας.
Για την εκτέλεση υπηρεσιών που σχετίζονται με την Υπηρεσία. ή
Για να μας βοηθήσει στην ανάλυση του τρόπου με τον οποίο χρησιμοποιείται η Υπηρεσία μας.
Θέλω να ενημερώσω τους χρήστες αυτής της Υπηρεσίας ότι αυτά τα τρίτα μέρη έχουν πρόσβαση στις Προσωπικές σας Πληροφορίες. Ο λόγος είναι να εκτελέσουμε τις εργασίες που τους έχουν ανατεθεί για λογαριασμό μας. Ωστόσο, είναι υποχρεωμένοι να μην αποκαλύπτουν ή να χρησιμοποιούν τις πληροφορίες για οποιονδήποτε άλλο σκοπό.
Μπορεί να χρησιμοποιήσουμε το Smartlook, το οποίο είναι μια λύση ανάλυσης. Το Smartlook μπορεί να καταγράφει: Οθόνες που επισκέφθηκαν, Μοτίβα αλληλεπίδρασης (όπως ενέργειες οθόνης, χειρονομίες: πατήματα, κύλιση) και λεπτομέρειες συσκευής (Τύπος, έκδοση, μοντέλο, λειτουργικό σύστημα). Χρησιμοποιούμε τις πληροφορίες που συλλέγει το Smartlook για να βελτιώσουμε την εφαρμογή μας.
Το Smartlook δεν συλλέγει πληροφορίες προσωπικής ταυτοποίησης και δεν παρακολουθεί τις συνήθειες περιήγησής σας σε εφαρμογές.
Ασφάλεια
Εκτιμώ την εμπιστοσύνη σας στην παροχή των Προσωπικών σας Πληροφοριών, γι ‘αυτό προσπαθούμε να χρησιμοποιήσουμε εμπορικά αποδεκτά μέσα προστασίας τους. Αλλά θυμηθείτε ότι καμία μέθοδος μετάδοσης μέσω διαδικτύου ή μέθοδος ηλεκτρονικής αποθήκευσης δεν είναι 100% ασφαλής και αξιόπιστη και δεν μπορώ να εγγυηθώ την απόλυτη ασφάλειά της.
Σύνδεσμοι σε άλλους ιστότοπους
Αυτή η υπηρεσία ενδέχεται να περιέχει συνδέσμους προς άλλους ιστότοπους. Εάν κάνετε κλικ σε έναν σύνδεσμο τρίτου μέρους, θα οδηγηθείτε σε αυτόν τον ιστότοπο. Λάβετε υπόψη ότι αυτοί οι εξωτερικοί ιστότοποι δεν λειτουργούν από εμένα. Ως εκ τούτου, σας συνιστώ ανεπιφύλακτα να αναθεωρήσετε την Πολιτική Απορρήτου αυτών των ιστότοπων. Δεν έχω κανέναν έλεγχο και δεν αναλαμβάνω καμία ευθύνη για το περιεχόμενο, τις πολιτικές απορρήτου ή τις πρακτικές οποιωνδήποτε ιστότοπων ή υπηρεσιών τρίτων.
Ιδιωτικότητα των παιδιών
Αυτές οι Υπηρεσίες δεν απευθύνονται σε άτομα κάτω των 13 ετών. Δεν συλλέγω εν γνώσει μου προσωπικά αναγνωρίσιμα στοιχεία από παιδιά κάτω των 13 ετών. Στην περίπτωση που ανακαλύψω ότι ένα παιδί κάτω των 13 ετών μου έχει παράσχει προσωπικές πληροφορίες, το διαγράφω αμέσως από τους διακομιστές μας. Εάν είστε γονέας ή κηδεμόνας και γνωρίζετε ότι το παιδί σας μας έχει παράσχει προσωπικές πληροφορίες, επικοινωνήστε μαζί μου για να μπορέσω να κάνω τις απαραίτητες ενέργειες.
Αλλαγές σε αυτήν την πολιτική απορρήτου
Ενδέχεται να ενημερώνω την Πολιτική Απορρήτου μας κατά καιρούς. Συνεπώς, συνιστάται να ελέγχετε περιοδικά αυτήν τη σελίδα για τυχόν αλλαγές. Θα σας ενημερώσω για τυχόν αλλαγές δημοσιεύοντας τη νέα Πολιτική Απορρήτου σε αυτήν τη σελίδα.
Επικοινωνήστε μαζί μας
Εάν έχετε οποιεσδήποτε ερωτήσεις ή προτάσεις σχετικά με την Πολιτική Απορρήτου μου, μη διστάσετε να επικοινωνήσετε μαζί μου στη διεύθυνση enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Indonesian
Kebijakan pribadi
Artur Kolesnykov membangun aplikasi sebagai aplikasi Freemium. LAYANAN ini disediakan oleh Artur Kolesnykov tanpa biaya dan dimaksudkan untuk digunakan apa adanya.
Halaman ini digunakan untuk memberi tahu pengunjung mengenai kebijakan saya dengan pengumpulan, penggunaan, dan pengungkapan Informasi Pribadi jika ada yang memutuskan untuk menggunakan Layanan saya.
Jika Anda memilih untuk menggunakan Layanan saya, maka Anda menyetujui pengumpulan dan penggunaan informasi sehubungan dengan kebijakan ini. Informasi Pribadi yang saya kumpulkan digunakan untuk menyediakan dan meningkatkan Layanan. Saya tidak akan menggunakan atau membagikan informasi Anda dengan siapa pun kecuali sebagaimana dijelaskan dalam Kebijakan Privasi ini.
Istilah yang digunakan dalam Kebijakan Privasi ini memiliki arti yang sama seperti dalam Syarat dan Ketentuan kami, yang dapat diakses di aplikasi kecuali ditentukan lain dalam Kebijakan Privasi ini.
Pengumpulan dan Penggunaan Informasi
Untuk pengalaman yang lebih baik, saat menggunakan Layanan kami, saya mungkin meminta Anda untuk memberikan kami informasi pengenal pribadi tertentu. Informasi yang saya minta akan disimpan di perangkat Anda dan tidak saya kumpulkan dengan cara apa pun.
Data Log
Saya ingin memberi tahu Anda bahwa setiap kali Anda menggunakan Layanan saya, jika terjadi kesalahan dalam aplikasi, saya mengumpulkan data dan informasi (melalui produk pihak ketiga) di ponsel Anda yang disebut Data Log. Data Log ini dapat mencakup informasi seperti alamat Protokol Internet (“IP”) perangkat Anda, nama perangkat, versi sistem operasi, konfigurasi aplikasi saat menggunakan Layanan saya, waktu dan tanggal penggunaan Layanan oleh Anda, dan statistik lainnya .
Kue
Cookie adalah file dengan sejumlah kecil data yang biasanya digunakan sebagai pengidentifikasi unik anonim. Ini dikirim ke browser Anda dari situs web yang Anda kunjungi dan disimpan di memori internal perangkat Anda.
Layanan ini tidak menggunakan “cookies” ini secara eksplisit. Namun, aplikasi dapat menggunakan kode dan perpustakaan pihak ketiga yang menggunakan «cookies» untuk mengumpulkan informasi dan meningkatkan layanan mereka. Anda memiliki pilihan untuk menerima atau menolak cookie ini dan mengetahui kapan cookie dikirim ke perangkat Anda. Jika Anda memilih untuk menolak cookie kami, Anda mungkin tidak dapat menggunakan beberapa bagian dari Layanan ini.
Penyedia jasa
Saya dapat mempekerjakan perusahaan dan individu pihak ketiga karena alasan berikut:
Untuk memfasilitasi Layanan kami;
Untuk menyediakan Layanan atas nama kami;
Untuk melakukan layanan terkait Layanan; atau
Untuk membantu kami dalam menganalisis bagaimana Layanan kami digunakan.
Saya ingin memberi tahu pengguna Layanan ini bahwa pihak ketiga ini memiliki akses ke Informasi Pribadi Anda. Alasannya adalah untuk melakukan tugas yang diberikan kepada mereka atas nama kita. Namun, mereka berkewajiban untuk tidak mengungkapkan atau menggunakan informasi tersebut untuk tujuan lain.
Kami dapat menggunakan Smartlook, yang merupakan solusi analitik. Smartlook dapat merekam: Layar yang dikunjungi, Pola interaksi (seperti tindakan layar, gerakan: ketuk, gulir) dan Detail perangkat (Jenis, Versi, Model, Sistem Operasi). Kami menggunakan informasi yang dikumpulkan oleh Smartlook untuk meningkatkan aplikasi kami.
Smartlook tidak mengumpulkan informasi pengenal pribadi dan tidak melacak kebiasaan menjelajah Anda di seluruh aplikasi.
Keamanan
Saya menghargai kepercayaan Anda dalam memberikan Informasi Pribadi Anda kepada kami, oleh karena itu kami berusaha untuk menggunakan cara yang dapat diterima secara komersial untuk melindunginya. Tetapi ingat bahwa tidak ada metode transmisi melalui internet, atau metode penyimpanan elektronik yang 100% aman dan andal, dan saya tidak dapat menjamin keamanan mutlaknya.
Tautan ke Situs Lain
Layanan ini mungkin berisi tautan ke situs lain. Jika Anda mengklik tautan pihak ketiga, Anda akan diarahkan ke situs itu. Perhatikan bahwa situs eksternal ini tidak dioperasikan oleh saya. Oleh karena itu, saya sangat menyarankan Anda untuk meninjau Kebijakan Privasi situs web ini. Saya tidak memiliki kendali atas dan tidak bertanggung jawab atas konten, kebijakan privasi, atau praktik dari situs atau layanan pihak ketiga mana pun.
Privasi Anak-anak
Layanan ini tidak ditujukan kepada siapa pun yang berusia di bawah 13 tahun. Saya tidak dengan sengaja mengumpulkan informasi pengenal pribadi dari anak-anak di bawah 13 tahun. Jika saya menemukan bahwa seorang anak di bawah 13 tahun telah memberi saya informasi pribadi, saya segera menghapusnya dari server kami. Jika Anda adalah orang tua atau wali dan Anda mengetahui bahwa anak Anda telah memberikan informasi pribadi kepada kami, silakan hubungi saya sehingga saya dapat melakukan tindakan yang diperlukan.
Perubahan pada Kebijakan Privasi Ini
Saya dapat memperbarui Kebijakan Privasi kami dari waktu ke waktu. Oleh karena itu, Anda disarankan untuk meninjau halaman ini secara berkala untuk setiap perubahan. Saya akan memberi tahu Anda tentang perubahan apa pun dengan memposting Kebijakan Privasi baru di halaman ini.
Hubungi kami
Jika Anda memiliki pertanyaan atau saran tentang Kebijakan Privasi saya, jangan ragu untuk menghubungi saya di enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Norwegian
Personvernerklæring
Artur Kolesnykov bygde appen som en Freemium -app. Denne TJENESTE er levert av Artur Kolesnykov uten kostnad og er beregnet for bruk som den er.
Denne siden brukes til å informere besøkende om retningslinjene mine for innsamling, bruk og avsløring av personlig informasjon hvis noen bestemte seg for å bruke tjenesten min.
Hvis du velger å bruke tjenesten min, godtar du innsamling og bruk av informasjon i forhold til disse retningslinjene. Personopplysningene jeg samler inn brukes til å tilby og forbedre tjenesten. Jeg vil ikke bruke eller dele informasjonen din med noen, bortsett fra som beskrevet i denne personvernerklæringen.
Vilkårene som brukes i denne personvernerklæringen har de samme betydningene som i våre vilkår og betingelser, som er tilgjengelige i appen med mindre annet er definert i denne personvernerklæringen.
Informasjonsinnsamling og bruk
For en bedre opplevelse, mens du bruker tjenesten vår, kan jeg kreve at du gir oss personlig identifiserbar informasjon. Informasjonen jeg ber om vil bli beholdt på enheten din og blir ikke samlet av meg på noen måte.
Loggdata
Jeg vil informere deg om at når du bruker tjenesten min, samler jeg data og informasjon (via tredjepartsprodukter) på telefonen din som heter Loggdata i tilfelle feil. Disse loggdataene kan inneholde informasjon som enhetens internettprotokolladresse («IP»), enhetsnavn, operativsystemversjon, konfigurasjon av appen ved bruk av tjenesten min, klokkeslett og dato for din bruk av tjenesten og annen statistikk .
Informasjonskapsler
Informasjonskapsler er filer med en liten mengde data som vanligvis brukes som anonyme unike identifikatorer. Disse sendes til nettleseren din fra nettstedene du besøker, og lagres i enhetens interne minne.
Denne tjenesten bruker ikke disse «informasjonskapslene» eksplisitt. Imidlertid kan appen bruke tredjepartskode og biblioteker som bruker «informasjonskapsler» for å samle inn informasjon og forbedre tjenestene deres. Du har muligheten til å enten godta eller nekte disse informasjonskapslene og vite når en informasjonskapsel sendes til enheten din. Hvis du velger å nekte informasjonskapslene våre, er det ikke sikkert du kan bruke noen deler av denne tjenesten.
Tjenestetilbydere
Jeg kan ansette tredjeparts selskaper og enkeltpersoner av følgende årsaker:
For å lette vår tjeneste;
Å levere tjenesten på våre vegne;
For å utføre Tjenesterelaterte tjenester; eller
For å hjelpe oss med å analysere hvordan tjenesten vår brukes.
Jeg vil informere brukere av denne tjenesten om at disse tredjepartene har tilgang til dine personlige opplysninger. Årsaken er å utføre oppgavene som er tildelt dem på våre vegne. De er imidlertid forpliktet til ikke å avsløre eller bruke informasjonen til andre formål.
Vi kan bruke Smartlook, som er en analyseløsning. Smartlook kan registrere: Skjermbilder som er besøkt, interaksjonsmønstre (for eksempel skjermhandlinger, bevegelser: trykk, ruller) og enhetsdetaljer (type, versjon, modell, operativsystem). Vi bruker informasjonen som er samlet inn av Smartlook for å forbedre appen vår.
Smartlook samler ikke inn personlig identifiserbar informasjon og sporer ikke nettleservanene dine på tvers av apper.
Sikkerhet
Jeg verdsetter tilliten din til å gi oss dine personlige opplysninger, og derfor streber vi etter å bruke kommersielt akseptable midler for å beskytte den. Men husk at ingen overføringsmetode over internett eller elektronisk lagring er 100% sikker og pålitelig, og jeg kan ikke garantere dens absolutte sikkerhet.
Lenker til andre nettsteder
Denne tjenesten kan inneholde lenker til andre nettsteder. Hvis du klikker på en tredjeparts lenke, blir du dirigert til dette nettstedet. Vær oppmerksom på at disse eksterne nettstedene ikke drives av meg. Derfor anbefaler jeg deg sterkt å gå gjennom personvernerklæringen for disse nettstedene. Jeg har ingen kontroll over og påtar meg intet ansvar for innholdet, personvernreglene eller praksis på tredjeparts nettsteder eller tjenester.
Barnas personvern
Disse tjenestene henvender seg ikke til noen under 13 år. Jeg samler ikke bevisst personlig identifiserbar informasjon fra barn under 13. I tilfelle jeg oppdager at et barn under 13 år har gitt meg personlig informasjon, sletter jeg dette umiddelbart fra serverne våre. Hvis du er en forelder eller verge og du er klar over at barnet ditt har gitt oss personlig informasjon, vennligst kontakt meg slik at jeg kan gjøre nødvendige handlinger.
Endringer i denne personvernerklæringen
Jeg kan oppdatere våre retningslinjer for personvern fra tid til annen. Derfor anbefales du å gå gjennom denne siden med jevne mellomrom for eventuelle endringer. Jeg vil varsle deg om eventuelle endringer ved å legge ut den nye personvernerklæringen på denne siden.
Kontakt oss
Hvis du har spørsmål eller forslag til min personvernerklæring, ikke nøl med å kontakte meg på enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Swedish
Integritetspolicy
Artur Kolesnykov byggde appen som en Freemium -app. Denna TJÄNST tillhandahålls av Artur Kolesnykov utan kostnad och är avsedd att användas som den är.
Denna sida används för att informera besökare om min policy för insamling, användning och avslöjande av personlig information om någon bestämde sig för att använda min tjänst.
Om du väljer att använda min tjänst godkänner du insamling och användning av information i förhållande till denna policy. Den personliga information som jag samlar in används för att tillhandahålla och förbättra tjänsten. Jag kommer inte att använda eller dela din information med någon utom det som beskrivs i denna sekretesspolicy.
Termerna som används i denna sekretesspolicy har samma betydelser som i våra användarvillkor, som är tillgängliga i appen om inte annat definieras i denna sekretesspolicy.
Insamling och användning av information
För en bättre upplevelse, när du använder vår tjänst, kan jag kräva att du ger oss viss personligt identifierbar information. Informationen som jag begär bevaras på din enhet och samlas inte in av mig på något sätt.
Loggdata
Jag vill informera dig om att när du använder min tjänst samlar jag in data och information (via tredjepartsprodukter) på din telefon som heter Log Data i händelse av ett fel i appen. Denna loggdata kan innehålla information såsom din enhets internetprotokoll (“IP”) -adress, enhetsnamn, operativsystemversion, konfiguration av appen vid användning av min tjänst, tid och datum för din användning av tjänsten och annan statistik .
Småkakor
Cookies är filer med en liten mängd data som vanligtvis används som anonyma unika identifierare. Dessa skickas till din webbläsare från de webbplatser som du besöker och lagras i enhetens interna minne.
Denna tjänst använder inte dessa «cookies» uttryckligen. Appen kan dock använda tredjepartskod och bibliotek som använder «cookies» för att samla in information och förbättra sina tjänster. Du har möjlighet att antingen acceptera eller vägra dessa cookies och veta när en cookie skickas till din enhet. Om du väljer att vägra våra cookies kanske du inte kan använda vissa delar av denna tjänst.
Tjänsteleverantörer
Jag kan anställa tredjepartsföretag och individer på grund av följande skäl:
För att underlätta vår tjänst;
Att tillhandahålla tjänsten för våra räkning;
Att utföra Tjänsterelaterade tjänster; eller
För att hjälpa oss att analysera hur vår tjänst används.
Jag vill informera användare av denna tjänst att dessa tredje parter har tillgång till din personliga information. Anledningen är att utföra de uppgifter som tilldelats dem på våra vägnar. De är dock skyldiga att inte avslöja eller använda informationen för något annat syfte.
Vi kan använda Smartlook, som är en analyslösning. Smartlook kan spela in: Skärmar som besöks, interaktionsmönster (t.ex. skärmåtgärder, gester: kranar, rullar) och enhetsinformation (typ, version, modell, operativsystem). Vi använder den information som samlats in av Smartlook för att förbättra vår app.
Smartlook samlar inte in personligt identifierbar information och spårar inte dina surfvanor mellan appar.
säkerhet
Jag uppskattar ditt förtroende för att ge oss din personliga information, så vi strävar efter att använda kommersiellt godtagbara sätt att skydda den. Men kom ihåg att ingen överföringsmetod över internet eller elektronisk lagring är 100% säker och pålitlig, och jag kan inte garantera dess absoluta säkerhet.
Länkar till andra webbplatser
Denna tjänst kan innehålla länkar till andra webbplatser. Om du klickar på en länk från tredje part kommer du till den webbplatsen. Observera att dessa externa webbplatser inte drivs av mig. Därför rekommenderar jag dig starkt att granska sekretesspolicyn för dessa webbplatser. Jag har ingen kontroll över och tar inget ansvar för innehållet, sekretesspolicyn eller praxis på webbplatser eller tjänster från tredje part.
Barns integritet
Dessa tjänster vänder sig inte till någon under 13 år. Jag samlar inte medvetet in personlig information från barn under 13. Om jag upptäcker att ett barn under 13 år har gett mig personlig information, raderar jag detta omedelbart från våra servrar. Om du är förälder eller vårdnadshavare och du är medveten om att ditt barn har gett oss personlig information, vänligen kontakta mig så att jag kan göra nödvändiga åtgärder.
Ändringar av denna sekretesspolicy
Jag kan komma att uppdatera vår sekretesspolicy då och då. Därför rekommenderas du att granska denna sida regelbundet för eventuella ändringar. Jag meddelar dig om eventuella ändringar genom att lägga upp den nya sekretesspolicyn på den här sidan.
Kontakta oss
Om du har några frågor eller förslag om min sekretesspolicy, tveka inte att kontakta mig på enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Vietnamese
Chính sách bảo mật
Artur Kolesnykov đã xây dựng ứng dụng này như một ứng dụng Freemium. DỊCH VỤ này được Artur Kolesnykov cung cấp miễn phí và được thiết kế để sử dụng như hiện tại.
Trang này được sử dụng để thông báo cho khách truy cập về các chính sách của tôi với việc thu thập, sử dụng và tiết lộ Thông tin Cá nhân nếu bất kỳ ai quyết định sử dụng Dịch vụ của tôi.
Nếu bạn chọn sử dụng Dịch vụ của tôi, nghĩa là bạn đồng ý với việc thu thập và sử dụng thông tin liên quan đến chính sách này. Thông tin Cá nhân mà tôi thu thập được sử dụng để cung cấp và cải thiện Dịch vụ. Tôi sẽ không sử dụng hoặc chia sẻ thông tin của bạn với bất kỳ ai ngoại trừ được mô tả trong Chính sách Bảo mật này.
Các điều khoản được sử dụng trong Chính sách quyền riêng tư này có ý nghĩa tương tự như trong Điều khoản và điều kiện của chúng tôi, có thể truy cập được tại ứng dụng trừ khi được định nghĩa khác trong Chính sách quyền riêng tư này.
Thu thập và sử dụng thông tin
Để có trải nghiệm tốt hơn, khi sử dụng Dịch vụ của chúng tôi, tôi có thể yêu cầu bạn cung cấp cho chúng tôi một số thông tin nhận dạng cá nhân nhất định. Thông tin mà tôi yêu cầu sẽ được lưu giữ trên thiết bị của bạn và không được tôi thu thập dưới bất kỳ hình thức nào.
Dữ liệu nhật ký
Tôi muốn thông báo với bạn rằng bất cứ khi nào bạn sử dụng Dịch vụ của tôi, trong trường hợp xảy ra lỗi trong ứng dụng, tôi sẽ thu thập dữ liệu và thông tin (thông qua các sản phẩm của bên thứ ba) trên điện thoại của bạn được gọi là Dữ liệu nhật ký. Dữ liệu nhật ký này có thể bao gồm thông tin như địa chỉ Giao thức Internet (“IP”) trên thiết bị của bạn, tên thiết bị, phiên bản hệ điều hành, cấu hình của ứng dụng khi sử dụng Dịch vụ của tôi, ngày giờ bạn sử dụng Dịch vụ và các số liệu thống kê khác .
Bánh quy
Cookie là các tệp có một lượng nhỏ dữ liệu thường được sử dụng làm mã nhận dạng duy nhất ẩn danh. Chúng được gửi đến trình duyệt của bạn từ các trang web mà bạn truy cập và được lưu trữ trên bộ nhớ trong của thiết bị của bạn.
Dịch vụ này không sử dụng các “cookie” này một cách rõ ràng. Tuy nhiên, ứng dụng có thể sử dụng mã của bên thứ ba và các thư viện sử dụng “cookie” để thu thập thông tin và cải thiện dịch vụ của họ. Bạn có tùy chọn chấp nhận hoặc từ chối các cookie này và biết khi nào một cookie được gửi đến thiết bị của bạn. Nếu bạn chọn từ chối cookie của chúng tôi, bạn có thể không sử dụng được một số phần của Dịch vụ này.
Các nhà cung cấp dịch vụ
Tôi có thể tuyển dụng các công ty và cá nhân bên thứ ba vì những lý do sau:
Để tạo điều kiện cho Dịch vụ của chúng tôi;
Để cung cấp Dịch vụ thay mặt chúng tôi;
Để thực hiện các dịch vụ liên quan đến Dịch vụ; hoặc
Để hỗ trợ chúng tôi phân tích cách Dịch vụ của chúng tôi được sử dụng.
Tôi muốn thông báo cho người dùng Dịch vụ này rằng các bên thứ ba này có quyền truy cập vào Thông tin cá nhân của bạn. Lý do là để thay mặt chúng tôi thực hiện các nhiệm vụ được giao cho họ. Tuy nhiên, họ có nghĩa vụ không tiết lộ hoặc sử dụng thông tin cho bất kỳ mục đích nào khác.
Chúng tôi có thể sử dụng Smartlook, một giải pháp phân tích. Smartlook có thể ghi lại: Màn hình đã truy cập, Mẫu tương tác (chẳng hạn như hành động trên màn hình, cử chỉ: chạm, cuộn) và Chi tiết thiết bị (Loại, Phiên bản, Kiểu máy, Hệ điều hành). Chúng tôi đang sử dụng thông tin do Smartlook thu thập để cải thiện ứng dụng của mình.
Smartlook không thu thập thông tin nhận dạng cá nhân và không theo dõi thói quen duyệt web của bạn trên các ứng dụng.
Bảo vệ
Tôi đánh giá cao sự tin tưởng của bạn trong việc cung cấp cho chúng tôi Thông tin cá nhân của bạn, do đó chúng tôi đang cố gắng sử dụng các phương tiện được chấp nhận về mặt thương mại để bảo vệ thông tin đó. Nhưng hãy nhớ rằng không có phương thức truyền tải nào qua internet, hoặc phương thức lưu trữ điện tử nào là an toàn và đáng tin cậy 100%, và tôi không thể đảm bảo tính bảo mật tuyệt đối của nó.
Liên kết đến các trang web khác
Dịch vụ này có thể chứa các liên kết đến các trang web khác. Nếu bạn nhấp vào liên kết của bên thứ ba, bạn sẽ được dẫn đến trang web đó. Lưu ý rằng các trang web bên ngoài này không do tôi điều hành. Do đó, tôi thực sự khuyên bạn nên xem lại Chính sách Bảo mật của các trang web này. Tôi không kiểm soát và không chịu trách nhiệm về nội dung, chính sách bảo mật hoặc thực tiễn của bất kỳ trang web hoặc dịch vụ của bên thứ ba nào.
Quyền riêng tư của trẻ em
Những Dịch vụ này không đề cập đến bất kỳ ai dưới 13 tuổi. Tôi không cố ý thu thập thông tin nhận dạng cá nhân của trẻ em dưới 13. Trong trường hợp tôi phát hiện ra rằng một đứa trẻ dưới 13 tuổi đã cung cấp thông tin cá nhân cho tôi, tôi ngay lập tức xóa thông tin này khỏi máy chủ của chúng tôi. Nếu bạn là cha mẹ hoặc người giám hộ và bạn biết rằng con bạn đã cung cấp thông tin cá nhân cho chúng tôi, vui lòng liên hệ với tôi để tôi có thể thực hiện các hành động cần thiết.
Các thay đổi đối với Chính sách quyền riêng tư này
Tôi có thể cập nhật Chính sách Bảo mật của chúng tôi theo thời gian. Vì vậy, bạn nên xem lại trang này định kỳ để biết bất kỳ thay đổi nào. Tôi sẽ thông báo cho bạn về bất kỳ thay đổi nào bằng cách đăng Chính sách Bảo mật mới trên trang này.
Liên hệ chúng tôi
Nếu bạn có bất kỳ câu hỏi hoặc đề xuất nào về Chính sách Bảo mật của tôi, vui lòng liên hệ với tôi tại enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Czech
Zásady ochrany osobních údajů
Artur Kolesnykov postavil aplikaci jako aplikaci Freemium. Tuto SLUŽBU poskytuje Artur Kolesnykov bezplatně a je určena k použití tak, jak je.
Tato stránka slouží k informování návštěvníků ohledně mých zásad týkajících se shromažďování, používání a zveřejňování osobních údajů, pokud se někdo rozhodl použít moji Službu.
Pokud se rozhodnete používat moji Službu, souhlasíte se shromažďováním a používáním informací v souvislosti s těmito zásadami. Osobní údaje, které shromažďuji, slouží k poskytování a zlepšování Služby. Vaše údaje nebudu používat ani s nikým sdílet, s výjimkou případů popsaných v těchto zásadách ochrany osobních údajů.
Pojmy použité v těchto zásadách ochrany osobních údajů mají stejný význam jako v našich smluvních podmínkách, které jsou přístupné v aplikaci, pokud není v těchto zásadách ochrany osobních údajů stanoveno jinak.
Shromažďování a používání informací
Pro lepší zážitek při používání naší Služby mohu požadovat, abyste nám poskytli určité osobní identifikační údaje. Informace, které požaduji, budou uchovány ve vašem zařízení a nebudu je žádným způsobem shromažďovat.
Data protokolu
Chci vás informovat, že kdykoli použijete moji službu, v případě chyby v aplikaci shromažďuji data a informace (prostřednictvím produktů třetích stran) do vašeho telefonu s názvem Log Data. Tato data protokolu mohou obsahovat informace, jako je adresa IP vašeho zařízení, název zařízení, verze operačního systému, konfigurace aplikace při používání mé služby, čas a datum vašeho používání služby a další statistiky .
Cookies
Cookies jsou soubory s malým množstvím dat, které se běžně používají jako anonymní jedinečné identifikátory. Ty jsou odesílány do vašeho prohlížeče z webů, které navštěvujete, a jsou uloženy ve vnitřní paměti vašeho zařízení.
Tato služba tyto „cookies“ výslovně nepoužívá. Aplikace však může ke shromažďování informací a zlepšování svých služeb používat kód třetích stran a knihovny, které používají „cookies“. Máte možnost tyto soubory cookie přijmout nebo odmítnout a vědět, kdy se do vašeho zařízení odesílá soubor cookie. Pokud se rozhodnete odmítnout naše soubory cookie, možná nebudete moci používat některé části této služby.
Poskytovatelé služeb
Mohu zaměstnávat společnosti a jednotlivce třetích stran z následujících důvodů:
K usnadnění naší služby;
Poskytovat službu naším jménem;
Provádět služby související se službami; nebo
Pomáhá nám při analýze toho, jak je naše služba využívána.
Chci informovat uživatele této služby, že tyto třetí strany mají přístup k vašim osobním údajům. Důvodem je plnění úkolů, které jsou jim přiděleny. Jsou však povinni tyto informace nezveřejnit a nepoužívat k žádnému jinému účelu.
Můžeme použít Smartlook, což je analytické řešení. Smartlook může zaznamenávat: navštívené obrazovky, vzorce interakce (například akce na obrazovce, gesta: klepnutí, posouvání) a podrobnosti o zařízení (typ, verze, model, operační systém). Informace shromážděné společností Smartlook používáme k vylepšení naší aplikace.
Smartlook neshromažďuje osobní identifikační údaje a nesleduje vaše návyky při procházení mezi aplikacemi.
Bezpečnostní
Vážím si vaší důvěry v to, že nám poskytnete své osobní údaje, proto se snažíme používat komerčně přijatelné způsoby jejich ochrany. Pamatujte však, že žádný způsob přenosu přes internet nebo způsob elektronického ukládání není 100% bezpečný a spolehlivý a nemohu zaručit jeho absolutní bezpečnost.
Odkazy na jiné stránky
Tato služba může obsahovat odkazy na jiné weby. Pokud kliknete na odkaz třetí strany, budete přesměrováni na tento web. Všimněte si, že tyto externí stránky nejsou provozovány mnou. Proto vám důrazně doporučujeme přečíst si zásady ochrany osobních údajů těchto webových stránek. Nemám žádnou kontrolu a nepřebírám žádnou odpovědnost za obsah, zásady ochrany osobních údajů nebo postupy jakýchkoli webů nebo služeb třetích stran.
Ochrana soukromí dětí
Tyto služby nejsou určeny pro osoby mladší 13 let. Nesmím vědomě shromažďovat osobní identifikační údaje od dětí mladších 13 let. V případě, že zjistím, že mi dítě mladší 13 let poskytlo osobní údaje, okamžitě je smažu z našich serverů. Pokud jste rodič nebo opatrovník a víte, že nám vaše dítě poskytlo osobní údaje, kontaktujte mě, abych mohl provést potřebné kroky.
Změny těchto zásad ochrany osobních údajů
Čas od času mohu aktualizovat naše zásady ochrany osobních údajů. Doporučujeme proto tuto stránku pravidelně kontrolovat, zda neobsahuje jakékoli změny. Na jakékoli změny vás upozorním zveřejněním nových zásad ochrany osobních údajů na této stránce.
Kontaktujte nás
Pokud máte nějaké dotazy nebo návrhy týkající se mých zásad ochrany osobních údajů, neváhejte mě kontaktovat na enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Hungarian
Adatvédelmi irányelvek
Artur Kolesnyikov az alkalmazást Freemium -alkalmazásként építette fel. Ezt a SZOLGÁLTATÁST Artur Kolesnyikov biztosítja díjmentesen, és úgy tervezték, hogy úgy használja.
Ez az oldal arra szolgál, hogy tájékoztassa a látogatókat a személyes adataim gyűjtésével, használatával és nyilvánosságra hozatalával kapcsolatos irányelveimről, ha valaki úgy dönt, hogy igénybe veszi a Szolgáltatásomat.
Ha úgy dönt, hogy igénybe veszi a Szolgáltatásomat, akkor beleegyezik abba, hogy a jelen irányelvvel kapcsolatban információkat gyűjtünk és használunk fel. Az általam gyűjtött személyes adatokat a Szolgáltatás nyújtására és javítására használjuk fel. Az Ön adatait nem használom fel és nem osztom meg senkivel, kivéve a jelen Adatvédelmi Szabályzatban leírtakat.
A jelen Adatvédelmi Szabályzatban használt kifejezések jelentése megegyezik az Általános Szerződési Feltételeinkkel, amelyek az alkalmazásban elérhetők, kivéve, ha ez az adatvédelmi szabályzat másként rendelkezik.
Információgyűjtés és felhasználás
A jobb élmény érdekében a Szolgáltatás használata során előfordulhat, hogy bizonyos személyazonosításra alkalmas adatokat kell megadnunk. Az általam kért információkat megőrizzük az eszközén, és semmilyen módon nem gyűjtem.
Napló adatok
Tájékoztatni szeretném Önöket, hogy amikor igénybe veszik a Szolgáltatásomat, az alkalmazás hibája esetén adatokat és információkat gyűjtök (harmadik fél termékein keresztül) az Ön telefonján, a Log Data néven. Ezek a naplóadatok tartalmazhatnak olyan információkat, mint az eszköz internetes protokoll („IP”) címe, az eszköz neve, az operációs rendszer verziója, az alkalmazás konfigurációja a szolgáltatásom használata során, a szolgáltatás használatának ideje és dátuma, valamint egyéb statisztikák .
Cookie -k
A cookie -k kis adatmennyiségű fájlok, amelyeket általában névtelen egyedi azonosítóként használnak. Ezeket a felkeresett webhelyekről küldi el a böngészőjébe, és a készülék belső memóriájában tárolják.
Ez a szolgáltatás nem használja kifejezetten ezeket a „cookie -kat”. Az alkalmazás azonban használhat harmadik féltől származó kódot és könyvtárakat, amelyek „cookie -kat” használnak információgyűjtésre és szolgáltatásaik fejlesztésére. Lehetősége van arra, hogy elfogadja vagy elutasítsa ezeket a cookie -kat, és tudja, mikor küld cookie -t az eszközére. Ha úgy dönt, hogy visszautasítja a sütiket, előfordulhat, hogy nem tudja használni a szolgáltatás egyes részeit.
Szolgáltatók
A következő okok miatt alkalmazhatok külső cégeket és magánszemélyeket:
Szolgáltatásunk megkönnyítése érdekében;
A Szolgáltatást a nevünkben nyújtani;
Szolgáltatással kapcsolatos szolgáltatások elvégzése; vagy
Segítségünk a Szolgáltatásunk használatának elemzésében.
Szeretném tájékoztatni a Szolgáltatás felhasználóit, hogy ezek a harmadik felek hozzáférhetnek az Ön személyes adataihoz. Ennek oka, hogy a ránk bízott feladatokat a nevünkben kell elvégezni. Mindazonáltal kötelesek nem nyilvánosságra hozni vagy felhasználni az információkat más célokra.
Használhatunk Smartlook elemzési megoldást. A Smartlook rögzíthet: meglátogatott képernyőket, interakciós mintákat (például képernyőműveleteket, gesztusokat: koppintásokat, görgetéseket) és az eszköz részleteit (típus, verzió, modell, operációs rendszer). A Smartlook által gyűjtött információkat felhasználjuk alkalmazásunk fejlesztésére.
A Smartlook nem gyűjt személyazonosításra alkalmas adatokat, és nem követi nyomon böngészési szokásait az alkalmazások között.
Biztonság
Nagyra értékelem bizalmát abban, hogy megadja nekünk személyes adatait, ezért igyekszünk kereskedelmi szempontból elfogadható eszközöket használni azok védelmére. De ne feledje, hogy az interneten keresztül történő továbbítás vagy az elektronikus tárolás egyik módja sem 100% -ban biztonságos és megbízható, és nem tudom garantálni annak teljes biztonságát.
Linkek más webhelyekre
Ez a szolgáltatás más webhelyekre mutató linkeket tartalmazhat. Ha rákattint egy harmadik fél linkjére, akkor az adott webhelyre irányít. Vegye figyelembe, hogy ezeket a külső webhelyeket nem én üzemeltetem. Ezért határozottan javaslom, hogy tekintse át ezen webhelyek adatvédelmi irányelveit. Nem tudom ellenőrizni és nem vállalok felelősséget harmadik fél webhelyeinek vagy szolgáltatásainak tartalmáért, adatvédelmi irányelveiért vagy gyakorlataiért.
Gyermekek magánélete
Ezek a szolgáltatások nem szólnak meg 13 éven aluli személyeket. Tudatosan nem gyűjtök személyazonosításra alkalmas adatokat 13 év alatti gyermekektől. Ha azt tapasztalom, hogy egy 13 év alatti gyermek személyes adatokat szolgáltatott nekem, azonnal törlöm ezeket a szervereinkről. Ha Ön szülő vagy gyám, és tudja, hogy gyermeke személyes adatokat adott meg nekünk, kérjük, vegye fel velem a kapcsolatot, hogy megtehessem a szükséges lépéseket.
Változások ezen adatvédelmi irányelvekben
Időnként frissíthetem adatvédelmi irányelveinket. Ezért azt javasoljuk, hogy rendszeresen nézze át ezt az oldalt a változások miatt. Az új adatvédelmi irányelvek ezen az oldalon történő közzétételével értesítem Önt a változásokról.
Lépjen kapcsolatba velünk
Ha bármilyen kérdése vagy javaslata van az adatvédelmi irányelveimmel kapcsolatban, ne habozzon kapcsolatba lépni velem az enzoapps.info@gmail.com címen.
Polish
Polityka prywatności
Artur Kolesnykov zbudował aplikację jako aplikację Freemium. Niniejsza USŁUGA jest świadczona przez Artura Kolesnykova bezpłatnie i jest przeznaczona do użytku w takiej postaci, w jakiej jest.
Ta strona służy do informowania odwiedzających o moich zasadach dotyczących gromadzenia, wykorzystywania i ujawniania Danych osobowych, jeśli ktoś zdecyduje się skorzystać z mojej Usługi.
Jeśli zdecydujesz się korzystać z mojej Usługi, zgadzasz się na zbieranie i wykorzystywanie informacji w związku z niniejszą polityką. Gromadzone przeze mnie dane osobowe służą do świadczenia i ulepszania Usługi. Nie wykorzystam ani nie udostępnię nikomu Twoich informacji, z wyjątkiem przypadków opisanych w niniejszej Polityce prywatności.
Terminy użyte w niniejszej Polityce prywatności mają takie samo znaczenie jak w naszym Regulaminie, który jest dostępny w aplikacji, chyba że niniejsza Polityka prywatności stanowi inaczej.
Gromadzenie i wykorzystywanie informacji
Aby zapewnić lepsze wrażenia podczas korzystania z naszej Usługi, mogę wymagać od Ciebie podania nam pewnych danych osobowych. Informacje, o które proszę, zostaną zachowane na Twoim urządzeniu i nie będą przeze mnie w żaden sposób zbierane.
Dane dziennika
Chcę Cię poinformować, że za każdym razem, gdy korzystasz z mojej Usługi, w przypadku wystąpienia błędu w aplikacji zbieram dane i informacje (za pośrednictwem produktów firm trzecich) na Twoim telefonie o nazwie Log Data. Te dane dziennika mogą zawierać takie informacje, jak adres IP urządzenia, nazwa urządzenia, wersja systemu operacyjnego, konfiguracja aplikacji podczas korzystania z mojej Usługi, czas i data korzystania z Usługi oraz inne statystyki .
Ciasteczka
Pliki cookie to pliki z niewielką ilością danych, które są powszechnie używane jako anonimowe unikalne identyfikatory. Są one wysyłane do Twojej przeglądarki z odwiedzanych przez Ciebie stron internetowych i są przechowywane w pamięci wewnętrznej Twojego urządzenia.
Niniejsza Usługa nie wykorzystuje wyraźnie tych plików „cookies”. Aplikacja może jednak wykorzystywać kod i biblioteki stron trzecich, które wykorzystują pliki „cookies” do zbierania informacji i ulepszania ich usług. Masz możliwość zaakceptowania lub odrzucenia tych plików cookie i wiedzieć, kiedy plik cookie jest wysyłany na Twoje urządzenie. Jeśli zdecydujesz się odrzucić nasze pliki cookie, możesz nie być w stanie korzystać z niektórych części tej Usługi.
Usługodawcy
Mogę zatrudniać firmy i osoby trzecie z następujących powodów:
Aby ułatwić naszą usługę;
Aby świadczyć Usługę w naszym imieniu;
Aby świadczyć usługi związane z Usługą; lub
Aby pomóc nam w analizie sposobu korzystania z naszej Usługi.
Chcę poinformować użytkowników tej Usługi, że te osoby trzecie mają dostęp do Twoich danych osobowych. Powodem jest wykonywanie powierzonych im zadań w naszym imieniu. Są jednak zobowiązani do nieujawniania ani nie wykorzystywania informacji w żadnym innym celu.
Możemy korzystać ze Smartlook, który jest rozwiązaniem analitycznym. Smartlook może rejestrować: odwiedzane ekrany, wzorce interakcji (takie jak akcje na ekranie, gesty: stuknięcia, przewijanie) oraz szczegóły urządzenia (typ, wersja, model, system operacyjny). Używamy informacji zebranych przez Smartlook do ulepszania naszej aplikacji.
Smartlook nie zbiera informacji umożliwiających identyfikację osoby i nie śledzi Twoich nawyków przeglądania w różnych aplikacjach.
Bezpieczeństwo
Cenimy Twoje zaufanie w dostarczaniu nam Twoich Danych Osobowych, dlatego staramy się stosować komercyjnie akceptowalne środki ich ochrony. Pamiętaj jednak, że żadna metoda transmisji przez Internet ani metoda elektronicznego przechowywania nie jest w 100% bezpieczna i niezawodna i nie mogę zagwarantować jej absolutnego bezpieczeństwa.
Linki do innych witryn
Niniejsza Usługa może zawierać łącza do innych witryn. Jeśli klikniesz link strony trzeciej, zostaniesz przekierowany do tej witryny. Pamiętaj, że te zewnętrzne witryny nie są przeze mnie obsługiwane. Dlatego zdecydowanie radzę zapoznać się z Polityką prywatności tych stron. Nie mam kontroli i nie ponoszę odpowiedzialności za treść, politykę prywatności lub praktyki jakichkolwiek witryn lub usług stron trzecich.
Prywatność dzieci
Usługi te nie są skierowane do osób poniżej 13 roku życia. Nie zbieram świadomie danych osobowych od dzieci poniżej 13 roku życia. W przypadku, gdy odkryję, że dziecko poniżej 13 roku życia przekazało mi dane osobowe, natychmiast usuwam je z naszych serwerów. Jeśli jesteś rodzicem lub opiekunem i zdajesz sobie sprawę, że Twoje dziecko przekazało nam dane osobowe, skontaktuj się ze mną, abym mógł podjąć niezbędne działania.
Zmiany w niniejszej Polityce prywatności
Od czasu do czasu mogę aktualizować naszą Politykę prywatności. Dlatego zaleca się okresowe przeglądanie tej strony pod kątem wszelkich zmian. Powiadomię Cię o wszelkich zmianach, zamieszczając nową Politykę prywatności na tej stronie.
Skontaktuj się z nami
Jeśli masz jakieś pytania lub sugestie dotyczące mojej Polityki prywatności, nie wahaj się ze mną skontaktować pod adresem enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Romanian
Politica de Confidențialitate
Artur Kolesnykov a construit aplicația ca aplicație Freemium. Acest SERVICIU este furnizat de Artur Kolesnykov fără costuri și este destinat utilizării ca atare.
Această pagină este utilizată pentru a informa vizitatorii cu privire la politicile mele cu privire la colectarea, utilizarea și divulgarea informațiilor personale dacă cineva a decis să folosească Serviciul meu.
Dacă alegeți să utilizați Serviciul meu, atunci sunteți de acord cu colectarea și utilizarea informațiilor în legătură cu această politică. Informațiile personale pe care le colectez sunt utilizate pentru furnizarea și îmbunătățirea Serviciului. Nu voi folosi sau distribui informațiile dvs. cu nimeni, cu excepția celor descrise în această Politică de confidențialitate.
Termenii utilizați în această politică de confidențialitate au aceleași semnificații ca și în Termenii și condițiile noastre, care sunt accesibile la aplicație, cu excepția cazului în care se definește altfel în această politică de confidențialitate.
Colectarea și utilizarea informațiilor
Pentru o experiență mai bună, în timpul utilizării Serviciului nostru, vă pot cere să ne furnizați anumite informații de identificare personală. Informațiile pe care le solicitez vor fi păstrate pe dispozitivul dvs. și nu sunt colectate de mine în niciun fel.
Date jurnal
Vreau să vă informez că ori de câte ori utilizați Serviciul meu, în cazul unei erori în aplicație, colectez date și informații (prin produse de la terți) pe telefonul dvs. numit Jurnal de date. Aceste date de jurnal pot include informații, cum ar fi adresa protocolului dvs. Internet („IP”) a dispozitivului, numele dispozitivului, versiunea sistemului de operare, configurația aplicației atunci când utilizați serviciul meu, ora și data utilizării serviciului și alte statistici .
Cookie-uri
Cookie-urile sunt fișiere cu o cantitate mică de date care sunt utilizate în mod obișnuit ca identificatori unici anonimi. Acestea sunt trimise către browserul dvs. de pe site-urile web pe care le vizitați și sunt stocate în memoria internă a dispozitivului.
Acest Serviciu nu folosește în mod explicit aceste „cookie-uri”. Cu toate acestea, aplicația poate utiliza coduri terțe și biblioteci care utilizează „cookie-uri” pentru a colecta informații și a-și îmbunătăți serviciile. Aveți opțiunea de a accepta sau de a refuza aceste cookie-uri și de a ști când este trimis un cookie către dispozitivul dvs. Dacă alegeți să refuzați cookie-urile noastre, este posibil să nu puteți utiliza unele porțiuni ale acestui Serviciu.
Prestatori de servicii
Pot angaja companii terțe și persoane fizice din următoarele motive:
Pentru a facilita serviciul nostru;
Pentru a furniza Serviciul în numele nostru;
Pentru a efectua servicii legate de servicii; sau
Pentru a ne ajuta să analizăm modul în care este utilizat Serviciul nostru.
Doresc să informez utilizatorii despre acest serviciu că aceste terțe părți au acces la informațiile dvs. personale. Motivul este să îndeplinim sarcinile care le-au fost atribuite în numele nostru. Cu toate acestea, aceștia sunt obligați să nu divulge sau să utilizeze informațiile în alte scopuri.
Putem folosi Smartlook, care este o soluție de analiză. Smartlook poate înregistra: ecrane vizitate, modele de interacțiune (cum ar fi acțiunile ecranului, gesturi: atingeri, derulări) și detalii despre dispozitiv (tip, versiune, model, sistem de operare). Folosim informațiile colectate de Smartlook pentru a ne îmbunătăți aplicația.
Smartlook nu colectează informații de identificare personală și nu urmărește obiceiurile dvs. de navigare între aplicații.
Securitate
Apreciez încrederea dvs. în furnizarea informațiilor dvs. personale, astfel ne străduim să folosim mijloace acceptabile din punct de vedere comercial pentru a le proteja. Amintiți-vă însă că nicio metodă de transmitere prin internet sau metodă de stocare electronică nu este sigură și fiabilă 100% și nu pot garanta securitatea sa absolută.
Link-uri către alte site-uri
Acest Serviciu poate conține linkuri către alte site-uri. Dacă faceți clic pe un link terță parte, veți fi direcționat către acel site. Rețineți că aceste site-uri externe nu sunt operate de mine. Prin urmare, vă sfătuiesc cu tărie să revizuiți Politica de confidențialitate a acestor site-uri web. Nu am control asupra și nu îmi asum responsabilitatea pentru conținutul, politicile de confidențialitate sau practicile site-urilor sau serviciilor terțe.
Confidențialitatea copiilor
Aceste Servicii nu se adresează nimănui cu vârsta sub 13 ani. Nu colectez cu bună știință informații de identificare personală de la copii sub 13 ani. În cazul în care descopăr că un copil sub 13 ani mi-a furnizat informații personale, șterg imediat acest lucru de pe serverele noastre. Dacă sunteți părinte sau tutore și sunteți conștient de faptul că copilul dvs. ne-a furnizat informații personale, vă rugăm să mă contactați pentru a putea face acțiunile necesare.
Modificări aduse acestei politici de confidențialitate
Este posibil să îmi actualizez Politica de confidențialitate din când în când. Astfel, vi se recomandă să revizuiți periodic această pagină pentru orice modificare. Vă voi notifica cu privire la orice modificare, postând noua politică de confidențialitate pe această pagină.
Contactează-ne
Dacă aveți întrebări sau sugestii cu privire la Politica mea de confidențialitate, nu ezitați să mă contactați la enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Slovak
Zásady ochrany osobných údajov
Artur Kolesnykov postavil aplikáciu ako aplikáciu Freemium. Túto SLUŽBU poskytuje Artur Kolesnykov bezplatne a je určená na používanie tak, ako je.
Táto stránka slúži na informovanie návštevníkov o mojich zásadách týkajúcich sa zhromažďovania, používania a zverejňovania osobných údajov, ak sa niekto rozhodol používať moju službu.
Ak sa rozhodnete používať moju Službu, súhlasíte so zhromažďovaním a používaním informácií v súvislosti s týmito zásadami. Osobné údaje, ktoré zhromažďujem, slúžia na poskytovanie a zlepšovanie Služby. Vaše informácie nebudem používať ani s nikým zdieľať, pokiaľ nie je popísané v týchto zásadách ochrany osobných údajov.
Pojmy použité v týchto zásadách ochrany osobných údajov majú rovnaký význam ako v našich zmluvných podmienkach, ktoré sú k aplikácii prístupné, pokiaľ nie je v týchto zásadách ochrany osobných údajov uvedené inak.
Zhromažďovanie a používanie informácií
Pre lepšie skúsenosti pri používaní našej Služby od vás môžem požadovať, aby ste nám poskytli určité osobne identifikovateľné informácie. Informácie, ktoré požadujem, budú uložené vo vašom zariadení a ja ich žiadnym spôsobom nezhromažďujem.
Údaje denníka
Chcem vás informovať, že kedykoľvek použijete moju službu, v prípade chyby v aplikácii zhromažďujem vo vašom telefóne údaje a informácie (prostredníctvom produktov tretích strán) s názvom Údaje denníka. Tieto údaje denníka môžu zahŕňať informácie, ako napríklad adresu IP (IP) vášho zariadenia, názov zariadenia, verziu operačného systému, konfiguráciu aplikácie pri využívaní mojej služby, čas a dátum vášho používania služby a ďalšie štatistiky .
Cookies
Cookies sú súbory s malým množstvom údajov, ktoré sa bežne používajú ako anonymné jedinečné identifikátory. Tieto sa odosielajú do vášho prehliadača z webových stránok, ktoré navštevujete, a sú uložené vo vnútornej pamäti vášho zariadenia.
Táto služba tieto „cookies“ výslovne nepoužíva. Aplikácia však môže používať kód a knižnice tretích strán, ktoré používajú súbory cookie na zhromažďovanie informácií a zlepšovanie svojich služieb. Máte možnosť tieto súbory cookie prijať alebo odmietnuť a vedieť, kedy sa súbor cookie odosiela do vášho zariadenia. Ak sa rozhodnete odmietnuť naše súbory cookie, možno nebudete môcť používať niektoré časti tejto služby.
Poskytovatelia služieb
Môžem zamestnávať spoločnosti a jednotlivcov tretích strán z nasledujúcich dôvodov:
Na uľahčenie našej služby;
Poskytovať Službu v našom mene;
Vykonávať služby súvisiace so Službami; alebo
Pomáha nám pri analýze toho, ako sa naša služba používa.
Chcem informovať používateľov tejto služby, že tieto tretie strany majú prístup k vašim osobným informáciám. Dôvodom je plnenie úloh, ktoré sú im zverené, v našom mene. Sú však povinní tieto informácie nezverejniť ani ich použiť na žiadny iný účel.
Môžeme použiť Smartlook, čo je analytické riešenie. Smartlook môže zaznamenávať: navštívené obrazovky, vzorce interakcií (ako sú akcie na obrazovke, gestá: klepania, posúvanie) a podrobnosti o zariadení (typ, verzia, model, operačný systém). Informácie zhromaždené spoločnosťou Smartlook používame na zlepšenie našej aplikácie.
Smartlook nezhromažďuje informácie umožňujúce identifikáciu osôb a nesleduje vaše návyky pri prehliadaní v rôznych aplikáciách.
Zabezpečenie
Vážim si vašu dôveru v to, že nám poskytnete svoje osobné údaje, preto sa snažíme používať komerčne prijateľné prostriedky na ich ochranu. Nezabudnite však, že žiadny spôsob prenosu cez internet alebo spôsob elektronického ukladania údajov nie je 100% bezpečný a spoľahlivý a nemôžem zaručiť jeho absolútnu bezpečnosť.
Odkazy na iné stránky
Táto služba môže obsahovať odkazy na iné stránky. Ak kliknete na odkaz tretej strany, budete presmerovaní na príslušný web. Upozorňujeme, že tieto externé stránky nie sú mnou prevádzkované. Preto vám dôrazne odporúčame, aby ste si prečítali zásady ochrany osobných údajov týchto webových stránok. Nemám žiadnu kontrolu a nepreberám žiadnu zodpovednosť za obsah, zásady ochrany osobných údajov alebo postupy akýchkoľvek webových stránok alebo služieb tretích strán.
Ochrana osobných údajov detí
Tieto služby nie sú určené nikomu mladšiemu ako 13 rokov. Vedome nezhromažďujem informácie umožňujúce identifikáciu osôb od detí mladších ako 13 rokov. V prípade, že zistím, že mi dieťa mladšie ako 13 rokov poskytlo osobné údaje, okamžite ich odstránim z našich serverov. Ak ste rodič alebo opatrovník a ste si vedomí toho, že nám vaše dieťa poskytlo osobné údaje, kontaktujte ma, aby som mohol vykonať potrebné opatrenia.
Zmeny týchto zásad ochrany osobných údajov
Čas od času môžem aktualizovať naše zásady ochrany osobných údajov. Odporúčame preto túto stránku pravidelne kontrolovať, či neobsahuje akékoľvek zmeny. Na akékoľvek zmeny vás upozorním zverejnením nových zásad ochrany osobných údajov na tejto stránke.
Kontaktuj nás
Ak máte akékoľvek otázky alebo návrhy týkajúce sa mojich zásad ochrany osobných údajov, neváhajte ma kontaktovať na adrese enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Реклама
Настройки приватности
Поделиться ссылкой:
Twitter
Facebook
Нравится
Загрузка...Artur Kolesnykov built the app as a Freemium app. This SERVICE is provided by Artur Kolesnykov at no cost and is intended for use as is.
This page is used to inform visitors regarding my policies with the collection, use, and disclosure of Personal Information if anyone decided to use my Service.
If you choose to use my Service, then you agree to the collection and use of information in relation to this policy. The Personal Information that I collect is used for providing and improving the Service. I will not use or share your information with anyone except as described in this Privacy Policy.
The terms used in this Privacy Policy have the same meanings as in our Terms and Conditions, which is accessible at the app unless otherwise defined in this Privacy Policy.
Information Collection and Use
For a better experience, while using our Service, I may require you to provide us with certain personally identifiable information. The information that I request will be retained on your device and is not collected by me in any way.
Log Data
I want to inform you that whenever you use my Service, in a case of an error in the app I collect data and information (through third party products) on your phone called Log Data. This Log Data may include information such as your device Internet Protocol (“IP”) address, device name, operating system version, the configuration of the app when utilizing my Service, the time and date of your use of the Service, and other statistics.
Cookies
Cookies are files with a small amount of data that are commonly used as anonymous unique identifiers. These are sent to your browser from the websites that you visit and are stored on your device’s internal memory.
This Service does not use these “cookies” explicitly. However, the app may use third party code and libraries that use “cookies” to collect information and improve their services. You have the option to either accept or refuse these cookies and know when a cookie is being sent to your device. If you choose to refuse our cookies, you may not be able to use some portions of this Service.
Service Providers
I may employ third-party companies and individuals due to the following reasons:
To facilitate our Service;
To provide the Service on our behalf;
To perform Service-related services; or
To assist us in analyzing how our Service is used.
I want to inform users of this Service that these third parties have access to your Personal Information. The reason is to perform the tasks assigned to them on our behalf. However, they are obligated not to disclose or use the information for any other purpose.
We may use Smartlook, which is an analytics solution. Smartlook may record: Screens visited, Interaction patterns (such as screen actions, gestures: taps, scrolls) and Device details (Type, Version, Model, Operating System). We are using the information collected by Smartlook to improve our app.
Smartlook does not collect personally identifiable information and does not track your browsing habits across apps.
Advertising
Our app uses Appodeal for ad mediation and monetization. Appodeal collects certain data, including your IP address and advertising ID, to serve personalized and non-personalized ads. You can review Appodeal’s privacy policy here:
Appodeal Privacy Policy
.
Security
I value your trust in providing us your Personal Information, thus we are striving to use commercially acceptable means of protecting it. But remember that no method of transmission over the internet, or method of electronic storage is 100% secure and reliable, and I cannot guarantee its absolute security.
Links to Other Sites
This Service may contain links to other sites. If you click on a third-party link, you will be directed to that site. Note that these external sites are not operated by me. Therefore, I strongly advise you to review the Privacy Policy of these websites. I have no control over and assume no responsibility for the content, privacy policies, or practices of any third-party sites or services.
Children’s Privacy
These Services do not address anyone under the age of 13. I do not knowingly collect personally identifiable information from children under 13. In the case I discover that a child under 13 has provided me with personal information, I immediately delete this from our servers. If you are a parent or guardian and you are aware that your child has provided us with personal information, please contact me so that I will be able to do necessary actions.
Changes to This Privacy Policy
I may update our Privacy Policy from time to time. Thus, you are advised to review this page periodically for any changes. I will notify you of any changes by posting the new Privacy Policy on this page.
Contact Us
If you have any questions or suggestions about my Privacy Policy, do not hesitate to contact me at enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Portuguese
Política de Privacidade
Artur Kolesnykov construiu o aplicativo como um aplicativo Freemium. Este SERVIÇO é fornecido por Artur Kolesnykov sem nenhum custo e deve ser usado como está.
Esta página é usada para informar os visitantes sobre minhas políticas de coleta, uso e divulgação de Informações Pessoais, caso alguém decida usar meu Serviço.
Se você optar por usar meu serviço, concorda com a coleta e uso de informações em relação a esta política. As informações pessoais que recolho são usadas para fornecer e melhorar o serviço. Não irei usar ou compartilhar suas informações com ninguém, exceto conforme descrito nesta Política de Privacidade.
Os termos usados ​​nesta Política de Privacidade têm os mesmos significados que em nossos Termos e Condições, que podem ser acessados ​​no aplicativo, a menos que definido de outra forma nesta Política de Privacidade.
Coleta e uso de informações
Para uma melhor experiência, ao usar nosso Serviço, posso solicitar que você nos forneça certas informações de identificação pessoal. As informações que solicito serão retidas em seu dispositivo e não serão coletadas por mim de forma alguma.
Dados de registro
Quero informar que sempre que você utiliza o meu Serviço, em caso de erro no aplicativo, eu coleto dados e informações (através de produtos de terceiros) no seu telefone chamado Log Data. Estes dados de registro podem incluir informações como endereço de protocolo de Internet («IP») do dispositivo, nome do dispositivo, versão do sistema operacional, a configuração do aplicativo ao utilizar meu serviço, a hora e data de uso do serviço e outras estatísticas .
Biscoitos
Cookies são arquivos com uma pequena quantidade de dados que são comumente usados ​​como identificadores exclusivos anônimos. Eles são enviados para o seu navegador a partir dos sites que você visita e são armazenados na memória interna do seu dispositivo.
Este Serviço não usa esses “cookies” explicitamente. No entanto, o aplicativo pode usar código de terceiros e bibliotecas que usam “cookies” para coletar informações e melhorar seus serviços. Você tem a opção de aceitar ou recusar esses cookies e saber quando um cookie está sendo enviado para o seu dispositivo. Se você decidir recusar nossos cookies, pode não ser capaz de usar algumas partes deste Serviço.
Provedores de serviço
Posso empregar empresas terceirizadas e indivíduos pelos seguintes motivos:
Para facilitar o nosso serviço;
Para fornecer o Serviço em nosso nome;
Para executar serviços relacionados com o serviço; ou
Para nos ajudar a analisar como nosso Serviço é usado.
Desejo informar aos usuários deste Serviço que esses terceiros têm acesso às suas Informações Pessoais. O motivo é realizar as tarefas atribuídas a eles em nosso nome. No entanto, eles são obrigados a não divulgar ou usar as informações para qualquer outra finalidade.
Podemos usar o Smartlook, que é uma solução analítica. O Smartlook pode registrar: Telas visitadas, padrões de interação (como ações na tela, gestos: toques, rolagens) e detalhes do dispositivo (tipo, versão, modelo, sistema operacional). Estamos usando as informações coletadas pelo Smartlook para melhorar nosso aplicativo.
O Smartlook não coleta informações de identificação pessoal e não rastreia seus hábitos de navegação nos aplicativos.
Publicidade
Nosso aplicativo usa o Appodeal para mediação e monetização de anúncios. O Appodeal coleta certos dados, incluindo seu endereço IP e ID de publicidade, para exibir anúncios personalizados e não personalizados. Você pode revisar a política de privacidade do Appodeal aqui:
Política de Privacidade do Appodeal
.
Segurança
Valorizo ​​sua confiança em nos fornecer suas informações pessoais, portanto, estamos nos empenhando para usar meios comercialmente aceitáveis ​​de protegê-las. Mas lembre-se que nenhum método de transmissão pela internet, ou método de armazenamento eletrônico é 100% seguro e confiável, e não posso garantir sua segurança absoluta.
Links para outros sites
Este serviço pode conter links para outros sites. Se você clicar em um link de terceiros, será direcionado a esse site. Observe que esses sites externos não são operados por mim. Portanto, eu recomendo fortemente que você analise a Política de Privacidade desses sites. Não tenho controle e não assumo responsabilidade pelo conteúdo, políticas de privacidade ou práticas de quaisquer sites ou serviços de terceiros.
Privacidade das crianças
Estes Serviços não se dirigem a ninguém com idade inferior a 13 anos. Não recolho intencionalmente informações de identificação pessoal de crianças com menos de 13 anos. No caso de descobrir que uma criança com menos de 13 anos forneceu-me informações pessoais, as elimino imediatamente dos nossos servidores. Se você é um pai ou responsável e sabe que seu filho nos forneceu informações pessoais, entre em contato comigo para que eu possa tomar as medidas necessárias.
Mudanças nesta Política de Privacidade
Posso atualizar nossa Política de Privacidade de tempos em tempos. Portanto, recomendamos que você reveja esta página periodicamente para verificar quaisquer alterações. Irei notificá-lo de quaisquer alterações, postando a nova Política de Privacidade nesta página.
Entre em contato conosco
Se você tiver alguma dúvida ou sugestão sobre minha Política de Privacidade, não hesite em entrar em contato comigo pelo e-mail enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Deutsche
Datenschutz-Bestimmungen
Artur Kolesnykov hat die App als Freemium-App erstellt. Dieser SERVICE wird von Artur Kolesnykov kostenlos zur Verfügung gestellt und ist für den unveränderten Gebrauch bestimmt.
Diese Seite wird verwendet, um Besucher über meine Richtlinien bezüglich der Erfassung, Verwendung und Offenlegung persönlicher Informationen zu informieren, wenn sich jemand für die Nutzung meines Dienstes entschieden hat.
Wenn Sie sich für die Nutzung meines Dienstes entscheiden, stimmen Sie der Erfassung und Verwendung von Informationen in Bezug auf diese Richtlinie zu. Die von mir gesammelten persönlichen Daten werden zur Bereitstellung und Verbesserung des Dienstes verwendet. Ich werde Ihre Daten nur wie in dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie beschrieben verwenden oder an Dritte weitergeben.
Die in dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie verwendeten Begriffe haben dieselbe Bedeutung wie in unseren Allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen, auf die über die App zugegriffen werden kann, sofern in dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie nichts anderes definiert ist.
Sammlung und Verwendung von Informationen
Für eine bessere Erfahrung bei der Nutzung unseres Service kann es erforderlich sein, dass Sie uns bestimmte personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung stellen. Die von mir angeforderten Informationen bleiben auf Ihrem Gerät erhalten und werden von mir in keiner Weise erfasst.
Logdaten
Ich möchte Sie darüber informieren, dass ich bei jeder Nutzung meines Dienstes im Falle eines Fehlers in der App Daten und Informationen (über Produkte von Drittanbietern) auf Ihrem Telefon mit dem Namen «Protokolldaten» sammle. Diese Protokolldaten können Informationen wie die IP-Adresse (Internet Protocol) Ihres Geräts, den Gerätenamen, die Betriebssystemversion, die Konfiguration der App bei Nutzung meines Dienstes, die Uhrzeit und das Datum Ihrer Nutzung des Dienstes sowie andere Statistiken enthalten .
Kekse
Cookies sind Dateien mit einer kleinen Datenmenge, die üblicherweise als anonyme eindeutige Kennungen verwendet werden. Diese werden von den von Ihnen besuchten Websites an Ihren Browser gesendet und im internen Speicher Ihres Geräts gespeichert.
Dieser Service verwendet diese „Cookies“ nicht explizit. Die App verwendet jedoch möglicherweise Code und Bibliotheken von Drittanbietern, die „Cookies“ verwenden, um Informationen zu sammeln und ihre Dienste zu verbessern. Sie haben die Möglichkeit, diese Cookies entweder zu akzeptieren oder abzulehnen und zu erfahren, wann ein Cookie an Ihr Gerät gesendet wird. Wenn Sie unsere Cookies ablehnen, können Sie möglicherweise einige Teile dieses Dienstes nicht nutzen.
Dienstleister
Ich kann aus folgenden Gründen Drittunternehmen und Einzelpersonen beschäftigen:
Um unseren Service zu erleichtern;
Den Service in unserem Namen bereitzustellen;
Servicebezogene Dienstleistungen erbringen; oder
Um uns bei der Analyse der Nutzung unseres Service zu unterstützen.
Ich möchte Benutzer dieses Dienstes darüber informieren, dass diese Dritten Zugriff auf Ihre persönlichen Daten haben. Der Grund ist, die ihnen zugewiesenen Aufgaben in unserem Namen auszuführen. Sie sind jedoch verpflichtet, die Informationen nicht weiterzugeben oder für andere Zwecke zu verwenden.
Möglicherweise verwenden wir Smartlook, eine Analyselösung. Smartlook kann Folgendes aufzeichnen: besuchte Bildschirme, Interaktionsmuster (wie Bildschirmaktionen, Gesten: Tippen, Scrollen) und Gerätedetails (Typ, Version, Modell, Betriebssystem). Wir verwenden die von Smartlook gesammelten Informationen, um unsere App zu verbessern.
Smartlook sammelt keine personenbezogenen Daten und verfolgt Ihre Surfgewohnheiten nicht über Apps hinweg.
Werbung
Unsere App verwendet Appodeal für die Anzeigenvermittlung und Monetarisierung. Appodeal sammelt bestimmte Daten, einschließlich Ihrer IP-Adresse und Werbe-ID, um personalisierte und nicht personalisierte Anzeigen bereitzustellen. Sie können die Datenschutzrichtlinie von Appodeal hier einsehen:
Appodeal-Datenschutzrichtlinie
.
Sicherheit
Ich schätze Ihr Vertrauen in die Bereitstellung Ihrer persönlichen Daten. Daher bemühen wir uns, wirtschaftlich akzeptable Mittel zum Schutz dieser Daten zu verwenden. Denken Sie jedoch daran, dass keine Methode zur Übertragung über das Internet oder zur elektronischen Speicherung 100% sicher und zuverlässig ist und ich die absolute Sicherheit nicht garantieren kann.
Links zu anderen Seiten
Dieser Service kann Links zu anderen Websites enthalten. Wenn Sie auf einen Link eines Drittanbieters klicken, werden Sie zu dieser Site weitergeleitet. Beachten Sie, dass diese externen Websites nicht von mir betrieben werden. Aus diesem Grund empfehle ich Ihnen dringend, die Datenschutzbestimmungen dieser Websites zu lesen. Ich habe keine Kontrolle über Inhalte, Datenschutzrichtlinien oder Praktiken von Websites oder Diensten Dritter und übernehme keine Verantwortung dafür.
Datenschutz für Kinder
Diese Dienste richten sich nicht an Personen unter 13 Jahren. Ich sammle wissentlich keine personenbezogenen Daten von Kindern unter 13 Jahren. Wenn ich feststelle, dass ein Kind unter 13 Jahren mir personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung gestellt hat, lösche ich diese sofort von unseren Servern. Wenn Sie Eltern oder Erziehungsberechtigte sind und wissen, dass Ihr Kind uns personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung gestellt hat, setzen Sie sich bitte mit mir in Verbindung, damit ich die erforderlichen Maßnahmen ergreifen kann.
Änderungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Ich kann unsere Datenschutzrichtlinie von Zeit zu Zeit aktualisieren. Es wird daher empfohlen, diese Seite regelmäßig auf Änderungen zu überprüfen. Ich werde Sie über Änderungen informieren, indem ich die neue Datenschutzrichtlinie auf dieser Seite veröffentliche.
Kontaktiere uns
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Anregungen zu meiner Datenschutzrichtlinie haben, zögern Sie nicht, mich unter enzoapps.info@gmail.com zu kontaktieren.
Русский
Политика конфиденциальности
Артур Колесников создал приложение как Freemium-приложение. Данная УСЛУГА предоставляется Артуром Колесниковым бесплатно и предназначена для использования «как есть».
Эта страница используется для информирования посетителей о моей политике в отношении сбора, использования и раскрытия Личной информации, если кто-то решил использовать мою Службу.
Если вы решите использовать мою Службу, вы соглашаетесь на сбор и использование информации в отношении этой политики. Личная информация, которую я собираю, используется для предоставления и улучшения Сервиса. Я не буду использовать или передавать вашу информацию кому-либо, кроме случаев, описанных в настоящей Политике конфиденциальности.
Термины, используемые в настоящей Политике конфиденциальности, имеют то же значение, что и в наших Положениях и условиях, которые доступны в приложении, если иное не определено в настоящей Политике конфиденциальности.
Сбор и использование информации
Для лучшего опыта при использовании нашего Сервиса я могу потребовать от вас предоставить нам определенную личную информацию. Информация, которую я запрашиваю, будет храниться на вашем устройстве и не будет собираться мной каким-либо образом.
Данные журнала
Я хочу сообщить вам, что всякий раз, когда вы используете мою Службу, в случае ошибки в приложении я собираю данные и информацию (через сторонние продукты) на вашем телефоне, которые называются данными журнала. Эти данные журнала могут включать такую ​​информацию, как IP-адрес вашего устройства, имя устройства, версия операционной системы, конфигурация приложения при использовании моего Сервиса, время и дата использования вами Сервиса и другие статистические данные. .
Печенье
Файлы cookie — это файлы с небольшим объемом данных, которые обычно используются в качестве анонимных уникальных идентификаторов. Они отправляются в ваш браузер с веб-сайтов, которые вы посещаете, и хранятся во внутренней памяти вашего устройства.
Этот Сервис не использует эти «куки» явно. Однако приложение может использовать сторонний код и библиотеки, которые используют файлы cookie для сбора информации и улучшения своих услуг. У вас есть возможность принять или отклонить эти файлы cookie и узнать, когда файл cookie отправляется на ваше устройство. Если вы решите отказаться от наших файлов cookie, возможно, вы не сможете использовать некоторые части этого Сервиса.
Поставщики услуг
Я могу нанимать сторонние компании и частных лиц по следующим причинам:
Для облегчения нашего Сервиса;
Для предоставления Сервиса от нашего имени;
Для оказания услуг, связанных с Сервисом; или же
Чтобы помочь нам в анализе использования нашего Сервиса.
Я хочу проинформировать пользователей этого Сервиса о том, что эти третьи стороны имеют доступ к вашей Личной информации. Причина в том, чтобы выполнять поставленные перед ними задачи от нашего имени. Однако они обязаны не раскрывать и не использовать информацию для каких-либо других целей.
Мы можем использовать Smartlook, аналитическое решение. Smartlook может записывать: посещенные экраны, шаблоны взаимодействия (например, действия на экране, жесты: касания, прокрутки) и сведения об устройстве (тип, версия, модель, операционная система). Мы используем информацию, собранную Smartlook, для улучшения нашего приложения.
Smartlook не собирает личную информацию и не отслеживает ваши привычки просмотра в приложениях.
Реклама
Наше приложение использует Appodeal для медиапосредничества и монетизации рекламы. Appodeal собирает определенные данные, включая ваш IP-адрес и рекламный идентификатор, для показа персонализированной и неперсонализированной рекламы. Вы можете ознакомиться с политикой конфиденциальности Appodeal здесь:
Политика конфиденциальности Appodeal
.
Безопасность
Я ценю ваше доверие к предоставлению нам вашей личной информации, поэтому мы стремимся использовать коммерчески приемлемые средства ее защиты. Но помните, что ни один метод передачи через Интернет или метод электронного хранения не является на 100% безопасным и надежным, и я не могу гарантировать его абсолютную безопасность.
Ссылки на другие сайты
Этот Сервис может содержать ссылки на другие сайты. Если вы нажмете на стороннюю ссылку, вы будете перенаправлены на этот сайт. Обратите внимание, что этими внешними сайтами я не управляю. Поэтому я настоятельно рекомендую вам ознакомиться с Политикой конфиденциальности этих веб-сайтов. Я не контролирую и не несу ответственности за контент, политику конфиденциальности или действия любых сторонних сайтов или служб.
Конфиденциальность детей
Эти Услуги не предназначены для лиц младше 13 лет. Я сознательно не собираю личную информацию от детей младше 13 лет. В случае, если я обнаруживаю, что ребенок младше 13 лет предоставил мне личную информацию, я немедленно удаляю ее с наших серверов. Если вы являетесь родителем или опекуном и знаете, что ваш ребенок предоставил нам личную информацию, свяжитесь со мной, чтобы я мог предпринять необходимые действия.
Изменения в настоящей Политике конфиденциальности
Я могу время от времени обновлять нашу Политику конфиденциальности. Таким образом, вам рекомендуется периодически просматривать эту страницу на предмет изменений. Я сообщу вам о любых изменениях, разместив новую Политику конфиденциальности на этой странице.
Свяжитесь с нами
Если у вас есть какие-либо вопросы или предложения относительно моей Политики конфиденциальности, не стесняйтесь обращаться ко мне по адресу enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Українська
Артур Колесников створив додаток як Freemium-додаток. Ця ПОСЛУГА надається Артуром Колесниковим безкоштовно і призначена для використання «як є».
Ця сторінка використовується для інформування відвідувачів про мою політику щодо збору, використання та розкриття Особистої інформації, якщо хтось вирішить скористатися моєю Послугою.
Якщо ви вирішите використовувати мою Послугу, ви погоджуєтеся на збір і використання інформації відповідно до цієї політики. Особиста інформація, яку я збираю, використовується для надання та покращення Сервісу. Я не буду використовувати чи передавати вашу інформацію кому-небудь, окрім випадків, описаних у цій Політиці конфіденційності.
Терміни, що використовуються в цій Політиці конфіденційності, мають те саме значення, що і в наших Положеннях та умовах, які доступні в додатку, якщо інше не визначено в цій Політиці конфіденційності.
Збір та використання інформації
Для кращого досвіду при використанні нашого Сервісу я можу попросити вас надати певну особисту інформацію. Інформація, яку я запитую, зберігатиметься на вашому пристрої і не буде збиратися мною будь-яким чином.
Журнальні дані
Я хочу повідомити вас, що щоразу, коли ви використовуєте мою Послугу, у разі помилки в додатку я збираю дані та інформацію (через сторонні продукти) на вашому телефоні, які називаються журнальними даними. Ці журнальні дані можуть містити таку інформацію, як IP-адреса вашого пристрою, ім’я пристрою, версія операційної системи, конфігурація додатка під час використання моєї Послуги, час і дата використання Послуги та інші статистичні дані.
Файли cookie
Файли cookie – це файли з невеликим обсягом даних, які зазвичай використовуються як анонімні унікальні ідентифікатори. Вони надсилаються у ваш браузер із веб-сайтів, які ви відвідуєте, і зберігаються у внутрішній пам’яті вашого пристрою.
Ця Послуга не використовує ці «cookie» безпосередньо. Однак додаток може використовувати сторонній код і бібліотеки, які використовують файли cookie для збору інформації та покращення своїх послуг. У вас є можливість прийняти або відхилити ці файли cookie та дізнатися, коли файл cookie надсилається на ваш пристрій. Якщо ви вирішите відмовитися від наших файлів cookie, можливо, ви не зможете використовувати деякі частини цієї Послуги.
Постачальники послуг
Я можу залучати сторонні компанії та приватних осіб з таких причин:
• Для полегшення роботи нашого Сервісу;
• Для надання Сервісу від нашого імені;
• Для виконання пов’язаних із Сервісом послуг; або
• Для допомоги в аналізі використання нашого Сервісу.
Я хочу повідомити користувачів цього Сервісу, що ці треті сторони мають доступ до вашої Особистої інформації. Це необхідно для виконання ними поставлених перед ними завдань від нашого імені. Однак вони зобов’язані не розголошувати та не використовувати інформацію для будь-яких інших цілей.
Ми можемо використовувати Smartlook, аналітичне рішення. Smartlook може записувати: відвідані екрани, шаблони взаємодії (наприклад, дії на екрані, жести: торкання, прокручування) та дані про пристрій (тип, версія, модель, операційна система). Ми використовуємо інформацію, зібрану Smartlook, для покращення нашого додатка.
Smartlook не збирає особисту інформацію і не відстежує ваші звички перегляду в додатках.
Реклама
Наш додаток використовує Appodeal для медіації реклами та монетизації. Appodeal збирає певні дані, зокрема вашу IP-адресу та рекламний ідентифікатор, для показу персоналізованої та неперсоналізованої реклами. Ви можете переглянути політику конфіденційності Appodeal тут:
Політика конфіденційності Appodeal
.
Безпека
Я ціную вашу довіру до надання нам вашої особистої інформації, тому ми прагнемо використовувати комерційно прийнятні засоби для її захисту. Але пам’ятайте, що жоден метод передавання через Інтернет або метод електронного зберігання не є на 100% безпечним і надійним, і я не можу гарантувати абсолютну безпеку.
Посилання на інші сайти
Ця Послуга може містити посилання на інші сайти. Якщо ви натиснете на стороннє посилання, ви будете перенаправлені на цей сайт. Зверніть увагу, що я не керую цими зовнішніми сайтами. Тому я настійно рекомендую вам ознайомитися з Політикою конфіденційності цих веб-сайтів. Я не контролюю та не несу відповідальності за зміст, політику конфіденційності або дії будь-яких сторонніх сайтів чи сервісів.
Конфіденційність дітей
Ця Послуга не призначена для осіб віком до 13 років. Я свідомо не збираю особисту інформацію від дітей молодше 13 років. У разі виявлення, що дитина молодше 13 років надала мені особисту інформацію, я негайно видаляю її з наших серверів. Якщо ви є батьком або опікуном і знаєте, що ваша дитина надала нам особисту інформацію, зв’яжіться зі мною, щоб я міг вжити необхідних заходів.
Зміни в цій Політиці конфіденційності
Я можу час від часу оновлювати нашу Політику конфіденційності. Таким чином, вам рекомендується періодично переглядати цю сторінку на предмет змін. Я повідомлю вам про будь-які зміни, розмістивши нову Політику конфіденційності на цій сторінці.
Зв’яжіться з нами
Якщо у вас є будь-які запитання або пропозиції щодо моєї Політики конфіденційності, не соромтеся звертатися до мене за адресою enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Italian
Politica sulla riservatezza
Artur Kolesnykov ha creato l’app come app Freemium. Questo SERVIZIO è fornito da Artur Kolesnykov senza alcun costo ed è inteso per l’uso così com’è.
Questa pagina viene utilizzata per informare i visitatori in merito alle mie politiche con la raccolta, l’uso e la divulgazione delle informazioni personali se qualcuno decide di utilizzare il mio servizio.
Se scegli di utilizzare il mio servizio, accetti la raccolta e l’uso delle informazioni in relazione a questa politica. Le informazioni personali che raccolgo vengono utilizzate per fornire e migliorare il servizio. Non userò o condividerò le tue informazioni con nessuno tranne come descritto nella presente Informativa sulla privacy.
I termini utilizzati nella presente Informativa sulla privacy hanno lo stesso significato dei nostri Termini e condizioni, accessibili dall’app se non diversamente definito nella presente Informativa sulla privacy.
Raccolta e utilizzo delle informazioni
Per una migliore esperienza, durante l’utilizzo del nostro Servizio, potrei chiederti di fornirci alcune informazioni di identificazione personale. Le informazioni che richiedo verranno conservate sul tuo dispositivo e non verranno raccolte da me in alcun modo.
Dati di registro
Voglio informarti che ogni volta che utilizzi il mio Servizio, in caso di errore nell’app raccolgo dati e informazioni (tramite prodotti di terze parti) sul tuo telefono chiamati Log Data. Questi dati di registro possono includere informazioni come l’indirizzo del protocollo Internet («IP») del dispositivo, il nome del dispositivo, la versione del sistema operativo, la configurazione dell’app quando si utilizza il mio servizio, l’ora e la data di utilizzo del servizio e altre statistiche .
Biscotti
I cookie sono file con una piccola quantità di dati che vengono comunemente utilizzati come identificatori univoci anonimi. Questi vengono inviati al tuo browser dai siti web che visiti e vengono memorizzati nella memoria interna del tuo dispositivo.
Questo servizio non utilizza questi «cookie» esplicitamente. Tuttavia, l’app può utilizzare codice e librerie di terze parti che utilizzano «cookie» per raccogliere informazioni e migliorare i propri servizi. Hai la possibilità di accettare o rifiutare questi cookie e sapere quando un cookie viene inviato al tuo dispositivo. Se scegli di rifiutare i nostri cookie, potresti non essere in grado di utilizzare alcune parti di questo servizio.
Fornitori di servizi
Posso assumere società e individui di terze parti per i seguenti motivi:
Per facilitare il nostro servizio;
Per fornire il Servizio per nostro conto;
Per eseguire servizi relativi ai servizi; o
Per aiutarci ad analizzare come viene utilizzato il nostro Servizio.
Voglio informare gli utenti di questo servizio che queste terze parti hanno accesso alle tue informazioni personali. Il motivo è eseguire i compiti loro assegnati per nostro conto. Tuttavia, sono obbligati a non divulgare o utilizzare le informazioni per nessun altro scopo.
Possiamo utilizzare Smartlook, che è una soluzione di analisi. Smartlook può registrare: schermate visitate, modelli di interazione (come azioni sullo schermo, gesti: tocchi, scorre) e dettagli del dispositivo (tipo, versione, modello, sistema operativo). Stiamo utilizzando le informazioni raccolte da Smartlook per migliorare la nostra app.
Smartlook non raccoglie informazioni di identificazione personale e non tiene traccia delle tue abitudini di navigazione tra le app.
Pubblicità
La nostra app utilizza Appodeal per la mediazione e la monetizzazione degli annunci. Appodeal raccoglie alcuni dati, tra cui il tuo indirizzo IP e l’ID pubblicitario, per fornire annunci personalizzati e non personalizzati. Puoi consultare l’informativa sulla privacy di Appodeal qui:
Informativa sulla Privacy di Appodeal
.
Sicurezza
Apprezzo la tua fiducia nel fornirci le tue informazioni personali, quindi ci sforziamo di utilizzare mezzi commercialmente accettabili per proteggerle. Ma ricorda che nessun metodo di trasmissione su Internet o metodo di archiviazione elettronica è sicuro e affidabile al 100% e non posso garantirne l’assoluta sicurezza.
Collegamenti ad altri siti
Questo servizio può contenere collegamenti ad altri siti. Se fai clic su un collegamento di terze parti, verrai indirizzato a quel sito. Tieni presente che questi siti esterni non sono gestiti da me. Pertanto, ti consiglio vivamente di rivedere l’Informativa sulla privacy di questi siti Web. Non ho alcun controllo e non mi assumo alcuna responsabilità per il contenuto, le politiche sulla privacy o le pratiche di qualsiasi sito o servizio di terze parti.
Privacy dei minori
Questi Servizi non sono rivolti a persone di età inferiore ai 13 anni. Non raccolgo consapevolmente informazioni di identificazione personale da bambini di età inferiore a 13 anni. Nel caso in cui scopro che un bambino di età inferiore a 13 anni mi ha fornito informazioni personali, le cancello immediatamente dai nostri server. Se sei un genitore o un tutore e sei consapevole del fatto che tuo figlio ci ha fornito informazioni personali, contattami in modo che possa eseguire le azioni necessarie.
Modifiche alla presente informativa sulla privacy
Potrei aggiornare la nostra politica sulla privacy di volta in volta. Pertanto, si consiglia di rivedere periodicamente questa pagina per eventuali modifiche. Ti informerò di eventuali modifiche pubblicando la nuova Informativa sulla privacy in questa pagina.
Contattaci
Se hai domande o suggerimenti sulla mia politica sulla privacy, non esitare a contattarmi a enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
France
Politique de confidentialité
Artur Kolesnykov a construit l’application en tant qu’application Freemium. Ce SERVICE est fourni par Artur Kolesnykov sans frais et est destiné à être utilisé tel quel.
Cette page est utilisée pour informer les visiteurs de mes politiques en matière de collecte, d’utilisation et de divulgation de renseignements personnels si quelqu’un décide d’utiliser mon service.
Si vous choisissez d’utiliser mon service, vous acceptez la collecte et l’utilisation des informations relatives à cette politique. Les informations personnelles que je recueille sont utilisées pour fournir et améliorer le service. Je n’utiliserai ni ne partagerai vos informations avec qui que ce soit, sauf dans les cas décrits dans la présente politique de confidentialité.
Les termes utilisés dans cette politique de confidentialité ont la même signification que dans nos conditions générales, qui sont accessibles sur l’application, sauf indication contraire dans la présente politique de confidentialité.
Collecte et utilisation des informations
Pour une meilleure expérience, lors de l’utilisation de notre service, je peux vous demander de nous fournir certaines informations personnellement identifiables. Les informations que je demande seront conservées sur votre appareil et ne seront en aucun cas collectées par moi.
Données du journal
Je tiens à vous informer que chaque fois que vous utilisez mon Service, en cas d’erreur dans l’application, je collecte des données et des informations (via des produits tiers) sur votre téléphone appelées Données de journal. Ces données de journal peuvent inclure des informations telles que l’adresse IP (Internet Protocol) de votre appareil, le nom de l’appareil, la version du système d’exploitation, la configuration de l’application lors de l’utilisation de mon service, l’heure et la date de votre utilisation du service et d’autres statistiques. .
Biscuits
Les cookies sont des fichiers contenant une petite quantité de données qui sont couramment utilisés comme identifiants uniques anonymes. Ceux-ci sont envoyés à votre navigateur à partir des sites Web que vous visitez et sont stockés dans la mémoire interne de votre appareil.
Ce service n’utilise pas ces «cookies» de manière explicite. Cependant, l’application peut utiliser du code tiers et des bibliothèques qui utilisent des «cookies» pour collecter des informations et améliorer leurs services. Vous avez la possibilité d’accepter ou de refuser ces cookies et de savoir quand un cookie est envoyé à votre appareil. Si vous choisissez de refuser nos cookies, vous ne pourrez peut-être pas utiliser certaines parties de ce service.
Les fournisseurs de services
Je peux employer des sociétés tierces et des particuliers pour les raisons suivantes:
Pour faciliter notre service;
Pour fournir le service en notre nom;
Pour effectuer des services liés au service; ou alors
Pour nous aider à analyser la manière dont notre service est utilisé.
Je souhaite informer les utilisateurs de ce service que ces tiers ont accès à vos informations personnelles. La raison est d’accomplir les tâches qui leur sont confiées en notre nom. Cependant, ils sont tenus de ne pas divulguer ni utiliser les informations à d’autres fins.
Nous pouvons utiliser Smartlook, qui est une solution d’analyse. Smartlook peut enregistrer: les écrans visités, les modèles d’interaction (tels que les actions sur l’écran, les gestes: tapotements, défilement) et les détails de l’appareil (type, version, modèle, système d’exploitation). Nous utilisons les informations collectées par Smartlook pour améliorer notre application.
Smartlook ne collecte pas d’informations personnellement identifiables et ne suit pas vos habitudes de navigation dans les applications.
Publicité
Notre application utilise Appodeal pour la médiation et la monétisation des annonces. Appodeal collecte certaines données, y compris votre adresse IP et votre identifiant publicitaire, afin de diffuser des annonces personnalisées et non personnalisées. Vous pouvez consulter la politique de confidentialité d’Appodeal ici :
Politique de Confidentialité d’Appodeal
.
Sécurité
J’apprécie votre confiance en nous fournissant vos informations personnelles, c’est pourquoi nous nous efforçons d’utiliser des moyens commercialement acceptables pour les protéger. Mais rappelez-vous qu’aucune méthode de transmission sur Internet, ni aucune méthode de stockage électronique n’est sûre et fiable à 100%, et je ne peux pas garantir sa sécurité absolue.
Liens vers d’autres sites
Ce service peut contenir des liens vers d’autres sites. Si vous cliquez sur un lien tiers, vous serez dirigé vers ce site. Notez que ces sites externes ne sont pas exploités par moi. Par conséquent, je vous conseille vivement de consulter la politique de confidentialité de ces sites Web. Je n’ai aucun contrôle et n’assume aucune responsabilité pour le contenu, les politiques de confidentialité ou les pratiques de tout site ou service tiers.
Confidentialité des enfants
Ces Services ne s’adressent à personne de moins de 13 ans. Je ne collecte pas sciemment des informations personnellement identifiables d’enfants de moins de 13 ans. Si je découvre qu’un enfant de moins de 13 ans m’a fourni des informations personnelles, je les supprime immédiatement de nos serveurs. Si vous êtes un parent ou un tuteur et que vous savez que votre enfant nous a fourni des informations personnelles, veuillez me contacter afin que je puisse faire les actions nécessaires.
Modifications de cette politique de confidentialité
Je peux mettre à jour notre politique de confidentialité de temps à autre. Ainsi, il vous est conseillé de revoir cette page périodiquement pour tout changement. Je vous informerai de tout changement en publiant la nouvelle politique de confidentialité sur cette page.
Nous contacter
Si vous avez des questions ou des suggestions concernant ma politique de confidentialité, n’hésitez pas à me contacter à enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Spain
Política de privacidad
Artur Kolesnykov creó la aplicación como una aplicación Freemium. Este SERVICIO es proporcionado por Artur Kolesnykov sin costo y está diseñado para usarse tal cual.
Esta página se utiliza para informar a los visitantes sobre mis políticas con la recopilación, el uso y la divulgación de Información personal si alguien decide utilizar mi Servicio.
Si elige utilizar mi Servicio, entonces acepta la recopilación y el uso de información en relación con esta política. La información personal que recopilo se utiliza para proporcionar y mejorar el servicio. No usaré ni compartiré su información con nadie excepto como se describe en esta Política de Privacidad.
Los términos utilizados en esta Política de privacidad tienen el mismo significado que en nuestros Términos y condiciones, a los que se puede acceder en la aplicación a menos que se defina lo contrario en esta Política de privacidad.
Recopilación y uso de información
Para una mejor experiencia, mientras utiliza nuestro Servicio, es posible que le pida que nos proporcione cierta información de identificación personal. La información que solicito se conservará en su dispositivo y no la recopilaré de ninguna manera.
Dato de registro
Quiero informarle que cada vez que utiliza mi Servicio, en caso de error en la aplicación, recopilo datos e información (a través de productos de terceros) en su teléfono llamado Datos de registro. Estos Datos de registro pueden incluir información como la dirección de Protocolo de Internet («IP») de su dispositivo, el nombre del dispositivo, la versión del sistema operativo, la configuración de la aplicación cuando utiliza mi Servicio, la hora y fecha de su uso del Servicio y otras estadísticas. .
Galletas
Las cookies son archivos con una pequeña cantidad de datos que se utilizan comúnmente como identificadores únicos anónimos. Estos se envían a su navegador desde los sitios web que visita y se almacenan en la memoria interna de su dispositivo.
Este Servicio no utiliza estas «cookies» explícitamente. Sin embargo, la aplicación puede utilizar códigos de terceros y bibliotecas que utilizan «cookies» para recopilar información y mejorar sus servicios. Tiene la opción de aceptar o rechazar estas cookies y saber cuándo se envía una cookie a su dispositivo. Si opta por rechazar nuestras cookies, es posible que no pueda utilizar algunas partes de este Servicio.
Proveedores de servicio
Puedo emplear empresas e individuos de terceros por las siguientes razones:
Para facilitar nuestro Servicio;
Para proporcionar el Servicio en nuestro nombre;
Para realizar servicios relacionados con el Servicio; o
Para ayudarnos a analizar cómo se utiliza nuestro Servicio.
Quiero informar a los usuarios de este Servicio que estos terceros tienen acceso a su Información personal. El motivo es realizar las tareas que se les asignen en nuestro nombre. Sin embargo, están obligados a no divulgar ni utilizar la información para ningún otro propósito.
Podemos utilizar Smartlook, que es una solución de análisis. Smartlook puede registrar: pantallas visitadas, patrones de interacción (como acciones de pantalla, gestos: toques, desplazamientos) y detalles del dispositivo (tipo, versión, modelo, sistema operativo). Utilizamos la información recopilada por Smartlook para mejorar nuestra aplicación.
Smartlook no recopila información de identificación personal y no rastrea sus hábitos de navegación en las aplicaciones.
Publicidad
Nuestra aplicación utiliza Appodeal para la mediación y monetización de anuncios. Appodeal recopila ciertos datos, incluida tu dirección IP y el ID de publicidad, para mostrar anuncios personalizados y no personalizados. Puedes revisar la política de privacidad de Appodeal aquí:
Política de Privacidad de Appodeal
.
Seguridad
Valoro su confianza al proporcionarnos su información personal, por lo que nos esforzamos por utilizar medios comercialmente aceptables para protegerla. Pero recuerde que ningún método de transmisión a través de Internet o método de almacenamiento electrónico es 100% seguro y confiable, y no puedo garantizar su absoluta seguridad.
Enlaces a otros sitios
Este Servicio puede contener enlaces a otros sitios. Si hace clic en un enlace de un tercero, se le dirigirá a ese sitio. Tenga en cuenta que estos sitios externos no son operados por mí. Por lo tanto, le recomiendo encarecidamente que revise la Política de privacidad de estos sitios web. No tengo control ni asumo ninguna responsabilidad por el contenido, las políticas de privacidad o las prácticas de los sitios o servicios de terceros.
Privacidad de los niños
Estos Servicios no se dirigen a nadie menor de 13 años. No recopilo a sabiendas información de identificación personal de niños menores de 13 años. En caso de que descubra que un niño menor de 13 años me ha proporcionado información personal, la elimino inmediatamente de nuestros servidores. Si usted es un padre o tutor y sabe que su hijo nos ha proporcionado información personal, comuníquese conmigo para que pueda realizar las acciones necesarias.
Cambios a esta política de privacidad
Puedo actualizar nuestra Política de privacidad de vez en cuando. Por lo tanto, le recomendamos que revise esta página periódicamente para ver si hay cambios. Le notificaré cualquier cambio publicando la nueva Política de privacidad en esta página.
Contáctenos
Si tiene alguna pregunta o sugerencia sobre mi Política de privacidad, no dude en ponerse en contacto conmigo en enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Turkish
Gizlilik Politikası
Artur Kolesnykov, uygulamayı bir Freemium uygulaması olarak oluşturdu. Bu HİZMET, Artur Kolesnykov tarafından ücretsiz olarak sağlanmaktadır ve olduğu gibi kullanılması amaçlanmıştır.
Bu sayfa, herhangi biri Hizmetimi kullanmaya karar verirse, Kişisel Bilgilerin toplanması, kullanılması ve ifşa edilmesiyle ilgili politikalarım hakkında ziyaretçileri bilgilendirmek için kullanılır.
Hizmetimi kullanmayı seçerseniz, bu politikayla ilgili bilgilerin toplanmasını ve kullanılmasını kabul etmiş olursunuz. Topladığım Kişisel Bilgiler, Hizmeti sağlamak ve geliştirmek için kullanılır. Bilgilerinizi bu Gizlilik Politikasında açıklananlar dışında kullanmayacağım veya kimseyle paylaşmayacağım.
Bu Gizlilik Politikasında kullanılan terimler, bu Gizlilik Politikasında aksi belirtilmedikçe, uygulamada erişilebilen Hüküm ve Koşullarımızdakiyle aynı anlamlara sahiptir.
Bilgi Toplama ve Kullanım
Daha iyi bir deneyim için Hizmetimizi kullanırken, bize kişisel olarak tanımlanabilir bazı bilgiler vermenizi isteyebilirim. İstediğim bilgiler cihazınızda tutulacak ve hiçbir şekilde tarafımdan toplanmayacaktır.
Günlük Verileri
Hizmetimi her kullandığınızda, uygulamada bir hata olması durumunda, telefonunuzdaki Log Data adlı veri ve bilgileri (üçüncü taraf ürünler aracılığıyla) topladığımı size bildirmek isterim. Bu Günlük Verileri, cihazınızın İnternet Protokolü (“IP”) adresi, cihaz adı, işletim sistemi sürümü, Hizmetimi kullanırken uygulamanın yapılandırması, Hizmeti kullanımınızın saati ve tarihi ve diğer istatistikler gibi bilgileri içerebilir. .
Kurabiye
Çerezler, genellikle anonim benzersiz tanımlayıcılar olarak kullanılan az miktarda veri içeren dosyalardır. Bunlar, ziyaret ettiğiniz web sitelerinden tarayıcınıza gönderilir ve cihazınızın dahili hafızasında saklanır.
Bu Hizmet, bu «çerezleri» açıkça kullanmaz. Ancak uygulama, bilgi toplamak ve hizmetlerini iyileştirmek için üçüncü taraf kodu ve «çerezler» kullanan kitaplıklar kullanabilir. Bu tanımlama bilgilerini kabul etme veya reddetme seçeneğine sahipsiniz ve cihazınıza bir tanımlama bilgisinin ne zaman gönderildiğini bilirsiniz. Çerezlerimizi reddetmeyi seçerseniz, bu Hizmetin bazı kısımlarını kullanamayabilirsiniz.
Servis sağlayıcıları
Aşağıdaki nedenlerden dolayı üçüncü taraf şirketleri ve bireyleri istihdam edebilirim:
Hizmetimizi kolaylaştırmak için;
Hizmeti bizim adımıza sağlamak için;
Hizmetle ilgili hizmetleri gerçekleştirmek için; veya
Hizmetimizin nasıl kullanıldığını analiz etmemize yardımcı olmak için.
Bu Hizmetin kullanıcılarını, bu üçüncü tarafların Kişisel Bilgilerinize erişimi olduğu konusunda bilgilendirmek istiyorum. Sebebi ise kendilerine verilen görevleri bizim adımıza yerine getirmektir. Ancak, bilgileri başka bir amaçla açıklamamak veya kullanmamakla yükümlüdürler.
Bir analitik çözümü olan Smartlook’u kullanabiliriz. Smartlook şunları kaydedebilir: Ziyaret edilen ekranlar, Etkileşim kalıpları (ekran eylemleri, hareketler: dokunmalar, kaydırmalar) ve Cihaz ayrıntıları (Tür, Sürüm, Model, İşletim Sistemi). Uygulamamızı geliştirmek için Smartlook tarafından toplanan bilgileri kullanıyoruz.
Smartlook, kişisel olarak tanımlanabilir bilgileri toplamaz ve uygulamalar arasında gezinme alışkanlıklarınızı izlemez.
Reklamcılık
Uygulamamız, reklam aracılığı ve para kazanma için Appodeal kullanır. Appodeal, kişiselleştirilmiş ve kişiselleştirilmemiş reklamlar sunmak amacıyla IP adresiniz ve reklam kimliğiniz de dahil olmak üzere belirli verileri toplar. Appodeal’in gizlilik politikasını buradan inceleyebilirsiniz:
Appodeal Gizlilik Politikası
.
Güvenlik
Bize Kişisel Bilgilerinizi sağlama konusundaki güveninize değer veriyorum, bu nedenle ticari olarak kabul edilebilir koruma yöntemlerini kullanmaya çalışıyoruz. Ancak internet üzerinden hiçbir aktarım yönteminin veya elektronik depolama yönteminin %100 güvenli ve güvenilir olmadığını ve mutlak güvenliğini garanti edemediğimi unutmayın.
Diğer Sitelere Bağlantılar
Bu Hizmet, diğer sitelere bağlantılar içerebilir. Üçüncü taraf bir bağlantıya tıklarsanız, o siteye yönlendirilirsiniz. Bu harici sitelerin benim tarafımdan işletilmediğini unutmayın. Bu nedenle, bu web sitelerinin Gizlilik Politikasını incelemenizi şiddetle tavsiye ederim. Herhangi bir üçüncü taraf site veya hizmetin içeriği, gizlilik politikaları veya uygulamaları üzerinde hiçbir kontrolüm ve sorumluluğum yoktur.
Çocukların Gizliliği
Bu Hizmetler 13 yaşın altındaki hiç kimseye hitap etmez. 13 yaşın altındaki çocuklardan bilerek kişisel olarak tanımlanabilir bilgiler toplamıyorum. 13 yaşın altındaki bir çocuğun bana kişisel bilgiler verdiğini keşfetmem durumunda, bunu sunucularımızdan derhal silerim. Ebeveyn veya vasi iseniz ve çocuğunuzun bize kişisel bilgiler verdiğini biliyorsanız, gerekli işlemleri yapabilmem için lütfen benimle iletişime geçin.
Bu Gizlilik Politikasındaki Değişiklikler
Gizlilik Politikamızı zaman zaman güncelleyebilirim. Bu nedenle, herhangi bir değişiklik için bu sayfayı periyodik olarak gözden geçirmeniz önerilir. Bu sayfada yeni Gizlilik Politikasını yayınlayarak herhangi bir değişiklik hakkında sizi bilgilendireceğim.
Bizimle iletişime geçin
Gizlilik Politikam hakkında herhangi bir sorunuz veya öneriniz varsa, enzoapps.info@gmail.com adresinden benimle iletişime geçmekten çekinmeyin.
Danish
Fortrolighedspolitik
Artur Kolesnykov byggede appen som en Freemium -app. Denne SERVICE leveres gratis af Artur Kolesnykov og er beregnet til brug som den er.
Denne side bruges til at informere besøgende om mine politikker med indsamling, brug og videregivelse af personlige oplysninger, hvis nogen besluttede at bruge min service.
Hvis du vælger at bruge min service, accepterer du indsamling og brug af oplysninger i forhold til denne politik. De personlige oplysninger, som jeg indsamler, bruges til at levere og forbedre tjenesten. Jeg vil ikke bruge eller dele dine oplysninger med nogen, undtagen som beskrevet i denne fortrolighedspolitik.
De udtryk, der bruges i denne fortrolighedspolitik, har de samme betydninger som i vores vilkår og betingelser, som er tilgængelige i appen, medmindre andet er defineret i denne fortrolighedspolitik.
Informationsindsamling og brug
For en bedre oplevelse, mens du bruger vores service, kan jeg kræve, at du giver os visse personligt identificerbare oplysninger. De oplysninger, jeg anmoder om, opbevares på din enhed og indsamles ikke på nogen måde af mig.
Logdata
Jeg vil gerne informere dig om, at hver gang du bruger min service, i tilfælde af en fejl i appen indsamler jeg data og oplysninger (via tredjepartsprodukter) på din telefon kaldet Log Data. Disse logdata kan indeholde oplysninger som f.eks. Din enheds internetprotokol («IP») adresse, enhedsnavn, operativsystemversion, konfiguration af appen ved brug af min service, tidspunkt og dato for din brug af tjenesten og anden statistik .
Cookies
Cookies er filer med en lille mængde data, der normalt bruges som anonyme unikke identifikatorer. Disse sendes til din browser fra de websteder, du besøger, og gemmes i din enheds interne hukommelse.
Denne service bruger ikke disse «cookies» eksplicit. App’en kan dog bruge tredjepartskode og biblioteker, der bruger «cookies» til at indsamle oplysninger og forbedre deres tjenester. Du har mulighed for enten at acceptere eller afvise disse cookies og vide, hvornår en cookie sendes til din enhed. Hvis du vælger at nægte vores cookies, kan du muligvis ikke bruge nogle dele af denne service.
Service-udøvere
Jeg kan ansætte tredjepartsvirksomheder og enkeltpersoner af følgende årsager:
For at lette vores service;
At levere tjenesten på vores vegne;
At udføre service-relaterede tjenester; eller
For at hjælpe os med at analysere, hvordan vores service bruges.
Jeg vil informere brugere af denne service om, at disse tredjeparter har adgang til dine personlige oplysninger. Årsagen er at udføre de opgaver, der er tildelt dem på vores vegne. De er dog forpligtet til ikke at videregive eller bruge oplysningerne til andre formål.
Vi kan bruge Smartlook, som er en analyseløsning. Smartlook kan registrere: Besøgte skærme, Interaktionsmønstre (såsom skærmhandlinger, gestus: tryk, ruller) og Enhedsoplysninger (Type, Version, Model, Operativsystem). Vi bruger de oplysninger, der er indsamlet af Smartlook til at forbedre vores app.
Smartlook indsamler ikke personligt identificerbare oplysninger og sporer ikke dine browservaner på tværs af apps.
Sikkerhed
Jeg værdsætter din tillid til at give os dine personlige oplysninger, og derfor bestræber vi os på at bruge kommercielt acceptable midler til at beskytte dem. Men husk, at ingen overførselsmetode over internettet eller elektronisk lagringsmetode er 100% sikker og pålidelig, og jeg kan ikke garantere dens absolutte sikkerhed.
Links til andre websteder
Denne service kan indeholde links til andre websteder. Hvis du klikker på et tredjepartslink, bliver du dirigeret til dette websted. Bemærk, at disse eksterne websteder ikke drives af mig. Derfor råder jeg dig kraftigt til at gennemgå disse websteders fortrolighedspolitik. Jeg har ingen kontrol over og påtager mig intet ansvar for indhold, fortrolighedspolitikker eller praksis på tredjepartswebsteder eller -tjenester.
Børns privatliv
Disse tjenester henvender sig ikke til nogen under 13 år. Jeg indsamler ikke bevidst personlige identificerbare oplysninger fra børn under 13. I tilfælde af at jeg opdager, at et barn under 13 år har givet mig personlige oplysninger, sletter jeg det straks fra vores servere. Hvis du er forælder eller værge, og du er klar over, at dit barn har givet os personlige oplysninger, bedes du kontakte mig, så jeg kan foretage de nødvendige handlinger.
Ændringer af denne fortrolighedspolitik
Jeg kan fra tid til anden opdatere vores fortrolighedspolitik. Derfor rådes du til at gennemgå denne side med jævne mellemrum for eventuelle ændringer. Jeg giver dig besked om eventuelle ændringer ved at sende den nye fortrolighedspolitik på denne side.
Kontakt os
Hvis du har spørgsmål eller forslag til min fortrolighedspolitik, tøv ikke med at kontakte mig på enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Finnish
Tietosuojakäytäntö
Artur Kolesnykov rakensi sovelluksen Freemium -sovellukseksi. Tämän PALVELUN tarjoaa Artur Kolesnykov ilmaiseksi ja se on tarkoitettu käytettäväksi sellaisenaan.
Tätä sivua käytetään informoimaan kävijöitä käytännöistäni, jotka koskevat henkilökohtaisten tietojen keräämistä, käyttöä ja paljastamista, jos joku päätti käyttää palveluani.
Jos päätät käyttää Palveluani, hyväksyt tämän käytännön mukaisten tietojen keräämisen ja käytön. Keräämiäni henkilötietoja käytetään Palvelun tarjoamiseen ja parantamiseen. En käytä tai jaa tietojasi kenellekään muulle kuin tässä tietosuojakäytännössä kuvatulla tavalla.
Tässä tietosuojakäytännössä käytetyillä termeillä on samat merkitykset kuin käyttöehdoissamme, jotka ovat saatavilla sovelluksessa, ellei tässä tietosuojakäytännössä toisin määritetä.
Tietojen kerääminen ja käyttö
Paremman kokemuksen saamiseksi voin käyttää Palveluamme käyttäessäsi sinua antamaan meille tiettyjä henkilötietoja. Pyydetyt tiedot säilytetään laitteellasi, enkä kerää niitä millään tavalla.
Lokitiedot
Haluan ilmoittaa teille, että aina kun käytät Palveluani, kerään sovelluksen virheen sattuessa tietoja ja tietoja (kolmannen osapuolen tuotteiden kautta) puhelimeesi nimeltä Lokitiedot. Nämä lokitiedot voivat sisältää tietoja, kuten laitteen Internet -yhteyskäytännön (”IP”) osoitteen, laitteen nimen, käyttöjärjestelmän version, sovelluksen kokoonpanon Palvelua käytettäessä, Palvelun käytön kellonajan ja päivämäärän sekä muita tilastoja .
Keksit
Evästeet ovat tiedostoja, joissa on pieni määrä dataa ja joita käytetään yleisesti nimettöminä yksilöllisinä tunnisteina. Nämä lähetetään selaimeesi vierailluilta sivustoilta ja tallennetaan laitteen sisäiseen muistiin.
Tämä palvelu ei käytä näitä «evästeitä» nimenomaisesti. Sovellus voi kuitenkin käyttää kolmannen osapuolen koodia ja evästeitä käyttäviä kirjastoja tietojen keräämiseen ja palvelujensa parantamiseen. Sinulla on mahdollisuus joko hyväksyä tai hylätä nämä evästeet ja tietää, milloin eväste lähetetään laitteellesi. Jos päätät kieltäytyä evästeistämme, et ehkä voi käyttää joitakin tämän palvelun osia.
Palveluntarjoajat
Voin palkata kolmannen osapuolen yrityksiä ja yksityishenkilöitä seuraavista syistä:
Palvelumme helpottamiseksi;
Palvelun tarjoamiseksi puolestamme;
Palveluihin liittyvien palvelujen suorittaminen tai
Auttaa meitä analysoimaan Palvelumme käyttöä.
Haluan ilmoittaa tämän palvelun käyttäjille, että näillä kolmansilla osapuolilla on pääsy henkilötietoihisi. Syynä on suorittaa heille annetut tehtävät puolestamme. He ovat kuitenkin velvollisia olemaan paljastamatta tai käyttämättä tietoja mihinkään muuhun tarkoitukseen.
Voimme käyttää Smartlookia, joka on analytiikkaratkaisu. Smartlook voi tallentaa: näytöt, jotka on käyty, vuorovaikutuskuviot (kuten näytön toiminnot, eleet: napautukset, vieritykset) ja laitteen tiedot (tyyppi, versio, malli, käyttöjärjestelmä). Käytämme Smartlookin keräämiä tietoja sovelluksemme parantamiseen.
Smartlook ei kerää henkilökohtaisia ​​tietoja eikä seuraa selaustottumuksiasi eri sovelluksissa.
Turvallisuus
Arvostan luottamustasi antaa meille henkilökohtaisia ​​tietojasi, joten pyrimme käyttämään kaupallisesti hyväksyttäviä keinoja niiden suojaamiseksi. Muista kuitenkin, että mikään Internetin välitysmenetelmä tai sähköinen tallennusmenetelmä ei ole 100% turvallinen ja luotettava, enkä voi taata sen ehdotonta turvallisuutta.
Linkit muihin sivustoihin
Tämä palvelu voi sisältää linkkejä muille sivustoille. Jos napsautat kolmannen osapuolen linkkiä, sinut ohjataan kyseiselle sivustolle. Huomaa, että en käytä näitä ulkoisia sivustoja. Siksi suosittelen lämpimästi tutustumaan näiden verkkosivustojen tietosuojakäytäntöön. En hallitse kolmansien osapuolien sivustojen tai palveluiden sisältöä, tietosuojakäytäntöjä tai käytäntöjä enkä ole niistä vastuussa.
Lasten yksityisyys
Nämä palvelut eivät ole tarkoitettu alle 13 -vuotiaille. En kerää tietoisesti alle 13 -vuotiailta lapsilta tunnistettavia tietoja. Jos huomaan, että alle 13 -vuotias lapsi on antanut minulle henkilökohtaisia ​​tietoja, poistan ne välittömästi palvelimiltamme. Jos olet vanhempi tai huoltaja ja tiedät, että lapsesi on antanut meille henkilökohtaisia ​​tietoja, ota yhteyttä minuun, jotta voin tehdä tarvittavat toimenpiteet.
Muutokset tähän tietosuojakäytäntöön
Voin päivittää tietosuojakäytäntöämme aika ajoin. Siksi sinun kannattaa tarkistaa tämä sivu säännöllisesti mahdollisten muutosten varalta. Ilmoitan muutoksista julkaisemalla uuden tietosuojakäytännön tälle sivulle.
Ota meihin yhteyttä
Jos sinulla on kysyttävää tai ehdotuksia tietosuojakäytännöstäni, älä epäröi ottaa minuun yhteyttä osoitteeseen enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Greek
Πολιτική απορρήτου
Ο Artur Kolesnykov δημιούργησε την εφαρμογή ως εφαρμογή Freemium. Αυτή η ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΑ παρέχεται από τον Artur Kolesnykov χωρίς κόστος και προορίζεται για χρήση ως έχει.
Αυτή η σελίδα χρησιμοποιείται για την ενημέρωση των επισκεπτών σχετικά με τις πολιτικές μου σχετικά με τη συλλογή, χρήση και αποκάλυψη Προσωπικών Πληροφοριών εάν κάποιος αποφάσισε να χρησιμοποιήσει την Υπηρεσία μου.
Εάν επιλέξετε να χρησιμοποιήσετε την Υπηρεσία μου, τότε συμφωνείτε με τη συλλογή και τη χρήση πληροφοριών σε σχέση με αυτήν την πολιτική. Οι προσωπικές πληροφορίες που συλλέγω χρησιμοποιούνται για την παροχή και τη βελτίωση της Υπηρεσίας. Δεν θα χρησιμοποιήσω ούτε θα μοιραστώ τις πληροφορίες σας με κανέναν παρά μόνο όπως περιγράφεται στην παρούσα Πολιτική Απορρήτου.
Οι όροι που χρησιμοποιούνται σε αυτήν την Πολιτική Απορρήτου έχουν τις ίδιες έννοιες με τους Όρους και τις Προϋποθέσεις μας, οι οποίοι είναι προσβάσιμοι στην εφαρμογή, εκτός εάν ορίζεται διαφορετικά στην παρούσα Πολιτική Απορρήτου.
Συλλογή και χρήση πληροφοριών
Για καλύτερη εμπειρία, κατά τη χρήση της Υπηρεσίας μας, ενδέχεται να απαιτήσω να μας παράσχετε ορισμένες προσωπικά αναγνωρίσιμες πληροφορίες. Οι πληροφορίες που ζητώ θα διατηρηθούν στη συσκευή σας και δεν συλλέγονται από εμένα με κανέναν τρόπο.
Αρχεία καταγραφής
Θέλω να σας ενημερώσω ότι κάθε φορά που χρησιμοποιείτε την Υπηρεσία μου, σε περίπτωση σφάλματος στην εφαρμογή συλλέγω δεδομένα και πληροφορίες (μέσω προϊόντων τρίτων) στο τηλέφωνό σας που ονομάζονται Αρχεία καταγραφής. Αυτά τα δεδομένα καταγραφής ενδέχεται να περιλαμβάνουν πληροφορίες όπως τη διεύθυνση πρωτοκόλλου συσκευής («IP») της συσκευής σας, το όνομα της συσκευής, την έκδοση του λειτουργικού συστήματος, τη διαμόρφωση της εφαρμογής κατά τη χρήση της υπηρεσίας μου, την ώρα και την ημερομηνία χρήσης της Υπηρεσίας από εσάς και άλλα στατιστικά στοιχεία Ε
Μπισκότα
Τα cookie είναι αρχεία με μικρή ποσότητα δεδομένων που χρησιμοποιούνται συνήθως ως ανώνυμα μοναδικά αναγνωριστικά. Αυτά αποστέλλονται στο πρόγραμμα περιήγησής σας από τους ιστότοπους που επισκέπτεστε και αποθηκεύονται στην εσωτερική μνήμη της συσκευής σας.
Αυτή η Υπηρεσία δεν χρησιμοποιεί ρητά αυτά τα «cookies». Ωστόσο, η εφαρμογή ενδέχεται να χρησιμοποιεί κώδικα τρίτων και βιβλιοθήκες που χρησιμοποιούν «cookie» για τη συλλογή πληροφοριών και τη βελτίωση των υπηρεσιών τους. Έχετε την επιλογή είτε να αποδεχτείτε είτε να απορρίψετε αυτά τα cookie και να γνωρίζετε πότε αποστέλλεται ένα cookie στη συσκευή σας. Εάν επιλέξετε να αρνηθείτε τα cookies μας, ενδέχεται να μην μπορείτε να χρησιμοποιήσετε ορισμένα τμήματα αυτής της Υπηρεσίας.
Πάροχοι υπηρεσιών
Ενδέχεται να προσλάβω εταιρείες και ιδιώτες τρίτων για τους ακόλουθους λόγους:
Για τη διευκόλυνση της Υπηρεσίας μας.
Να παρέχουμε την Υπηρεσία για λογαριασμό μας.
Για την εκτέλεση υπηρεσιών που σχετίζονται με την Υπηρεσία. ή
Για να μας βοηθήσει στην ανάλυση του τρόπου με τον οποίο χρησιμοποιείται η Υπηρεσία μας.
Θέλω να ενημερώσω τους χρήστες αυτής της Υπηρεσίας ότι αυτά τα τρίτα μέρη έχουν πρόσβαση στις Προσωπικές σας Πληροφορίες. Ο λόγος είναι να εκτελέσουμε τις εργασίες που τους έχουν ανατεθεί για λογαριασμό μας. Ωστόσο, είναι υποχρεωμένοι να μην αποκαλύπτουν ή να χρησιμοποιούν τις πληροφορίες για οποιονδήποτε άλλο σκοπό.
Μπορεί να χρησιμοποιήσουμε το Smartlook, το οποίο είναι μια λύση ανάλυσης. Το Smartlook μπορεί να καταγράφει: Οθόνες που επισκέφθηκαν, Μοτίβα αλληλεπίδρασης (όπως ενέργειες οθόνης, χειρονομίες: πατήματα, κύλιση) και λεπτομέρειες συσκευής (Τύπος, έκδοση, μοντέλο, λειτουργικό σύστημα). Χρησιμοποιούμε τις πληροφορίες που συλλέγει το Smartlook για να βελτιώσουμε την εφαρμογή μας.
Το Smartlook δεν συλλέγει πληροφορίες προσωπικής ταυτοποίησης και δεν παρακολουθεί τις συνήθειες περιήγησής σας σε εφαρμογές.
Ασφάλεια
Εκτιμώ την εμπιστοσύνη σας στην παροχή των Προσωπικών σας Πληροφοριών, γι ‘αυτό προσπαθούμε να χρησιμοποιήσουμε εμπορικά αποδεκτά μέσα προστασίας τους. Αλλά θυμηθείτε ότι καμία μέθοδος μετάδοσης μέσω διαδικτύου ή μέθοδος ηλεκτρονικής αποθήκευσης δεν είναι 100% ασφαλής και αξιόπιστη και δεν μπορώ να εγγυηθώ την απόλυτη ασφάλειά της.
Σύνδεσμοι σε άλλους ιστότοπους
Αυτή η υπηρεσία ενδέχεται να περιέχει συνδέσμους προς άλλους ιστότοπους. Εάν κάνετε κλικ σε έναν σύνδεσμο τρίτου μέρους, θα οδηγηθείτε σε αυτόν τον ιστότοπο. Λάβετε υπόψη ότι αυτοί οι εξωτερικοί ιστότοποι δεν λειτουργούν από εμένα. Ως εκ τούτου, σας συνιστώ ανεπιφύλακτα να αναθεωρήσετε την Πολιτική Απορρήτου αυτών των ιστότοπων. Δεν έχω κανέναν έλεγχο και δεν αναλαμβάνω καμία ευθύνη για το περιεχόμενο, τις πολιτικές απορρήτου ή τις πρακτικές οποιωνδήποτε ιστότοπων ή υπηρεσιών τρίτων.
Ιδιωτικότητα των παιδιών
Αυτές οι Υπηρεσίες δεν απευθύνονται σε άτομα κάτω των 13 ετών. Δεν συλλέγω εν γνώσει μου προσωπικά αναγνωρίσιμα στοιχεία από παιδιά κάτω των 13 ετών. Στην περίπτωση που ανακαλύψω ότι ένα παιδί κάτω των 13 ετών μου έχει παράσχει προσωπικές πληροφορίες, το διαγράφω αμέσως από τους διακομιστές μας. Εάν είστε γονέας ή κηδεμόνας και γνωρίζετε ότι το παιδί σας μας έχει παράσχει προσωπικές πληροφορίες, επικοινωνήστε μαζί μου για να μπορέσω να κάνω τις απαραίτητες ενέργειες.
Αλλαγές σε αυτήν την πολιτική απορρήτου
Ενδέχεται να ενημερώνω την Πολιτική Απορρήτου μας κατά καιρούς. Συνεπώς, συνιστάται να ελέγχετε περιοδικά αυτήν τη σελίδα για τυχόν αλλαγές. Θα σας ενημερώσω για τυχόν αλλαγές δημοσιεύοντας τη νέα Πολιτική Απορρήτου σε αυτήν τη σελίδα.
Επικοινωνήστε μαζί μας
Εάν έχετε οποιεσδήποτε ερωτήσεις ή προτάσεις σχετικά με την Πολιτική Απορρήτου μου, μη διστάσετε να επικοινωνήσετε μαζί μου στη διεύθυνση enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Indonesian
Kebijakan pribadi
Artur Kolesnykov membangun aplikasi sebagai aplikasi Freemium. LAYANAN ini disediakan oleh Artur Kolesnykov tanpa biaya dan dimaksudkan untuk digunakan apa adanya.
Halaman ini digunakan untuk memberi tahu pengunjung mengenai kebijakan saya dengan pengumpulan, penggunaan, dan pengungkapan Informasi Pribadi jika ada yang memutuskan untuk menggunakan Layanan saya.
Jika Anda memilih untuk menggunakan Layanan saya, maka Anda menyetujui pengumpulan dan penggunaan informasi sehubungan dengan kebijakan ini. Informasi Pribadi yang saya kumpulkan digunakan untuk menyediakan dan meningkatkan Layanan. Saya tidak akan menggunakan atau membagikan informasi Anda dengan siapa pun kecuali sebagaimana dijelaskan dalam Kebijakan Privasi ini.
Istilah yang digunakan dalam Kebijakan Privasi ini memiliki arti yang sama seperti dalam Syarat dan Ketentuan kami, yang dapat diakses di aplikasi kecuali ditentukan lain dalam Kebijakan Privasi ini.
Pengumpulan dan Penggunaan Informasi
Untuk pengalaman yang lebih baik, saat menggunakan Layanan kami, saya mungkin meminta Anda untuk memberikan kami informasi pengenal pribadi tertentu. Informasi yang saya minta akan disimpan di perangkat Anda dan tidak saya kumpulkan dengan cara apa pun.
Data Log
Saya ingin memberi tahu Anda bahwa setiap kali Anda menggunakan Layanan saya, jika terjadi kesalahan dalam aplikasi, saya mengumpulkan data dan informasi (melalui produk pihak ketiga) di ponsel Anda yang disebut Data Log. Data Log ini dapat mencakup informasi seperti alamat Protokol Internet (“IP”) perangkat Anda, nama perangkat, versi sistem operasi, konfigurasi aplikasi saat menggunakan Layanan saya, waktu dan tanggal penggunaan Layanan oleh Anda, dan statistik lainnya .
Kue
Cookie adalah file dengan sejumlah kecil data yang biasanya digunakan sebagai pengidentifikasi unik anonim. Ini dikirim ke browser Anda dari situs web yang Anda kunjungi dan disimpan di memori internal perangkat Anda.
Layanan ini tidak menggunakan “cookies” ini secara eksplisit. Namun, aplikasi dapat menggunakan kode dan perpustakaan pihak ketiga yang menggunakan «cookies» untuk mengumpulkan informasi dan meningkatkan layanan mereka. Anda memiliki pilihan untuk menerima atau menolak cookie ini dan mengetahui kapan cookie dikirim ke perangkat Anda. Jika Anda memilih untuk menolak cookie kami, Anda mungkin tidak dapat menggunakan beberapa bagian dari Layanan ini.
Penyedia jasa
Saya dapat mempekerjakan perusahaan dan individu pihak ketiga karena alasan berikut:
Untuk memfasilitasi Layanan kami;
Untuk menyediakan Layanan atas nama kami;
Untuk melakukan layanan terkait Layanan; atau
Untuk membantu kami dalam menganalisis bagaimana Layanan kami digunakan.
Saya ingin memberi tahu pengguna Layanan ini bahwa pihak ketiga ini memiliki akses ke Informasi Pribadi Anda. Alasannya adalah untuk melakukan tugas yang diberikan kepada mereka atas nama kita. Namun, mereka berkewajiban untuk tidak mengungkapkan atau menggunakan informasi tersebut untuk tujuan lain.
Kami dapat menggunakan Smartlook, yang merupakan solusi analitik. Smartlook dapat merekam: Layar yang dikunjungi, Pola interaksi (seperti tindakan layar, gerakan: ketuk, gulir) dan Detail perangkat (Jenis, Versi, Model, Sistem Operasi). Kami menggunakan informasi yang dikumpulkan oleh Smartlook untuk meningkatkan aplikasi kami.
Smartlook tidak mengumpulkan informasi pengenal pribadi dan tidak melacak kebiasaan menjelajah Anda di seluruh aplikasi.
Keamanan
Saya menghargai kepercayaan Anda dalam memberikan Informasi Pribadi Anda kepada kami, oleh karena itu kami berusaha untuk menggunakan cara yang dapat diterima secara komersial untuk melindunginya. Tetapi ingat bahwa tidak ada metode transmisi melalui internet, atau metode penyimpanan elektronik yang 100% aman dan andal, dan saya tidak dapat menjamin keamanan mutlaknya.
Tautan ke Situs Lain
Layanan ini mungkin berisi tautan ke situs lain. Jika Anda mengklik tautan pihak ketiga, Anda akan diarahkan ke situs itu. Perhatikan bahwa situs eksternal ini tidak dioperasikan oleh saya. Oleh karena itu, saya sangat menyarankan Anda untuk meninjau Kebijakan Privasi situs web ini. Saya tidak memiliki kendali atas dan tidak bertanggung jawab atas konten, kebijakan privasi, atau praktik dari situs atau layanan pihak ketiga mana pun.
Privasi Anak-anak
Layanan ini tidak ditujukan kepada siapa pun yang berusia di bawah 13 tahun. Saya tidak dengan sengaja mengumpulkan informasi pengenal pribadi dari anak-anak di bawah 13 tahun. Jika saya menemukan bahwa seorang anak di bawah 13 tahun telah memberi saya informasi pribadi, saya segera menghapusnya dari server kami. Jika Anda adalah orang tua atau wali dan Anda mengetahui bahwa anak Anda telah memberikan informasi pribadi kepada kami, silakan hubungi saya sehingga saya dapat melakukan tindakan yang diperlukan.
Perubahan pada Kebijakan Privasi Ini
Saya dapat memperbarui Kebijakan Privasi kami dari waktu ke waktu. Oleh karena itu, Anda disarankan untuk meninjau halaman ini secara berkala untuk setiap perubahan. Saya akan memberi tahu Anda tentang perubahan apa pun dengan memposting Kebijakan Privasi baru di halaman ini.
Hubungi kami
Jika Anda memiliki pertanyaan atau saran tentang Kebijakan Privasi saya, jangan ragu untuk menghubungi saya di enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Norwegian
Personvernerklæring
Artur Kolesnykov bygde appen som en Freemium -app. Denne TJENESTE er levert av Artur Kolesnykov uten kostnad og er beregnet for bruk som den er.
Denne siden brukes til å informere besøkende om retningslinjene mine for innsamling, bruk og avsløring av personlig informasjon hvis noen bestemte seg for å bruke tjenesten min.
Hvis du velger å bruke tjenesten min, godtar du innsamling og bruk av informasjon i forhold til disse retningslinjene. Personopplysningene jeg samler inn brukes til å tilby og forbedre tjenesten. Jeg vil ikke bruke eller dele informasjonen din med noen, bortsett fra som beskrevet i denne personvernerklæringen.
Vilkårene som brukes i denne personvernerklæringen har de samme betydningene som i våre vilkår og betingelser, som er tilgjengelige i appen med mindre annet er definert i denne personvernerklæringen.
Informasjonsinnsamling og bruk
For en bedre opplevelse, mens du bruker tjenesten vår, kan jeg kreve at du gir oss personlig identifiserbar informasjon. Informasjonen jeg ber om vil bli beholdt på enheten din og blir ikke samlet av meg på noen måte.
Loggdata
Jeg vil informere deg om at når du bruker tjenesten min, samler jeg data og informasjon (via tredjepartsprodukter) på telefonen din som heter Loggdata i tilfelle feil. Disse loggdataene kan inneholde informasjon som enhetens internettprotokolladresse («IP»), enhetsnavn, operativsystemversjon, konfigurasjon av appen ved bruk av tjenesten min, klokkeslett og dato for din bruk av tjenesten og annen statistikk .
Informasjonskapsler
Informasjonskapsler er filer med en liten mengde data som vanligvis brukes som anonyme unike identifikatorer. Disse sendes til nettleseren din fra nettstedene du besøker, og lagres i enhetens interne minne.
Denne tjenesten bruker ikke disse «informasjonskapslene» eksplisitt. Imidlertid kan appen bruke tredjepartskode og biblioteker som bruker «informasjonskapsler» for å samle inn informasjon og forbedre tjenestene deres. Du har muligheten til å enten godta eller nekte disse informasjonskapslene og vite når en informasjonskapsel sendes til enheten din. Hvis du velger å nekte informasjonskapslene våre, er det ikke sikkert du kan bruke noen deler av denne tjenesten.
Tjenestetilbydere
Jeg kan ansette tredjeparts selskaper og enkeltpersoner av følgende årsaker:
For å lette vår tjeneste;
Å levere tjenesten på våre vegne;
For å utføre Tjenesterelaterte tjenester; eller
For å hjelpe oss med å analysere hvordan tjenesten vår brukes.
Jeg vil informere brukere av denne tjenesten om at disse tredjepartene har tilgang til dine personlige opplysninger. Årsaken er å utføre oppgavene som er tildelt dem på våre vegne. De er imidlertid forpliktet til ikke å avsløre eller bruke informasjonen til andre formål.
Vi kan bruke Smartlook, som er en analyseløsning. Smartlook kan registrere: Skjermbilder som er besøkt, interaksjonsmønstre (for eksempel skjermhandlinger, bevegelser: trykk, ruller) og enhetsdetaljer (type, versjon, modell, operativsystem). Vi bruker informasjonen som er samlet inn av Smartlook for å forbedre appen vår.
Smartlook samler ikke inn personlig identifiserbar informasjon og sporer ikke nettleservanene dine på tvers av apper.
Sikkerhet
Jeg verdsetter tilliten din til å gi oss dine personlige opplysninger, og derfor streber vi etter å bruke kommersielt akseptable midler for å beskytte den. Men husk at ingen overføringsmetode over internett eller elektronisk lagring er 100% sikker og pålitelig, og jeg kan ikke garantere dens absolutte sikkerhet.
Lenker til andre nettsteder
Denne tjenesten kan inneholde lenker til andre nettsteder. Hvis du klikker på en tredjeparts lenke, blir du dirigert til dette nettstedet. Vær oppmerksom på at disse eksterne nettstedene ikke drives av meg. Derfor anbefaler jeg deg sterkt å gå gjennom personvernerklæringen for disse nettstedene. Jeg har ingen kontroll over og påtar meg intet ansvar for innholdet, personvernreglene eller praksis på tredjeparts nettsteder eller tjenester.
Barnas personvern
Disse tjenestene henvender seg ikke til noen under 13 år. Jeg samler ikke bevisst personlig identifiserbar informasjon fra barn under 13. I tilfelle jeg oppdager at et barn under 13 år har gitt meg personlig informasjon, sletter jeg dette umiddelbart fra serverne våre. Hvis du er en forelder eller verge og du er klar over at barnet ditt har gitt oss personlig informasjon, vennligst kontakt meg slik at jeg kan gjøre nødvendige handlinger.
Endringer i denne personvernerklæringen
Jeg kan oppdatere våre retningslinjer for personvern fra tid til annen. Derfor anbefales du å gå gjennom denne siden med jevne mellomrom for eventuelle endringer. Jeg vil varsle deg om eventuelle endringer ved å legge ut den nye personvernerklæringen på denne siden.
Kontakt oss
Hvis du har spørsmål eller forslag til min personvernerklæring, ikke nøl med å kontakte meg på enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Swedish
Integritetspolicy
Artur Kolesnykov byggde appen som en Freemium -app. Denna TJÄNST tillhandahålls av Artur Kolesnykov utan kostnad och är avsedd att användas som den är.
Denna sida används för att informera besökare om min policy för insamling, användning och avslöjande av personlig information om någon bestämde sig för att använda min tjänst.
Om du väljer att använda min tjänst godkänner du insamling och användning av information i förhållande till denna policy. Den personliga information som jag samlar in används för att tillhandahålla och förbättra tjänsten. Jag kommer inte att använda eller dela din information med någon utom det som beskrivs i denna sekretesspolicy.
Termerna som används i denna sekretesspolicy har samma betydelser som i våra användarvillkor, som är tillgängliga i appen om inte annat definieras i denna sekretesspolicy.
Insamling och användning av information
För en bättre upplevelse, när du använder vår tjänst, kan jag kräva att du ger oss viss personligt identifierbar information. Informationen som jag begär bevaras på din enhet och samlas inte in av mig på något sätt.
Loggdata
Jag vill informera dig om att när du använder min tjänst samlar jag in data och information (via tredjepartsprodukter) på din telefon som heter Log Data i händelse av ett fel i appen. Denna loggdata kan innehålla information såsom din enhets internetprotokoll (“IP”) -adress, enhetsnamn, operativsystemversion, konfiguration av appen vid användning av min tjänst, tid och datum för din användning av tjänsten och annan statistik .
Småkakor
Cookies är filer med en liten mängd data som vanligtvis används som anonyma unika identifierare. Dessa skickas till din webbläsare från de webbplatser som du besöker och lagras i enhetens interna minne.
Denna tjänst använder inte dessa «cookies» uttryckligen. Appen kan dock använda tredjepartskod och bibliotek som använder «cookies» för att samla in information och förbättra sina tjänster. Du har möjlighet att antingen acceptera eller vägra dessa cookies och veta när en cookie skickas till din enhet. Om du väljer att vägra våra cookies kanske du inte kan använda vissa delar av denna tjänst.
Tjänsteleverantörer
Jag kan anställa tredjepartsföretag och individer på grund av följande skäl:
För att underlätta vår tjänst;
Att tillhandahålla tjänsten för våra räkning;
Att utföra Tjänsterelaterade tjänster; eller
För att hjälpa oss att analysera hur vår tjänst används.
Jag vill informera användare av denna tjänst att dessa tredje parter har tillgång till din personliga information. Anledningen är att utföra de uppgifter som tilldelats dem på våra vägnar. De är dock skyldiga att inte avslöja eller använda informationen för något annat syfte.
Vi kan använda Smartlook, som är en analyslösning. Smartlook kan spela in: Skärmar som besöks, interaktionsmönster (t.ex. skärmåtgärder, gester: kranar, rullar) och enhetsinformation (typ, version, modell, operativsystem). Vi använder den information som samlats in av Smartlook för att förbättra vår app.
Smartlook samlar inte in personligt identifierbar information och spårar inte dina surfvanor mellan appar.
säkerhet
Jag uppskattar ditt förtroende för att ge oss din personliga information, så vi strävar efter att använda kommersiellt godtagbara sätt att skydda den. Men kom ihåg att ingen överföringsmetod över internet eller elektronisk lagring är 100% säker och pålitlig, och jag kan inte garantera dess absoluta säkerhet.
Länkar till andra webbplatser
Denna tjänst kan innehålla länkar till andra webbplatser. Om du klickar på en länk från tredje part kommer du till den webbplatsen. Observera att dessa externa webbplatser inte drivs av mig. Därför rekommenderar jag dig starkt att granska sekretesspolicyn för dessa webbplatser. Jag har ingen kontroll över och tar inget ansvar för innehållet, sekretesspolicyn eller praxis på webbplatser eller tjänster från tredje part.
Barns integritet
Dessa tjänster vänder sig inte till någon under 13 år. Jag samlar inte medvetet in personlig information från barn under 13. Om jag upptäcker att ett barn under 13 år har gett mig personlig information, raderar jag detta omedelbart från våra servrar. Om du är förälder eller vårdnadshavare och du är medveten om att ditt barn har gett oss personlig information, vänligen kontakta mig så att jag kan göra nödvändiga åtgärder.
Ändringar av denna sekretesspolicy
Jag kan komma att uppdatera vår sekretesspolicy då och då. Därför rekommenderas du att granska denna sida regelbundet för eventuella ändringar. Jag meddelar dig om eventuella ändringar genom att lägga upp den nya sekretesspolicyn på den här sidan.
Kontakta oss
Om du har några frågor eller förslag om min sekretesspolicy, tveka inte att kontakta mig på enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Vietnamese
Chính sách bảo mật
Artur Kolesnykov đã xây dựng ứng dụng này như một ứng dụng Freemium. DỊCH VỤ này được Artur Kolesnykov cung cấp miễn phí và được thiết kế để sử dụng như hiện tại.
Trang này được sử dụng để thông báo cho khách truy cập về các chính sách của tôi với việc thu thập, sử dụng và tiết lộ Thông tin Cá nhân nếu bất kỳ ai quyết định sử dụng Dịch vụ của tôi.
Nếu bạn chọn sử dụng Dịch vụ của tôi, nghĩa là bạn đồng ý với việc thu thập và sử dụng thông tin liên quan đến chính sách này. Thông tin Cá nhân mà tôi thu thập được sử dụng để cung cấp và cải thiện Dịch vụ. Tôi sẽ không sử dụng hoặc chia sẻ thông tin của bạn với bất kỳ ai ngoại trừ được mô tả trong Chính sách Bảo mật này.
Các điều khoản được sử dụng trong Chính sách quyền riêng tư này có ý nghĩa tương tự như trong Điều khoản và điều kiện của chúng tôi, có thể truy cập được tại ứng dụng trừ khi được định nghĩa khác trong Chính sách quyền riêng tư này.
Thu thập và sử dụng thông tin
Để có trải nghiệm tốt hơn, khi sử dụng Dịch vụ của chúng tôi, tôi có thể yêu cầu bạn cung cấp cho chúng tôi một số thông tin nhận dạng cá nhân nhất định. Thông tin mà tôi yêu cầu sẽ được lưu giữ trên thiết bị của bạn và không được tôi thu thập dưới bất kỳ hình thức nào.
Dữ liệu nhật ký
Tôi muốn thông báo với bạn rằng bất cứ khi nào bạn sử dụng Dịch vụ của tôi, trong trường hợp xảy ra lỗi trong ứng dụng, tôi sẽ thu thập dữ liệu và thông tin (thông qua các sản phẩm của bên thứ ba) trên điện thoại của bạn được gọi là Dữ liệu nhật ký. Dữ liệu nhật ký này có thể bao gồm thông tin như địa chỉ Giao thức Internet (“IP”) trên thiết bị của bạn, tên thiết bị, phiên bản hệ điều hành, cấu hình của ứng dụng khi sử dụng Dịch vụ của tôi, ngày giờ bạn sử dụng Dịch vụ và các số liệu thống kê khác .
Bánh quy
Cookie là các tệp có một lượng nhỏ dữ liệu thường được sử dụng làm mã nhận dạng duy nhất ẩn danh. Chúng được gửi đến trình duyệt của bạn từ các trang web mà bạn truy cập và được lưu trữ trên bộ nhớ trong của thiết bị của bạn.
Dịch vụ này không sử dụng các “cookie” này một cách rõ ràng. Tuy nhiên, ứng dụng có thể sử dụng mã của bên thứ ba và các thư viện sử dụng “cookie” để thu thập thông tin và cải thiện dịch vụ của họ. Bạn có tùy chọn chấp nhận hoặc từ chối các cookie này và biết khi nào một cookie được gửi đến thiết bị của bạn. Nếu bạn chọn từ chối cookie của chúng tôi, bạn có thể không sử dụng được một số phần của Dịch vụ này.
Các nhà cung cấp dịch vụ
Tôi có thể tuyển dụng các công ty và cá nhân bên thứ ba vì những lý do sau:
Để tạo điều kiện cho Dịch vụ của chúng tôi;
Để cung cấp Dịch vụ thay mặt chúng tôi;
Để thực hiện các dịch vụ liên quan đến Dịch vụ; hoặc
Để hỗ trợ chúng tôi phân tích cách Dịch vụ của chúng tôi được sử dụng.
Tôi muốn thông báo cho người dùng Dịch vụ này rằng các bên thứ ba này có quyền truy cập vào Thông tin cá nhân của bạn. Lý do là để thay mặt chúng tôi thực hiện các nhiệm vụ được giao cho họ. Tuy nhiên, họ có nghĩa vụ không tiết lộ hoặc sử dụng thông tin cho bất kỳ mục đích nào khác.
Chúng tôi có thể sử dụng Smartlook, một giải pháp phân tích. Smartlook có thể ghi lại: Màn hình đã truy cập, Mẫu tương tác (chẳng hạn như hành động trên màn hình, cử chỉ: chạm, cuộn) và Chi tiết thiết bị (Loại, Phiên bản, Kiểu máy, Hệ điều hành). Chúng tôi đang sử dụng thông tin do Smartlook thu thập để cải thiện ứng dụng của mình.
Smartlook không thu thập thông tin nhận dạng cá nhân và không theo dõi thói quen duyệt web của bạn trên các ứng dụng.
Bảo vệ
Tôi đánh giá cao sự tin tưởng của bạn trong việc cung cấp cho chúng tôi Thông tin cá nhân của bạn, do đó chúng tôi đang cố gắng sử dụng các phương tiện được chấp nhận về mặt thương mại để bảo vệ thông tin đó. Nhưng hãy nhớ rằng không có phương thức truyền tải nào qua internet, hoặc phương thức lưu trữ điện tử nào là an toàn và đáng tin cậy 100%, và tôi không thể đảm bảo tính bảo mật tuyệt đối của nó.
Liên kết đến các trang web khác
Dịch vụ này có thể chứa các liên kết đến các trang web khác. Nếu bạn nhấp vào liên kết của bên thứ ba, bạn sẽ được dẫn đến trang web đó. Lưu ý rằng các trang web bên ngoài này không do tôi điều hành. Do đó, tôi thực sự khuyên bạn nên xem lại Chính sách Bảo mật của các trang web này. Tôi không kiểm soát và không chịu trách nhiệm về nội dung, chính sách bảo mật hoặc thực tiễn của bất kỳ trang web hoặc dịch vụ của bên thứ ba nào.
Quyền riêng tư của trẻ em
Những Dịch vụ này không đề cập đến bất kỳ ai dưới 13 tuổi. Tôi không cố ý thu thập thông tin nhận dạng cá nhân của trẻ em dưới 13. Trong trường hợp tôi phát hiện ra rằng một đứa trẻ dưới 13 tuổi đã cung cấp thông tin cá nhân cho tôi, tôi ngay lập tức xóa thông tin này khỏi máy chủ của chúng tôi. Nếu bạn là cha mẹ hoặc người giám hộ và bạn biết rằng con bạn đã cung cấp thông tin cá nhân cho chúng tôi, vui lòng liên hệ với tôi để tôi có thể thực hiện các hành động cần thiết.
Các thay đổi đối với Chính sách quyền riêng tư này
Tôi có thể cập nhật Chính sách Bảo mật của chúng tôi theo thời gian. Vì vậy, bạn nên xem lại trang này định kỳ để biết bất kỳ thay đổi nào. Tôi sẽ thông báo cho bạn về bất kỳ thay đổi nào bằng cách đăng Chính sách Bảo mật mới trên trang này.
Liên hệ chúng tôi
Nếu bạn có bất kỳ câu hỏi hoặc đề xuất nào về Chính sách Bảo mật của tôi, vui lòng liên hệ với tôi tại enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Czech
Zásady ochrany osobních údajů
Artur Kolesnykov postavil aplikaci jako aplikaci Freemium. Tuto SLUŽBU poskytuje Artur Kolesnykov bezplatně a je určena k použití tak, jak je.
Tato stránka slouží k informování návštěvníků ohledně mých zásad týkajících se shromažďování, používání a zveřejňování osobních údajů, pokud se někdo rozhodl použít moji Službu.
Pokud se rozhodnete používat moji Službu, souhlasíte se shromažďováním a používáním informací v souvislosti s těmito zásadami. Osobní údaje, které shromažďuji, slouží k poskytování a zlepšování Služby. Vaše údaje nebudu používat ani s nikým sdílet, s výjimkou případů popsaných v těchto zásadách ochrany osobních údajů.
Pojmy použité v těchto zásadách ochrany osobních údajů mají stejný význam jako v našich smluvních podmínkách, které jsou přístupné v aplikaci, pokud není v těchto zásadách ochrany osobních údajů stanoveno jinak.
Shromažďování a používání informací
Pro lepší zážitek při používání naší Služby mohu požadovat, abyste nám poskytli určité osobní identifikační údaje. Informace, které požaduji, budou uchovány ve vašem zařízení a nebudu je žádným způsobem shromažďovat.
Data protokolu
Chci vás informovat, že kdykoli použijete moji službu, v případě chyby v aplikaci shromažďuji data a informace (prostřednictvím produktů třetích stran) do vašeho telefonu s názvem Log Data. Tato data protokolu mohou obsahovat informace, jako je adresa IP vašeho zařízení, název zařízení, verze operačního systému, konfigurace aplikace při používání mé služby, čas a datum vašeho používání služby a další statistiky .
Cookies
Cookies jsou soubory s malým množstvím dat, které se běžně používají jako anonymní jedinečné identifikátory. Ty jsou odesílány do vašeho prohlížeče z webů, které navštěvujete, a jsou uloženy ve vnitřní paměti vašeho zařízení.
Tato služba tyto „cookies“ výslovně nepoužívá. Aplikace však může ke shromažďování informací a zlepšování svých služeb používat kód třetích stran a knihovny, které používají „cookies“. Máte možnost tyto soubory cookie přijmout nebo odmítnout a vědět, kdy se do vašeho zařízení odesílá soubor cookie. Pokud se rozhodnete odmítnout naše soubory cookie, možná nebudete moci používat některé části této služby.
Poskytovatelé služeb
Mohu zaměstnávat společnosti a jednotlivce třetích stran z následujících důvodů:
K usnadnění naší služby;
Poskytovat službu naším jménem;
Provádět služby související se službami; nebo
Pomáhá nám při analýze toho, jak je naše služba využívána.
Chci informovat uživatele této služby, že tyto třetí strany mají přístup k vašim osobním údajům. Důvodem je plnění úkolů, které jsou jim přiděleny. Jsou však povinni tyto informace nezveřejnit a nepoužívat k žádnému jinému účelu.
Můžeme použít Smartlook, což je analytické řešení. Smartlook může zaznamenávat: navštívené obrazovky, vzorce interakce (například akce na obrazovce, gesta: klepnutí, posouvání) a podrobnosti o zařízení (typ, verze, model, operační systém). Informace shromážděné společností Smartlook používáme k vylepšení naší aplikace.
Smartlook neshromažďuje osobní identifikační údaje a nesleduje vaše návyky při procházení mezi aplikacemi.
Bezpečnostní
Vážím si vaší důvěry v to, že nám poskytnete své osobní údaje, proto se snažíme používat komerčně přijatelné způsoby jejich ochrany. Pamatujte však, že žádný způsob přenosu přes internet nebo způsob elektronického ukládání není 100% bezpečný a spolehlivý a nemohu zaručit jeho absolutní bezpečnost.
Odkazy na jiné stránky
Tato služba může obsahovat odkazy na jiné weby. Pokud kliknete na odkaz třetí strany, budete přesměrováni na tento web. Všimněte si, že tyto externí stránky nejsou provozovány mnou. Proto vám důrazně doporučujeme přečíst si zásady ochrany osobních údajů těchto webových stránek. Nemám žádnou kontrolu a nepřebírám žádnou odpovědnost za obsah, zásady ochrany osobních údajů nebo postupy jakýchkoli webů nebo služeb třetích stran.
Ochrana soukromí dětí
Tyto služby nejsou určeny pro osoby mladší 13 let. Nesmím vědomě shromažďovat osobní identifikační údaje od dětí mladších 13 let. V případě, že zjistím, že mi dítě mladší 13 let poskytlo osobní údaje, okamžitě je smažu z našich serverů. Pokud jste rodič nebo opatrovník a víte, že nám vaše dítě poskytlo osobní údaje, kontaktujte mě, abych mohl provést potřebné kroky.
Změny těchto zásad ochrany osobních údajů
Čas od času mohu aktualizovat naše zásady ochrany osobních údajů. Doporučujeme proto tuto stránku pravidelně kontrolovat, zda neobsahuje jakékoli změny. Na jakékoli změny vás upozorním zveřejněním nových zásad ochrany osobních údajů na této stránce.
Kontaktujte nás
Pokud máte nějaké dotazy nebo návrhy týkající se mých zásad ochrany osobních údajů, neváhejte mě kontaktovat na enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Hungarian
Adatvédelmi irányelvek
Artur Kolesnyikov az alkalmazást Freemium -alkalmazásként építette fel. Ezt a SZOLGÁLTATÁST Artur Kolesnyikov biztosítja díjmentesen, és úgy tervezték, hogy úgy használja.
Ez az oldal arra szolgál, hogy tájékoztassa a látogatókat a személyes adataim gyűjtésével, használatával és nyilvánosságra hozatalával kapcsolatos irányelveimről, ha valaki úgy dönt, hogy igénybe veszi a Szolgáltatásomat.
Ha úgy dönt, hogy igénybe veszi a Szolgáltatásomat, akkor beleegyezik abba, hogy a jelen irányelvvel kapcsolatban információkat gyűjtünk és használunk fel. Az általam gyűjtött személyes adatokat a Szolgáltatás nyújtására és javítására használjuk fel. Az Ön adatait nem használom fel és nem osztom meg senkivel, kivéve a jelen Adatvédelmi Szabályzatban leírtakat.
A jelen Adatvédelmi Szabályzatban használt kifejezések jelentése megegyezik az Általános Szerződési Feltételeinkkel, amelyek az alkalmazásban elérhetők, kivéve, ha ez az adatvédelmi szabályzat másként rendelkezik.
Információgyűjtés és felhasználás
A jobb élmény érdekében a Szolgáltatás használata során előfordulhat, hogy bizonyos személyazonosításra alkalmas adatokat kell megadnunk. Az általam kért információkat megőrizzük az eszközén, és semmilyen módon nem gyűjtem.
Napló adatok
Tájékoztatni szeretném Önöket, hogy amikor igénybe veszik a Szolgáltatásomat, az alkalmazás hibája esetén adatokat és információkat gyűjtök (harmadik fél termékein keresztül) az Ön telefonján, a Log Data néven. Ezek a naplóadatok tartalmazhatnak olyan információkat, mint az eszköz internetes protokoll („IP”) címe, az eszköz neve, az operációs rendszer verziója, az alkalmazás konfigurációja a szolgáltatásom használata során, a szolgáltatás használatának ideje és dátuma, valamint egyéb statisztikák .
Cookie -k
A cookie -k kis adatmennyiségű fájlok, amelyeket általában névtelen egyedi azonosítóként használnak. Ezeket a felkeresett webhelyekről küldi el a böngészőjébe, és a készülék belső memóriájában tárolják.
Ez a szolgáltatás nem használja kifejezetten ezeket a „cookie -kat”. Az alkalmazás azonban használhat harmadik féltől származó kódot és könyvtárakat, amelyek „cookie -kat” használnak információgyűjtésre és szolgáltatásaik fejlesztésére. Lehetősége van arra, hogy elfogadja vagy elutasítsa ezeket a cookie -kat, és tudja, mikor küld cookie -t az eszközére. Ha úgy dönt, hogy visszautasítja a sütiket, előfordulhat, hogy nem tudja használni a szolgáltatás egyes részeit.
Szolgáltatók
A következő okok miatt alkalmazhatok külső cégeket és magánszemélyeket:
Szolgáltatásunk megkönnyítése érdekében;
A Szolgáltatást a nevünkben nyújtani;
Szolgáltatással kapcsolatos szolgáltatások elvégzése; vagy
Segítségünk a Szolgáltatásunk használatának elemzésében.
Szeretném tájékoztatni a Szolgáltatás felhasználóit, hogy ezek a harmadik felek hozzáférhetnek az Ön személyes adataihoz. Ennek oka, hogy a ránk bízott feladatokat a nevünkben kell elvégezni. Mindazonáltal kötelesek nem nyilvánosságra hozni vagy felhasználni az információkat más célokra.
Használhatunk Smartlook elemzési megoldást. A Smartlook rögzíthet: meglátogatott képernyőket, interakciós mintákat (például képernyőműveleteket, gesztusokat: koppintásokat, görgetéseket) és az eszköz részleteit (típus, verzió, modell, operációs rendszer). A Smartlook által gyűjtött információkat felhasználjuk alkalmazásunk fejlesztésére.
A Smartlook nem gyűjt személyazonosításra alkalmas adatokat, és nem követi nyomon böngészési szokásait az alkalmazások között.
Biztonság
Nagyra értékelem bizalmát abban, hogy megadja nekünk személyes adatait, ezért igyekszünk kereskedelmi szempontból elfogadható eszközöket használni azok védelmére. De ne feledje, hogy az interneten keresztül történő továbbítás vagy az elektronikus tárolás egyik módja sem 100% -ban biztonságos és megbízható, és nem tudom garantálni annak teljes biztonságát.
Linkek más webhelyekre
Ez a szolgáltatás más webhelyekre mutató linkeket tartalmazhat. Ha rákattint egy harmadik fél linkjére, akkor az adott webhelyre irányít. Vegye figyelembe, hogy ezeket a külső webhelyeket nem én üzemeltetem. Ezért határozottan javaslom, hogy tekintse át ezen webhelyek adatvédelmi irányelveit. Nem tudom ellenőrizni és nem vállalok felelősséget harmadik fél webhelyeinek vagy szolgáltatásainak tartalmáért, adatvédelmi irányelveiért vagy gyakorlataiért.
Gyermekek magánélete
Ezek a szolgáltatások nem szólnak meg 13 éven aluli személyeket. Tudatosan nem gyűjtök személyazonosításra alkalmas adatokat 13 év alatti gyermekektől. Ha azt tapasztalom, hogy egy 13 év alatti gyermek személyes adatokat szolgáltatott nekem, azonnal törlöm ezeket a szervereinkről. Ha Ön szülő vagy gyám, és tudja, hogy gyermeke személyes adatokat adott meg nekünk, kérjük, vegye fel velem a kapcsolatot, hogy megtehessem a szükséges lépéseket.
Változások ezen adatvédelmi irányelvekben
Időnként frissíthetem adatvédelmi irányelveinket. Ezért azt javasoljuk, hogy rendszeresen nézze át ezt az oldalt a változások miatt. Az új adatvédelmi irányelvek ezen az oldalon történő közzétételével értesítem Önt a változásokról.
Lépjen kapcsolatba velünk
Ha bármilyen kérdése vagy javaslata van az adatvédelmi irányelveimmel kapcsolatban, ne habozzon kapcsolatba lépni velem az enzoapps.info@gmail.com címen.
Polish
Polityka prywatności
Artur Kolesnykov zbudował aplikację jako aplikację Freemium. Niniejsza USŁUGA jest świadczona przez Artura Kolesnykova bezpłatnie i jest przeznaczona do użytku w takiej postaci, w jakiej jest.
Ta strona służy do informowania odwiedzających o moich zasadach dotyczących gromadzenia, wykorzystywania i ujawniania Danych osobowych, jeśli ktoś zdecyduje się skorzystać z mojej Usługi.
Jeśli zdecydujesz się korzystać z mojej Usługi, zgadzasz się na zbieranie i wykorzystywanie informacji w związku z niniejszą polityką. Gromadzone przeze mnie dane osobowe służą do świadczenia i ulepszania Usługi. Nie wykorzystam ani nie udostępnię nikomu Twoich informacji, z wyjątkiem przypadków opisanych w niniejszej Polityce prywatności.
Terminy użyte w niniejszej Polityce prywatności mają takie samo znaczenie jak w naszym Regulaminie, który jest dostępny w aplikacji, chyba że niniejsza Polityka prywatności stanowi inaczej.
Gromadzenie i wykorzystywanie informacji
Aby zapewnić lepsze wrażenia podczas korzystania z naszej Usługi, mogę wymagać od Ciebie podania nam pewnych danych osobowych. Informacje, o które proszę, zostaną zachowane na Twoim urządzeniu i nie będą przeze mnie w żaden sposób zbierane.
Dane dziennika
Chcę Cię poinformować, że za każdym razem, gdy korzystasz z mojej Usługi, w przypadku wystąpienia błędu w aplikacji zbieram dane i informacje (za pośrednictwem produktów firm trzecich) na Twoim telefonie o nazwie Log Data. Te dane dziennika mogą zawierać takie informacje, jak adres IP urządzenia, nazwa urządzenia, wersja systemu operacyjnego, konfiguracja aplikacji podczas korzystania z mojej Usługi, czas i data korzystania z Usługi oraz inne statystyki .
Ciasteczka
Pliki cookie to pliki z niewielką ilością danych, które są powszechnie używane jako anonimowe unikalne identyfikatory. Są one wysyłane do Twojej przeglądarki z odwiedzanych przez Ciebie stron internetowych i są przechowywane w pamięci wewnętrznej Twojego urządzenia.
Niniejsza Usługa nie wykorzystuje wyraźnie tych plików „cookies”. Aplikacja może jednak wykorzystywać kod i biblioteki stron trzecich, które wykorzystują pliki „cookies” do zbierania informacji i ulepszania ich usług. Masz możliwość zaakceptowania lub odrzucenia tych plików cookie i wiedzieć, kiedy plik cookie jest wysyłany na Twoje urządzenie. Jeśli zdecydujesz się odrzucić nasze pliki cookie, możesz nie być w stanie korzystać z niektórych części tej Usługi.
Usługodawcy
Mogę zatrudniać firmy i osoby trzecie z następujących powodów:
Aby ułatwić naszą usługę;
Aby świadczyć Usługę w naszym imieniu;
Aby świadczyć usługi związane z Usługą; lub
Aby pomóc nam w analizie sposobu korzystania z naszej Usługi.
Chcę poinformować użytkowników tej Usługi, że te osoby trzecie mają dostęp do Twoich danych osobowych. Powodem jest wykonywanie powierzonych im zadań w naszym imieniu. Są jednak zobowiązani do nieujawniania ani nie wykorzystywania informacji w żadnym innym celu.
Możemy korzystać ze Smartlook, który jest rozwiązaniem analitycznym. Smartlook może rejestrować: odwiedzane ekrany, wzorce interakcji (takie jak akcje na ekranie, gesty: stuknięcia, przewijanie) oraz szczegóły urządzenia (typ, wersja, model, system operacyjny). Używamy informacji zebranych przez Smartlook do ulepszania naszej aplikacji.
Smartlook nie zbiera informacji umożliwiających identyfikację osoby i nie śledzi Twoich nawyków przeglądania w różnych aplikacjach.
Bezpieczeństwo
Cenimy Twoje zaufanie w dostarczaniu nam Twoich Danych Osobowych, dlatego staramy się stosować komercyjnie akceptowalne środki ich ochrony. Pamiętaj jednak, że żadna metoda transmisji przez Internet ani metoda elektronicznego przechowywania nie jest w 100% bezpieczna i niezawodna i nie mogę zagwarantować jej absolutnego bezpieczeństwa.
Linki do innych witryn
Niniejsza Usługa może zawierać łącza do innych witryn. Jeśli klikniesz link strony trzeciej, zostaniesz przekierowany do tej witryny. Pamiętaj, że te zewnętrzne witryny nie są przeze mnie obsługiwane. Dlatego zdecydowanie radzę zapoznać się z Polityką prywatności tych stron. Nie mam kontroli i nie ponoszę odpowiedzialności za treść, politykę prywatności lub praktyki jakichkolwiek witryn lub usług stron trzecich.
Prywatność dzieci
Usługi te nie są skierowane do osób poniżej 13 roku życia. Nie zbieram świadomie danych osobowych od dzieci poniżej 13 roku życia. W przypadku, gdy odkryję, że dziecko poniżej 13 roku życia przekazało mi dane osobowe, natychmiast usuwam je z naszych serwerów. Jeśli jesteś rodzicem lub opiekunem i zdajesz sobie sprawę, że Twoje dziecko przekazało nam dane osobowe, skontaktuj się ze mną, abym mógł podjąć niezbędne działania.
Zmiany w niniejszej Polityce prywatności
Od czasu do czasu mogę aktualizować naszą Politykę prywatności. Dlatego zaleca się okresowe przeglądanie tej strony pod kątem wszelkich zmian. Powiadomię Cię o wszelkich zmianach, zamieszczając nową Politykę prywatności na tej stronie.
Skontaktuj się z nami
Jeśli masz jakieś pytania lub sugestie dotyczące mojej Polityki prywatności, nie wahaj się ze mną skontaktować pod adresem enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Romanian
Politica de Confidențialitate
Artur Kolesnykov a construit aplicația ca aplicație Freemium. Acest SERVICIU este furnizat de Artur Kolesnykov fără costuri și este destinat utilizării ca atare.
Această pagină este utilizată pentru a informa vizitatorii cu privire la politicile mele cu privire la colectarea, utilizarea și divulgarea informațiilor personale dacă cineva a decis să folosească Serviciul meu.
Dacă alegeți să utilizați Serviciul meu, atunci sunteți de acord cu colectarea și utilizarea informațiilor în legătură cu această politică. Informațiile personale pe care le colectez sunt utilizate pentru furnizarea și îmbunătățirea Serviciului. Nu voi folosi sau distribui informațiile dvs. cu nimeni, cu excepția celor descrise în această Politică de confidențialitate.
Termenii utilizați în această politică de confidențialitate au aceleași semnificații ca și în Termenii și condițiile noastre, care sunt accesibile la aplicație, cu excepția cazului în care se definește altfel în această politică de confidențialitate.
Colectarea și utilizarea informațiilor
Pentru o experiență mai bună, în timpul utilizării Serviciului nostru, vă pot cere să ne furnizați anumite informații de identificare personală. Informațiile pe care le solicitez vor fi păstrate pe dispozitivul dvs. și nu sunt colectate de mine în niciun fel.
Date jurnal
Vreau să vă informez că ori de câte ori utilizați Serviciul meu, în cazul unei erori în aplicație, colectez date și informații (prin produse de la terți) pe telefonul dvs. numit Jurnal de date. Aceste date de jurnal pot include informații, cum ar fi adresa protocolului dvs. Internet („IP”) a dispozitivului, numele dispozitivului, versiunea sistemului de operare, configurația aplicației atunci când utilizați serviciul meu, ora și data utilizării serviciului și alte statistici .
Cookie-uri
Cookie-urile sunt fișiere cu o cantitate mică de date care sunt utilizate în mod obișnuit ca identificatori unici anonimi. Acestea sunt trimise către browserul dvs. de pe site-urile web pe care le vizitați și sunt stocate în memoria internă a dispozitivului.
Acest Serviciu nu folosește în mod explicit aceste „cookie-uri”. Cu toate acestea, aplicația poate utiliza coduri terțe și biblioteci care utilizează „cookie-uri” pentru a colecta informații și a-și îmbunătăți serviciile. Aveți opțiunea de a accepta sau de a refuza aceste cookie-uri și de a ști când este trimis un cookie către dispozitivul dvs. Dacă alegeți să refuzați cookie-urile noastre, este posibil să nu puteți utiliza unele porțiuni ale acestui Serviciu.
Prestatori de servicii
Pot angaja companii terțe și persoane fizice din următoarele motive:
Pentru a facilita serviciul nostru;
Pentru a furniza Serviciul în numele nostru;
Pentru a efectua servicii legate de servicii; sau
Pentru a ne ajuta să analizăm modul în care este utilizat Serviciul nostru.
Doresc să informez utilizatorii despre acest serviciu că aceste terțe părți au acces la informațiile dvs. personale. Motivul este să îndeplinim sarcinile care le-au fost atribuite în numele nostru. Cu toate acestea, aceștia sunt obligați să nu divulge sau să utilizeze informațiile în alte scopuri.
Putem folosi Smartlook, care este o soluție de analiză. Smartlook poate înregistra: ecrane vizitate, modele de interacțiune (cum ar fi acțiunile ecranului, gesturi: atingeri, derulări) și detalii despre dispozitiv (tip, versiune, model, sistem de operare). Folosim informațiile colectate de Smartlook pentru a ne îmbunătăți aplicația.
Smartlook nu colectează informații de identificare personală și nu urmărește obiceiurile dvs. de navigare între aplicații.
Securitate
Apreciez încrederea dvs. în furnizarea informațiilor dvs. personale, astfel ne străduim să folosim mijloace acceptabile din punct de vedere comercial pentru a le proteja. Amintiți-vă însă că nicio metodă de transmitere prin internet sau metodă de stocare electronică nu este sigură și fiabilă 100% și nu pot garanta securitatea sa absolută.
Link-uri către alte site-uri
Acest Serviciu poate conține linkuri către alte site-uri. Dacă faceți clic pe un link terță parte, veți fi direcționat către acel site. Rețineți că aceste site-uri externe nu sunt operate de mine. Prin urmare, vă sfătuiesc cu tărie să revizuiți Politica de confidențialitate a acestor site-uri web. Nu am control asupra și nu îmi asum responsabilitatea pentru conținutul, politicile de confidențialitate sau practicile site-urilor sau serviciilor terțe.
Confidențialitatea copiilor
Aceste Servicii nu se adresează nimănui cu vârsta sub 13 ani. Nu colectez cu bună știință informații de identificare personală de la copii sub 13 ani. În cazul în care descopăr că un copil sub 13 ani mi-a furnizat informații personale, șterg imediat acest lucru de pe serverele noastre. Dacă sunteți părinte sau tutore și sunteți conștient de faptul că copilul dvs. ne-a furnizat informații personale, vă rugăm să mă contactați pentru a putea face acțiunile necesare.
Modificări aduse acestei politici de confidențialitate
Este posibil să îmi actualizez Politica de confidențialitate din când în când. Astfel, vi se recomandă să revizuiți periodic această pagină pentru orice modificare. Vă voi notifica cu privire la orice modificare, postând noua politică de confidențialitate pe această pagină.
Contactează-ne
Dacă aveți întrebări sau sugestii cu privire la Politica mea de confidențialitate, nu ezitați să mă contactați la enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Slovak
Zásady ochrany osobných údajov
Artur Kolesnykov postavil aplikáciu ako aplikáciu Freemium. Túto SLUŽBU poskytuje Artur Kolesnykov bezplatne a je určená na používanie tak, ako je.
Táto stránka slúži na informovanie návštevníkov o mojich zásadách týkajúcich sa zhromažďovania, používania a zverejňovania osobných údajov, ak sa niekto rozhodol používať moju službu.
Ak sa rozhodnete používať moju Službu, súhlasíte so zhromažďovaním a používaním informácií v súvislosti s týmito zásadami. Osobné údaje, ktoré zhromažďujem, slúžia na poskytovanie a zlepšovanie Služby. Vaše informácie nebudem používať ani s nikým zdieľať, pokiaľ nie je popísané v týchto zásadách ochrany osobných údajov.
Pojmy použité v týchto zásadách ochrany osobných údajov majú rovnaký význam ako v našich zmluvných podmienkach, ktoré sú k aplikácii prístupné, pokiaľ nie je v týchto zásadách ochrany osobných údajov uvedené inak.
Zhromažďovanie a používanie informácií
Pre lepšie skúsenosti pri používaní našej Služby od vás môžem požadovať, aby ste nám poskytli určité osobne identifikovateľné informácie. Informácie, ktoré požadujem, budú uložené vo vašom zariadení a ja ich žiadnym spôsobom nezhromažďujem.
Údaje denníka
Chcem vás informovať, že kedykoľvek použijete moju službu, v prípade chyby v aplikácii zhromažďujem vo vašom telefóne údaje a informácie (prostredníctvom produktov tretích strán) s názvom Údaje denníka. Tieto údaje denníka môžu zahŕňať informácie, ako napríklad adresu IP (IP) vášho zariadenia, názov zariadenia, verziu operačného systému, konfiguráciu aplikácie pri využívaní mojej služby, čas a dátum vášho používania služby a ďalšie štatistiky .
Cookies
Cookies sú súbory s malým množstvom údajov, ktoré sa bežne používajú ako anonymné jedinečné identifikátory. Tieto sa odosielajú do vášho prehliadača z webových stránok, ktoré navštevujete, a sú uložené vo vnútornej pamäti vášho zariadenia.
Táto služba tieto „cookies“ výslovne nepoužíva. Aplikácia však môže používať kód a knižnice tretích strán, ktoré používajú súbory cookie na zhromažďovanie informácií a zlepšovanie svojich služieb. Máte možnosť tieto súbory cookie prijať alebo odmietnuť a vedieť, kedy sa súbor cookie odosiela do vášho zariadenia. Ak sa rozhodnete odmietnuť naše súbory cookie, možno nebudete môcť používať niektoré časti tejto služby.
Poskytovatelia služieb
Môžem zamestnávať spoločnosti a jednotlivcov tretích strán z nasledujúcich dôvodov:
Na uľahčenie našej služby;
Poskytovať Službu v našom mene;
Vykonávať služby súvisiace so Službami; alebo
Pomáha nám pri analýze toho, ako sa naša služba používa.
Chcem informovať používateľov tejto služby, že tieto tretie strany majú prístup k vašim osobným informáciám. Dôvodom je plnenie úloh, ktoré sú im zverené, v našom mene. Sú však povinní tieto informácie nezverejniť ani ich použiť na žiadny iný účel.
Môžeme použiť Smartlook, čo je analytické riešenie. Smartlook môže zaznamenávať: navštívené obrazovky, vzorce interakcií (ako sú akcie na obrazovke, gestá: klepania, posúvanie) a podrobnosti o zariadení (typ, verzia, model, operačný systém). Informácie zhromaždené spoločnosťou Smartlook používame na zlepšenie našej aplikácie.
Smartlook nezhromažďuje informácie umožňujúce identifikáciu osôb a nesleduje vaše návyky pri prehliadaní v rôznych aplikáciách.
Zabezpečenie
Vážim si vašu dôveru v to, že nám poskytnete svoje osobné údaje, preto sa snažíme používať komerčne prijateľné prostriedky na ich ochranu. Nezabudnite však, že žiadny spôsob prenosu cez internet alebo spôsob elektronického ukladania údajov nie je 100% bezpečný a spoľahlivý a nemôžem zaručiť jeho absolútnu bezpečnosť.
Odkazy na iné stránky
Táto služba môže obsahovať odkazy na iné stránky. Ak kliknete na odkaz tretej strany, budete presmerovaní na príslušný web. Upozorňujeme, že tieto externé stránky nie sú mnou prevádzkované. Preto vám dôrazne odporúčame, aby ste si prečítali zásady ochrany osobných údajov týchto webových stránok. Nemám žiadnu kontrolu a nepreberám žiadnu zodpovednosť za obsah, zásady ochrany osobných údajov alebo postupy akýchkoľvek webových stránok alebo služieb tretích strán.
Ochrana osobných údajov detí
Tieto služby nie sú určené nikomu mladšiemu ako 13 rokov. Vedome nezhromažďujem informácie umožňujúce identifikáciu osôb od detí mladších ako 13 rokov. V prípade, že zistím, že mi dieťa mladšie ako 13 rokov poskytlo osobné údaje, okamžite ich odstránim z našich serverov. Ak ste rodič alebo opatrovník a ste si vedomí toho, že nám vaše dieťa poskytlo osobné údaje, kontaktujte ma, aby som mohol vykonať potrebné opatrenia.
Zmeny týchto zásad ochrany osobných údajov
Čas od času môžem aktualizovať naše zásady ochrany osobných údajov. Odporúčame preto túto stránku pravidelne kontrolovať, či neobsahuje akékoľvek zmeny. Na akékoľvek zmeny vás upozorním zverejnením nových zásad ochrany osobných údajov na tejto stránke.
Kontaktuj nás
Ak máte akékoľvek otázky alebo návrhy týkajúce sa mojich zásad ochrany osobných údajov, neváhajte ma kontaktovať na adrese enzoapps.info@gmail.com.
Реклама
Настройки приватности
Поделиться ссылкой:
Twitter
Facebook
Нравится
Загрузка...
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://appodeal.com/privacy-policy/:
You control your data
We and our business partners use technologies, including cookies, to collect information about you for various purposes, including:
Functional
Statistical
Marketing
By clicking ‘Accept’, you give your consent for all these purposes. You can also choose to specify the purposes you consent to by ticking the checkbox next to the purpose and clicking ‘Save settings’.
You may withdraw your consent at any time by clicking the small icon at the bottom left corner of the website.
You can read more about how we use cookies and other technologies and how we collect and process personal data by clicking the link.
Read more about cookies
Google privacy policy
Show details
Hide details
Necessary
Strictly necessary cookies help make a website navigable by activating basic functions such as page navigation and access to secure website areas. Without these cookies, the website would not be able to work properly.
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Pending
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
Session
Name:
_cfuvid
Vendor:
.hsforms.com
Service:
Cookie Information
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cookie Information - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
CookieInformationConsent
Vendor:
appodeal.com
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Pending
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
Session
Name:
_cfuvid
Vendor:
.hubspot.com
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Pending
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
Session
Name:
_cfuvid
Vendor:
.highcharts.com
Service:
Vercel
Purpose:
Supports the functions of a "Content Management System" with built-in user behavior analyzes.
Privacy policy:
Vercel - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
Session
Name:
locale
Vendor:
app.appodeal.com
Functional
Functional cookies make it possible to save information that changes the way the website appears or acts. For instance your preferred language or region.
Service:
Microsoft
Purpose:
Supports the integration of a third-party platform on the website.
Privacy policy:
Microsoft - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
MSPTC
Vendor:
.bing.com
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
18 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hsforms.com
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
19 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hsforms.net
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
20 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hs-analytics.net
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
18 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hs-scripts.com
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
21 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hsadspixel.net
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
4 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hubspotusercontent-na1.net
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
18 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hs-banner.com
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
18 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hubspot.com
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
20 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hscta.net
Statistical
Statistical cookies help the website owner understand how visitors interact with the website by collecting and reporting information.
Service:
Google Analytics
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website for analytics and reporting purposes.
Privacy policy:
Google Analytics - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
_ga
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
Purpose:
Expiry:
Session
Name:
countryCode
Vendor:
tenor.com
Service:
Google Analytics
Purpose:
Privacy policy:
Google Analytics - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
_ga_xxx
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Marketing
Marketing cookies are used to track visitors across websites. The intention is to display ads that are relevant and interesting to the individual user and thus more valuable for publishers and third-party advertisers.
Service:
Google Marketing Platform
Purpose:
Used for online marketing by collecting information about the users and their activity on the website. The information is used to target advertising to the user across different channels and devices.
Privacy policy:
Google Marketing Platform - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
15 minutes
Name:
test_cookie
Vendor:
.doubleclick.net
Service:
Youtube, Google
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website through embedded video players with the purpose of delivering targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
Youtube, Google - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
6 months
Name:
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Vendor:
.youtube.com
Service:
HubSpot
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website. The information is used to track and analyze user behaviour and to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
HubSpot - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
30 minutes
Name:
__hssc
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
Youtube, Google
Purpose:
Supports the integration of a third-party platform on the website.
Privacy policy:
Youtube, Google - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
6 months
Name:
__Secure-ROLLOUT_TOKEN
Vendor:
.youtube.com
Service:
LinkedIn
Purpose:
Supports online marketing by collecting information about the users to promote products through partners and other platforms.
Privacy policy:
LinkedIn - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
6 months
Name:
li_gc
Vendor:
.linkedin.com
Service:
Google
Purpose:
Supports the integration of a third-party platform on the website to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
Google - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
3 months
Name:
_gcl_au
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
Youtube, Google
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website through embedded video players with the purpose of delivering targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
Youtube, Google - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
Session
Name:
YSC
Vendor:
.youtube.com
Service:
Microsoft, Bing
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website. The information is used to track and analyze user behaviour and to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
Microsoft, Bing - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
_uetvid
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
HubSpot
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website. The information is used to track and analyze user behaviour and to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
HubSpot - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
6 months
Name:
__hstc
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
Facebook
Purpose:
Identifies browsers for the purposes of providing advertising and site analytics services.
Privacy policy:
Facebook - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
3 months
Name:
_fbp
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
Microsoft, Bing
Purpose:
Identifies unique web browsers visiting Microsoft sites. These cookies are used for advertising, site analytics, and other operational purposes.
Privacy policy:
Microsoft, Bing - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
MUID
Vendor:
.bing.com
Service:
Google Marketing Platform
Purpose:
Used for online marketing by collecting information about the users and their activity on the website. The information is used to target advertising to the user across different channels and devices.
Privacy policy:
Google Marketing Platform - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
IDE
Vendor:
.doubleclick.net
Service:
HubSpot
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website. The information is used to track and analyze user behaviour and to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
HubSpot - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
6 months
Name:
hubspotutk
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
HubSpot
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website. The information is used to track and analyze user behaviour and to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
HubSpot - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
Session
Name:
__hssrc
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
Youtube, Google
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website. The Information is used to track and analyze user behavior, to meet the individual user needs and to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
Youtube, Google - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
6 months
Name:
VISITOR_PRIVACY_METADATA
Vendor:
.youtube.com
Service:
Microsoft, Bing
Purpose:
Identifies unique web browsers visiting Microsoft sites. These cookies are used for advertising, site analytics, and other operational purposes.
Privacy policy:
Microsoft, Bing - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a day
Name:
_uetsid
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
LinkedIn
Purpose:
Supports online marketing by collecting information about the users to promote products through partners and other platforms.
Privacy policy:
LinkedIn - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
bcookie
Vendor:
.linkedin.com
Service:
LinkedIn
Purpose:
Supports online marketing by collecting information about the users to promote products through partners and other platforms.
Privacy policy:
LinkedIn - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a day
Name:
lidc
Vendor:
.linkedin.com
Unclassified
We are in the process of classifying unclassified cookies together with the providers of the individual cookies.
Service:
Purpose:
Expiry:
3 months
Name:
_rdt_uuid
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Necessary
Functional
Statistical
Marketing
Cookie policy
Your consent applies to the following domains:
appodeal.com
The cookie policy was last updated on 19.03.2025
What is a cookie?
A cookie is a small data file stored in your computer, tablet or smartphone. A cookie is not a program that can contain harmful malware or virus.
How our website uses cookies
Some cookies perform essential functions for our website. Cookies also help us get an overview of your visit to our website so we can continuously optimize and tailor the experience to your needs and interests. For example, cookies remember things like the items added to the shopping cart; whether you have visited our website before; if you are logged in; and the specific language and currency you prefer to see on the website. We also use cookies to target our ads specifically to you on other websites. In general, we use cookies as part of our service to present you with content that is as relevant to you as possible.
You can see the specific services that store cookies and why they do it, under the different categories:
Functional
Statistical
Marketing
How long are cookies stored?
The length of time a cookie is stored on your devices and browsers varies. The lifetime is calculated according to your last visit to the website. When a cookie expires, it is automatically deleted. All our cookies’ lifetimes are specified in our cookie policy.
How to block or delete cookies
You may at any time block all or just third-party cookies completely by changing the browser settings on your computer, tablet or smartphone. The location of these settings will depend on the browser you use. However, you should be aware that if you block all or just third-party cookies, there may be functions and services that you will be unable to use on the website (because these depend on cookies).
You can opt-out of cookies from Google Analytics here
.
How can you delete cookies?
It is easy to delete cookies that you have previously accepted. It depends on which browser (Chrome, Firefox, Safari, etc.) and device (smartphone, tablet, PC, Mac) you are using.
You can typically find this information under settings – Security and Privacy – but this may vary from one browser to another.  Specify which device/browser you are using (click the appropriate link):
Internet Explorer
Microsoft Edge
Mozilla Firefox
Google Chrome
Opera
Safari
Flash cookies
Apple
Android
Chrome, Android
Changing your consent
You can change your consent by either deleting cookies from your browser or by changing your original choice by clicking the link below:
You can change your consent by clicking here
Remember: If you use more than one browser, you must delete cookies in all of them.
Do you have any questions?
If you have any comments or questions relating to our information and/or processing of personal data, please feel welcome to contact us. 
The cookie policy itself is updated once a month by
Cookie Information
. If you have any questions about our cookie policy, you are welcome to
contact Cookie Information on their website.
Functional
Statistical
Marketing
Privacy Policy
1. Purpose
Appodeal, Inc., a Delaware corporation has developed this Privacy Policy (“
Policy
”) to demonstrate our commitment to protecting our users’ privacy. The terms “Appodeal,” “we,” “us”, and “our” include Appodeal, Inc. and any affiliates and subsidiaries. The terms “you” and “your” refer to any individuals and entities who use our Services or visit our Website (including our publishers, advertisers, demand partners, and other service providers) and our Employees.
This Policy describes our online and offline information practices, the kinds of information we may collect, how we intend to use that information, with whom your information may be shared, and how you can opt-out of such uses or correct or change such information. By using our Services or our Website, you agree to the practices described in this Policy. This Policy is an integral part of and is incorporated by reference into our Terms of Service (the “
Terms
”). Any capitalized terms used but not defined in this Policy will have the meaning defined in the Terms.
2. Scope
This Policy applies to any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person (“
Personal Information
”) that is collected, recorded, stored, adapted, used, or otherwise made available (collectively, “
Processed
”) by Appodeal in the course of our business providing an ad mediation platform, tools and other services (the “Services”) or the functionality of the Website. All individuals and entities whose responsibilities include Processing Personal Information on our behalf are expected to protect that data by adherence to this Policy. This Policy is intended to meet requirements globally, including those in North America, Europe, APAC, and other jurisdictions.
3. Transparency/Notice: Types of Personal Information We Collect And How We Use It
The types of Personal Information we may collect (directly from you or from Third-Party sources) and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with Appodeal and the requirements of applicable law. Appodeal may collect Personal Information in the following ways:
You may provide Personal Information directly to Appodeal through interacting with the Services or our Website, participating in surveys, during events, and requesting products, Services, or information.
As you interact with the Services or our Website, certain passive information may also be collected about your visit, including through Technologies as described below. We endeavor to collect only that information which is relevant for the purposes of Processing. Below are the ways we collect Personal Information and how we use it.
(a) Types Of Personal Information Appodeal Collects
Appodeal collects Personal Information regarding its current, prospective, and former clients, customers, publishers, demand partners, users, visitors, guests, and Employees (collectively “
Individuals
”).
Information You Provide Directly to Us.
When you use the Services or the Website or engage in certain activities, such as registering for an account with Appodeal, requesting Services or information, or contacting us directly, we may ask you to provide some or all of the following types of information:
Account Registration.
When you register for an account to access our Services, we collect information about you which may include your name, address, telephone number, email address, and billing information such as your credit card number.
Communications with Us.
We may also collect Personal Information from you such as your name, email address, phone number or mailing address when you choose to request information about our products and Services, register for a newsletter, contact customer service, or otherwise communicate with us.
Surveys.
From time to time, we may contact you to participate in online surveys. If you do decide to participate, you may be asked to provide certain information which may include Personal Information. All information collected from your participation in our surveys is provided by you voluntarily. We may use such information to improve our products, Website and/or Services and in any manner consistent with the policies provided herein.
Automatic Data Collection.
We may collect certain information automatically through our Services, Website, or other methods of web analysis, such as your Internet protocol (IP) address, cookie identifiers, mobile advertising identifiers, and other device identifiers that are automatically assigned to your Device when you access the Internet, location data, browser type, operating system, Internet service provider, pages that you visit before and after using the Website or our Services, the date and time of your visit, the amount of time you spend on each page, information about the links you click and pages you view on our Website, and other actions taken through use of the Website or Services such as preferences.
Information from Other Sources.
We may also obtain information about you through Third-Party services and organizations to supplement information provided by you. This supplemental information allows us to verify information that you have provided to Appodeal and to enhance our ability to provide you with information about our business, products, and Services.
(b) Cookies, Pixel Tags/Web Beacons, Analytics Information, and Interest-Based Advertising
We, as well as third parties that provide content, advertising, or other functionality on our Services or Website, may use cookies, pixel tags, local storage, mobile device identifiers and other technologies (“
Technologies
”) to automatically collect information through the Services or Website. We use Technologies that are essentially small data files placed on your computer, tablet, mobile phone, or other devices (referred to collectively as a “Device”) that allow us to record certain pieces of information whenever you visit or interact with our Services, and to recognize you across Devices.
Cookies.
Cookies are bits of data stored on your Device through your browser or mobile application that allow the mobile application to remember you the next time you visit. Cookies enable smoother, more efficient use of the Website by storing your specific information and preferences such as theme, language setting, privacy preferences, and even user ID and password, so you do not need to reenter those each time you visit the Website. You may choose to block or delete cookies if your browser permits, but doing so may affect your use of the Website and your ability to access certain features of the Website.
Advertising Identifiers.
We may also use mobile advertising identifiers to recognize your device and perform the services. Depending on your device, you can chose to change or limit the transmission of your mobile advertising identifier by going into your device settings.
Web Bugs/Pixel Tags/Web Beacons.
We may also use web bugs (also called web beacons) to help us understand the behavior of our users by allowing us to track user demographics and traffic patterns.
Social Media Widgets.
Our Website includes social media features such as the Facebook “Like” button and LinkedIn (that might include widgets such as the share this button or other interactive mini-programs). These features may collect information including your IP address and which page you are visiting on our Website, and may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. These social media features are either hosted by a third party or hosted directly on our Website. Your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing it.
Analytics.
We may also utilize Google Analytics and Yandex Metrics in the collection, compilation and analysis of information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on some of our Services, and to develop website content. This analytics data is not tied to any Personal Information. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt out of Google’s collection and Processing of data generated by your use of the Services by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
You can out opt of Yandex Metrics by going to
https://yandex.com/support/metrica/general/opt-out.xml
Our uses of such Technologies fall into the following general categories:
Operationally Necessary.
We may use Technologies that are necessary to the operation of our Services or Website. This includes Technologies that allow you access to our Services; or that are required to identify irregular Website behavior, prevent fraudulent activity and improve security;
Performance Related.
We may use Technologies to assess the performance of our Services or Website, including as part of our analytics practices, to help us understand how our visitors use our Website, determine if you have interacted with our messaging, determine whether you have viewed an item or link, or to improve our Services or Website;
Functionality Related.
We may use Technologies that allow us to offer you enhanced functionality when accessing or using our Services or Website. This may include identifying you when you sign into our Website or keeping track of your specified preferences, interests, or past items viewed so that we may enhance the presentation of content on our Website;
Advertising or Targeting Related.
We may use first-party or Third-Party Technologies to deliver content, including ads that may be relevant to your interests, on our Website or on Third-Party websites. This includes using Technologies to understand the usefulness to you of the advertisements and content that have been delivered to you, such as whether you have clicked on an advertisement.
We may also combine the information we collect through Technologies with other Personal Information we have collected from and about you. If you would like to opt out of the Technologies we employ through our Services, you may do so by blocking, deleting, or disabling them as your browser or Device permits.
(c) How Appodeal Uses Your Information
We acquire, hold, use, and Process Personal Information based on the legal grounds and for the legitimate business purposes outlined in this Policy, such as:
To Provide Services or Information Requested:
Appodeal may use information about you to fulfill requests for Services or information, including information about potential or future Services, including to:
Generally manage Individual information and accounts;
Respond to questions, comments, and other requests;
Provide access to certain areas, functionalities, and features of Appodeal’s Services or Website;
Allow you to register for events.
Administrative Purposes:
Appodeal may use Personal Information about you for its administrative purposes, including to:
Ensure you have a personalized and consistent experience in using the Website and Services;
Protect the security of our Service and Website
and to prevent fraud;
Measure interest in Appodeal’s Services
b and perform analytics;
Notify you of changes to the Website or Services;
Develop new Services;
Ensure internal quality control;
Verify Individual identity;
Communicate about Individual accounts and activities on Appodeal’s Services, Website and systems, and, in Appodeal’s discretion, changes to any Appodeal policy;
Send email to the email address you provide to us to verify your account and for informational and operational purposes, such as account management, customer service, or system maintenance;
Process payment for Services purchased;
Process applications and transactions;
Prevent potentially prohibited or illegal activities;
Enforce our Terms of Use.
Marketing Appodeal Services:
Appodeal may use Personal Information to provide you with materials about offers, products, and Services that may be of interest, including new content or Services. Appodeal may provide you with these materials by phone, postal mail, facsimile, or email, as permitted by applicable law. Such uses include:
To tailor content, advertisements, and offers;
To notify you about offers, products, and services that may be of interest to you;
To provide Services to you and our sponsors;
For other purposes disclosed at the time that Individuals provide Personal Information;
Otherwise with your consent.
You may contact us at any time to opt-out of the use of your Personal Information for marketing purposes, as further described in Section 6 below.
Research and Development:
Appodeal may use Personal Information to create non-identifiable information that we may use alone or in the aggregate with information obtained from other sources, in order to help us improve our Website, to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new Services. From time to time, Appodeal may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage Third-Party service providers to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve Individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the Services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Services or our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns, and/or promotional activities. If an Individual participates in a survey, the information given will be used along with that of other study participants. We may share anonymous Individual and aggregate data for research and analysis purposes.
Direct Mail, Email and Outbound Telemarketing:
Individuals who provide us with Personal Information, or whose Personal Information we obtain from Third Parties, may receive periodic emails, newsletters, mailings, or phone calls from us with information on Appodeal’s or our business partners’ products and services or upcoming special offers/events we believe may be of interest. We offer the option to decline these communications at no cost to the Individual by following the instructions in Section 6 below.
Mobile Devices:
Appodeal provides Services that are specifically designed to be compatible and used on mobile Devices. Appodeal will collect certain information that your mobile Device sends when you use such Services, like a GPS location, user settings and the operating system of your Device. Appodeal’s Services require that users log in with an account, and information collected through mobile versions of the Services is associated with user accounts. In addition, Appodeal may enable Individuals to download an application, widget, or other tool that can be used on Devices. Some of these tools may store information on Devices. These tools may transmit Personal Information to Appodeal to enable Individuals to access user accounts and to enable Appodeal to track use of these tools. Some of these tools may enable users to email reports and other information from the tool. Appodeal may use personal or non-identifiable information transmitted to Appodeal to enhance these tools, to develop new tools, for quality improvement and as otherwise described in this Policy or in other notices Appodeal provides.
Anonymous and Aggregated Information:
Appodeal may use Personal Information and other information about you to create anonymized and aggregated information, such as de-identified demographic information, de-identified location information, information about the Device from which you access Appodeal’s Services or Website, or other analyses we create. Anonymized and aggregated information is used for a variety of functions, including the measurement of visitors’ interest in and use of various portions or features of the Services or Website. Anonymized or aggregated information is not Personal Information, and Appodeal may use such information in a number of ways, including research, internal analysis, analytics, and any other legally permissible purposes. We may share this information within Appodeal and with Third Parties for our or their purposes in an anonymized or aggregated form that is designed to prevent anyone from identifying you.
Sharing Content with Friends or Colleagues:
Appodeal’s Services may offer various tools and functionality. For example, Appodeal may provide functionality on its Services that will allow you to forward or share certain content with a friend or colleague. Email addresses that you may provide for a friend or colleague will be used to send your friend or colleague the content or link you request, but will not be collected or otherwise used by Appodeal or any other Third Parties for any other purpose.
Other Uses:
Appodeal may use Personal Information for other purposes for which we have a legitimate interest, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, anti-fraud protection, or any other purpose disclosed to you at the time you provide Personal Information or with your consent.
(d) Third-Party Websites and Social Media Platforms
The Website may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website or other Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by us, and Appodeal does not endorse or make any representations about Third-Party websites or social media platforms. We encourage our users to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that they interact with. We do not endorse, screen or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
The Website and our Services may also contains links and interactive features with various social media platforms. If you already use these platforms, their cookies may be set on your Device when using our Website or Services. You should be aware that Personal Information which you voluntarily include and transmit online in a publicly accessible blog, chat room, social media platform or otherwise online, or that you share in an open forum may be viewed and used by others without any restrictions. We are unable to control such uses of your information when interacting with a social media platform, and by using such services you assume the risk that the Personal Information provided by you may be viewed and used by third parties for any number of purposes.
(e) Software Development Kit
To provide our Services, we offer a software development kit (“SDK”) which allows us to access your Mobile Properties. We may collect Personal Information about users of your Mobile Properties through our SDK, including IP addresses, mobile advertising IDs, GPS location (if appropriate permission is given), application usage statistics such as launch times and duration, ad views and click-throughs. Advertisers or demand partners that provide content through our SDK may also collect Personal Information or other information about your users through our SDK. You agree that, in order to use our SDK, you will obtain appropriate consent from your users for the collection, use and sharing of Personal Information through our SDK, and that you will maintain and process all user data in accordance with your privacy policy and all applicable laws in any country in which your Mobile Properties are distributed or used and users are located.
If you use our SDK as a publisher, you agree that we may also share certain non-personal information about your use of the SDK through your Mobile Properties with advertisers and demand partners who provide content through our SDK. Such information may include the number of requests you receive for ad placements on your Mobile Properties, the number of impressions and click-throughs generated, information about revenue you receive, and eCPM data.
4. Human Resources Data
Appodeal collects Personal Information from Employees, their contact points in case of a medical emergency, and beneficiaries under any insurance policy (“
Human Resources Data
”). “Employees” include current, temporary, permanent, prospective or former employees, directors, contractors, workers, or retirees of Appodeal. The Human Resources Data we collect may include title, name, address, phone number, email address, date of birth, passport number, driver’s license number, Social Security number or other government-issued identification number, financial information related to credit checks, bank details for payroll, information that may be recorded on a CV or application form, language abilities, contact information of third parties in case of an emergency and beneficiaries under any insurance policy. We may also collect sensitive Human Resources Data such as details of health and disability, including mental health, medical leave, and maternity leave; and information about national origin or immigration status.
We acquire, hold, use and Process Human Resources-related Personal Information for a variety of business purposes including:
Workflow management, including assigning, managing and administering projects;
Human Resources administration and communication;
Payroll and the provision of benefits;
Compensation, including bonuses and long-term incentive administration, stock plan administration, compensation analysis, including monitoring overtime and compliance with labor laws, and company recognition programs;
Job grading activities;
Performance and employee development management;
Organizational development and succession planning;
Benefits and personnel administration;
Absence management;
Helpdesk and IT support services;
Regulatory compliance;
Internal and/or external or governmental compliance investigations;
Internal or external audits;
Litigation evaluation, prosecution, and defense;
Diversity and inclusion initiatives;
Restructuring and relocation;
Emergency contacts and services;
Employee safety;
Compliance with statutory requirements;
Processing of Employee expenses and travel charges;
Acquisitions, divestitures, and integrations.
5. Onward Transfer—Appodeal May Disclose Your Information
(a) Information We Share
We may share your information as described in this Policy (e.g., with our Third-Party service providers; to comply with legal obligations; to protect and defend our rights and property) or with your permission. The complete Third-Party service provider list can be found here:
www.appodeal.com/home/partners-privacy-policies/
We Use Vendors and Service Providers.
We may share any information we receive with vendors and service providers, including advertisers that provide content through our SDK. The types of service providers (processors) to whom we entrust Personal Information include service providers for: (i) provision of IT and related services, such as web hosting or data management; (ii) provision of information and services you have requested; (iii) payment processing; and (iv) customer service activities; and (v) in connection with the provision of the Website. Appodeal has executed appropriate contracts with the service providers that prohibit them from using or sharing Personal Information except as necessary to perform the contracted services on our behalf or to comply with applicable legal requirements.
Business Partners.
We may choose to share Personal Information with our business partners and affiliates for our and our affiliates’ internal business purposes, or to provide you with Services that you have requested. Appodeal may also provide Personal Information to business partners with whom we may jointly offer products or services, or whose products or services we believe may be of interest to you. In such cases, our business partner’s name will appear, along with Appodeal’s. Appodeal requires our affiliates and business partners to agree in writing to maintain the confidentiality and security of Personal Information they maintain on our behalf and not to use it for any purpose other than the purpose for which Appodeal provided it to them.
Interest-Based Advertising and Third Party Marketing.
Through our Services, Appodeal may allow Third-Party advertising partners to set tracking tools (e.g., cookies or other Technologies) to collect information regarding your activities (e.g., your IP address, page(s) visited, time of day). We may also share such de-identified information as well as selected Personal Information (such as demographic information and past purchase history) we have collected with Third-Party advertising partners. These advertising partners may use this information (and similar information collected from other websites) for purposes of delivering targeted advertisements to you when you visit non-Appodeal related websites within their networks. This practice is commonly referred to as “interest-based advertising” or “online behavioral advertising. We may allow access to other data collected by the Website to facilitate transmittal of information that may be useful, relevant, valuable or otherwise of interest to you. If you prefer that we do not share your Personal Information with Third-Party advertising partners, you may opt-out of such sharing at no cost by following the instructions in Section 6 below.
Disclosures to Protect Us or Others (e.g., As Required by Law and Similar Disclosures).
We may access, preserve, and disclose your Personal Information, other account information, and content if we believe doing so is required or appropriate to: (i) comply with law enforcement or national security requests and legal process, such as a court order or subpoena; (ii) respond to your requests; (iii) protect yours’, ours’ or others’ rights, property, or safety; (iv) to enforce Appodeal policies or contracts; (v) to collect amounts owed to Appodeal; (vi) when we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical harm or financial loss or in connection with an investigation or prosecution of suspected or actual illegal activity; or (vii) if we, in good faith, believe that disclosure is otherwise necessary or advisable.
In addition, from time to time, server logs may be reviewed for security purposes—e.g., to detect unauthorized activity on the Services. In such cases, server log data containing IP addresses may be shared with law enforcement bodies in order that they may identify users in connection with their investigation of the unauthorized activities.
Merger, Sale, or Other Asset Transfers.
If we are involved in a merger, acquisition, financing due diligence, reorganization, bankruptcy, receivership, sale of company assets, or transition of service to another provider, then your information may be sold or transferred as part of such a transaction as permitted by law and/or contract. Should such an event occur, Appodeal will endeavor to direct the transferee to use Personal Information in a manner that is consistent with the Policy in effect at the time such Personal Information was collected.
(b) Data Transfers
All Personal Information collected via or by Appodeal may be stored anywhere in the world, including but not limited to, in the United States, in the cloud, on our servers, on the servers of our affiliates or the servers of our service providers. Your Personal Information may be accessible to law enforcement or other authorities pursuant to a lawful request. By providing information to Appodeal, you consent to the storage of your Personal Information in these locations.
6. Choice/Modalities to Opt-Out
(a) General
You have the right to opt out of certain uses and disclosures of your Personal Information. Where you have consented to Appodeal’s Processing of your Personal Information or sensitive Personal Information, you may withdraw that consent at any time and opt-out to further Processing by following the instructions in this Section. Even if you opt-out, we may still collect and use non-Personal Information regarding your activities on our Website and/or information from the advertisements on Third-Party websites for non-interest based advertising purposes, such as to determine the effectiveness of the advertisements.
(b) Email and Telephone Communications
If you receive an unwanted email from us, you can use the unsubscribe link found at the bottom of the email to opt-out of receiving future emails. We will process your request within a reasonable time after receipt. Note that you will continue to receive transaction-related emails regarding products or services you have requested. We may also send you certain communications regarding Appodeal and our Services and you will not be able to opt out of those communications (e.g., communications regarding updates to our Terms or this Policy).
We maintain telephone “do-not-call” and “do-not-mail” lists as mandated by law. We process requests to be placed on do-not-mail, do-not-phone and do-not-contact lists within 60 days after receipt, or such shorter time as may be required by law.
(c) Human Resources Data
With regard to Personal Information that Appodeal receives in connection with the employment relationship, Appodeal will use such Personal Information only for employment-related purposes as more fully described above. If Appodeal intends to use this Personal Information for any other purpose, Appodeal will notify the Individual and provide an opportunity to opt-out of such uses.
(d) Do Not Track
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a privacy preference that users can set in certain web browsers. DNT is a way for users to inform websites and services that they do not want certain information about their webpage visits collected over time and across websites or online services. Please note that we do not respond to or honor DNT signals or similar mechanisms transmitted by web browsers.
(e) Cookies and Interest-Based Advertising
We hope that you find the display of interest-based Ads valuable. However, if you wish to opt-out of these advertising services, you can edit your preferences by visiting the “Settings” page of the Website and selecting the option to opt-out.
As noted above, you may stop or restrict the placement of cookies on your Devices or remove them from your browser by adjusting your web browser preferences. Please note that cookie-based opt-outs are not effective on mobile applications. However, on many mobile Devices, application users may opt out of certain mobile ads via their Device settings or by downloading the AppChoices mobile application offered by the Digital Advertising Alliance.
The online advertising industry also provides websites from which you may opt-out of receiving targeted ads from our data partners and our other advertising partners that participate in self-regulatory programs. You can access these, and also learn more about targeted advertising and consumer choice and privacy, at
networkadvertising.org/managing/opt_out.asp
, or
www.youronlinechoices.eu
and
www.aboutads.info/choices/
. You can also choose not to be included in Google Analytics by following this link:
tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
To be clear, whether you are using our opt-out found at
www.appodeal.com/home/sdk-opt-out
and/or an online industry opt-out, these cookie-based opt-outs must be performed on each Device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt-out will not be effective on your mobile Device. You must separately opt-out on each Device. Advertisements on Third-Party websites that contain the AdChoices link and that link to this Privacy Policy may have been directed to you based on anonymous, non-Personal Information collected by advertising partners over time and across websites. These advertisements provide a mechanism to opt-out of the advertising partners’ use of this information for interest-based advertising purposes.
7. SECURITY OF Your INFORMATION
The security of your Personal Information is important to us. We maintain appropriate safeguards and current security standards to protect your Personal Information from unauthorized access, disclosure, or misuse, such as using SSL encryption. However, no system can be completely secure, and we cannot ensure or warrant the security of any information you provide to us. While we take meaningful steps to secure your information, we do not promise, and you should not expect, that your Personal Information will always remain secure. We do not accept liability for unintentional disclosure.
By using the Website or providing Personal Information to us, you agree that we may communicate with you electronically regarding security, privacy, and administrative issues relating to your use of the Website. If we learn of a security system’s breach, we may attempt to notify you electronically by posting a notice on the Website or sending an e-mail to you. You may have a legal right to receive this notice in writing.
8. Rights of Access, Rectification, Erasure, and Restriction
You can review and change certain Personal Information related to your use of our Website or Services (such as your name and contact information). To access your information, simply sign in to your account and you will be able to edit your Personal Information.
You may inquire as to whether Appodeal is Processing Personal Information about you, request access to Personal Information, and ask that we correct, amend or delete your Personal Information where it is inaccurate. Where otherwise permitted by applicable law, you may send an e-mail to legal@appodeal.com or use any of the methods set out in this Policy to request access to, receive (port), restrict Processing, seek rectification, or request erasure of Personal Information held about you by Appodeal. Such requests will be processed in line with local laws.
| Although Appodeal makes good faith efforts to provide Individuals with access to their Personal Information, there may be circumstances in which Appodeal is unable to provide access, including but not limited to: where the information contains legal privilege, would compromise others’ privacy or other legitimate rights, where the burden or expense of providing access would be disproportionate to the risks to the Individual’s privacy in the case in question or where it is commercially proprietary. If Appodeal determines that access should be restricted in any particular instance, we will provide you with an explanation of why that determination has been made and a contact point for any further inquiries. To protect your privacy, Appodeal will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Information.
9. Retention
Appodeal retains the Personal Information we receive as described in this Policy for as long as you use our Services or as necessary to fulfill the purpose(s) for which it was collected, provide our Services, resolve disputes, establish legal defenses, conduct audits, pursue legitimate business purposes, enforce our agreements, and comply with applicable laws.
10. CHILDREN’S PRIVACY
The Website is restricted to individuals over the age of 18. We do not knowingly collect, maintain, or use Personal Information from children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16) years of age, and no part of the Website is directed to children under the age of 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16). If you learn that your child has provided us with Personal Information without your consent, you may alert us at legal@appodeal.com. If we learn that we have collected any Personal Information from children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), we will promptly take steps to delete such information and terminate the child’s account.
11. International Users
By using the Website, you will transfer data to the United States. If you are visiting from the European Union or other regions with laws governing data collection and use, please note that you are agreeing to the transfer of your information to the United States and processing globally. By providing your Personal Information, you consent to any transfer and processing in accordance with this Policy.
12. REDRESS/COMPLIANCE AND ACCOUNTABILITY
Questions or concerns regarding our compliance with this Policy may be directed to
legal@appodeal.com
or contact us at:
Appodeal, Inc.
575 Market St, 5th Floor
San Francisco, CA 94105, USA
Appodeal will address your concerns and attempt to resolve any privacy issues in a timely manner.
If you are an EU citizen and feel that Appodeal is not abiding by the terms of this Privacy Policy, please contact us at the contact information provided above. If any request remains unresolved, you may contact the national data protection authority for your EU Member State.
13. OTHER RIGHTS AND IMPORTANT INFORMATION
(a) CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY AND PRACTICES
Revision to the Privacy Policy.
We may revise this Privacy Policy in our sole discretion, so review it periodically. If you continue to visit this Website or use our Services after such changes have been made, you hereby provide your consent to the changes.
Posting of Revised Privacy Policy.
If there are any material changes to this Policy, Appodeal will notify you by email or as otherwise required by applicable law. We will post any adjustments to the Privacy Policy on this web page, and the revised version will be effective immediately when it is posted (or upon notice as applicable). If you are concerned about how your information is used, bookmark this page and read this Privacy Policy periodically.
New Uses of Personal Information.
Additionally, before we use Personal Information for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will endeavor to provide information regarding the new purpose and give you the opportunity to opt-out. Where consent of the Individual for the Processing of Personal Information is otherwise required by law or contract, Appodeal will endeavor to comply with the law or contract.
CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
California law permits users who are California residents to request and obtain from us once a year, free of charge, a list of the Third Parties to whom we have disclosed their Personal Information (if any) for their direct marketing purposes in the prior calendar year, as well as the type of Personal Information disclosed to those parties. Appodeal does not share Personal Information with Third Parties for their own marketing purposes.
The last update to our Privacy Policy was posted on May 3, 2018.